I will semi-restate what I said in a different thread, but it's time for workers to collectivise in something new and better than a union, which is a democratic co-operative that has a flatter hierarchy.

This apparatus represents the corporate/union/government/1% "complex" or whatever. 

If you elect people high up in a vertical hierarchy of a huge bureaucracy, corruption only needs to affect a few people to ruin the entire organisation.Steelers fan here, ELI5Easily. Especially if you own an S6 LOLRAISE YOUR DALTON LINES!!!I stopped listening to mainstream country in the 80's.

The biggest travesty has been the artists out there who tried and failed/never reached their full potential because country wasn't there to support them as a musical ecosystem.In the 50's, the argument was reversed. Rock was frowned upon because it was about marketing and shallow, vapid subjects while country had more authentic performers who weren't manufactured singing songs about the complexity of their feelings.Willie's Roadhouse is the backbone.Yeah but indie rock is thriving outside of the corporate model and forcing it's way in. Some of these bands you hear now like X Ambassadors or Saint Motel were never invited to the party.

These aren't attractive, marketable people. They're funny, quirky, serious, etc and aren't there for their look.BTW, speaking of...his weekly show on SiriusXM where he makes quips like that (and more) is like a master class in music.

I love him far more as a critic and musical historian/curator than an artist. He dumbed himself way down as well compared to the vast depth of what he shows on his podcast. He's sort of a hypocrite there.90's pop was the absolute rock bottom for pop rock...hmm. 

Pop rock bottom?I somewhat suspect that "Renegades" by X Ambassadors was written for Jeep.

Also in the commercial they never let the blind guy drive. So unfair.This is my argument against "experts" - FF is gambling. You have expertise, but you're not an expert. There is no such thing in an area where you can't get repeatable results.

You can be an expert chef. If you cut onions uniformly 100% of the time, that's a repeatable skill. In fantasy if you're right 60% of the time you're a genius - not an expert. If you cut onions right 60% of the time, you're a hack.

I have fantasy football skills and expertise, but I am no expert. You can be paid to do something which means you're a professional, but you don't have to be an expert to get that description.

No one would say Tony Gwynn was an expert hitter if they went by the standard of an expert batting 1.000 - he was far better than everyone else when see how far off that number they all are. He was an expert at breaking down tape.

Good luck in your job hunt.As a Mets fan, I'm not sure how to feel about this because this dude is such a...well you know what I'm getting at.

All I can say is that the right shade of blue is gonna move on, I just hope it's ours, but if it's yours let's not have it be because of a Puig...what he does. Good analysis, although the laziest/easiest way is to just look at scores: team TNF vs their average and TNF games vs the league average.My 0-3 teams deserve to be and I think will work it out.

The bad: They all have Roethlisberger, Lacy and Bell

The good: They all have Roethlisberger, Lacy and BellWe could sew a uniform for him...Shit! Almost worked!For the life of me I still cannot figure out what Moats was doing on that Aiken reception.

I'm having a hard time moving on from that play.We finally fooled Flacco. We were just playing bad so that he'd get confident and we could step in front on one.He was well covered but the throw was on point. Gotta catch that.This drive gives me hope that even if we don't hang on that Vick can play well enough to get us at least 1 win.Sean Spence: The Anti-MoatsI guess we don't trust Vick enough to take some shots.Cardiac ScobeeFlaccoface

We need screencap of thatVick to DHB

That's like Madden, not real lifeI don't want to say it's a self-fulfilling prophecy, but tonight is truly the first time this year the Ravens have played like/looked like an 0-3 team. 

They're just dead out there.Mr Rogers with the towel?

I love it.See Baltimore, go back to the zone cutback shit and this happens.I dunno what's up with Aiken, but we can't cover him on either side of the field.Win or lose, Spence gets the game ball.Ballsy. Ravens keep pressing like the fake FG.

I'm impressed.Ah shit. Well that explains why their play failed.If the Ravens win tonight, it'll be because of plays like this where Forsett is keeping the chains moving.Damn it Ravens, you guys had found your groove.

Come on.This is kind of interesting because you can guess/tell that Vick and DHB work together as the backups in practiceThat's what happens when you play your opposite3rd downs are gonna be the story tonight for us, unforced errors the story for the Ravens.Tie the game!I just...hate that play. 

Our stadium is tough for FGs, we know that, but you have Justin Tucker and you're on the road. Play for the tie, dammit.

Come on, Baltimore. You guys have beaten yourselves tonight.Bell's patience is matched only by the intensity of his blockers.Forsett made two amazing blocks on that series. He almost stopped TWO different guys there on 4th down!Ok Vick, time to make some memories that will endear you to Steelers Nation forever.What an effort by Bell.Hey Ravens, can we borrow Tucker for the kick?

We'll let you use Brown for 1 play.For all the times Vick burned them on the left side, the Ravens finally learned.This game, I don't even know...That's #5 I think...phew, streak aliveHill has made some pretty scary plays (to him) recentlyWill Hill...keep it away from him on 4th LOLMother Tucker

GG ratbirdsI was just about to make one of these.

We should have had open tryouts before the Eagles.Well it's impossible to kick over 40 in Heinz unless you're Justin Tucker...Yeah and teams keep getting anyone worth having when Scobee should have been gone already.I volunteer to help her make motherhood happen.And then she can beg for more money to help her with the next oneNo she's just a complete narcissist. It's a shame Sears closed that rather than their UMall store. I would much rather have Target there. Islamophobia? For a valid criticism?

These countries hate Israel and then imitate it at the first opportunity.&gt;Top-Tier Wide Receivers should at least average 7 targets a game, and elite Running Backs should have at least 13 touches (carries &amp; targets) a game.

I've been playing fantasy football for 26 years now and if this were any time in the past 20 years, the advice would say:

&gt;Top-Tier Wide Receivers should at least average 5 targets a game, and elite Running Backs should have at least 25 touches (carries &amp; targets) a game.

And you know, I'm still not sure it's wrong today. 

Maybe the elite RB doesn't get 25 carries per game and the argument of the 100 yard game came down to them averaging 4.0 YPC or 4.2 YPC (and yes, this was an argument 20 years ago), but it should come down the same amount of *snaps*.

Maybe an RB accounted for 60% of a team's plays, but it's more important now that they account for at least that many snaps.

And a decent WR? 5 targets is probably enough to make them pretty good. Back in the day, owning a WR2 was fantasy suicide as they never got anything. Now it's almost better because they don't get doubled and get lots of short routes.

I'm not ready to accept this advice yet, but I'll upvote it anyway.

Targets and carries are like a number in an equation, not the equation alone.You deserve every downvote you've gotten.

You know what I hate about FF discussion? People who only talk stats and not play or just think "oh, that's not likely."

Be serious. They call red zone plays for the guy. Of course he's a fucking TD magnet. If you watched/understood, you would know that.

A few years ago we'd be talking about a goal-line back vulturing TDs. Now it's James Jones doing it. And don't tell me that's not a thing because it's totally a thing in GB right now.Make sure you make no effort to understand it as it's horrible and will stick in your head. Especially do not watch the stupid fucking video.&gt; Says literally nothing other than "Please pat me on the back and tell me how great I drafted/how good my team is."

If you're overly sensitive, perhaps.

If I say "I'm benching x because I have better options (y and z)" it's because that's how my list is ranked. 

It tells people "you know what, it's ok to bench a certain player if you have other options." It says to people to make sure to use your higher-ranked players if you have them. It gives an example of "hey, don't do this" from someone who is thinking clearly.This is more one of those things I can get behind - especially if you do auctions. If you have some skill and can play the room you can end up with a really great team.He's got a lot of them:

http://oneweekoneband.tumblr.com/post/26981773193/when-the-claws-come-out-robert-smith-the-critic

My all-time fave is this:

&gt;You can\u2019t drink on an eight hour flight, pass out, and then go onstage. Well you can, but\u2026then you\u2019re Spandau Ballet.

He's just brilliant. He talked enough smack to get plenty of notice in the British music press while also making sure to alienate just enough people so that they wouldn't become *too* popular. I agree. Brilliant!

Meanwhile, those of us who *didn't* open their 1st-print Amiibo will have less competition from those who did!

/repaintsWe put a really nice cherry tree in our old house and even grafted a few different types to it.

New neighbours tore it down.

Idiots.

I should sic this woman on them! That'll learn 'em!&gt; In my first one on one with her, she started out seemingly genuine: 'tell me about your challenges, what's standing in the way of this being your dream job, etc.'

"Go to the bathroom. Wash your hands. Look up at the mirror. Then you will see the answer to all of your questions."Yup. It's more of an indictment on our culture and society these days that we are overly rewarding this sort of behaviour in people and indulging it. That's why subs like this are so important.

If you ask me, petty narcissists will find hardcore enablers and have their BS amplified. Enablers are the worst. One of them can feed tons of narcissists. 

We also have an enabling culture, half of it some sort of pseudo-libertarian "mind your own beeswax" sort of thing coupled with "everyone is a special snowflake" - ugh.That's why I try to use the terms "malignant" and "petty" narcissist. 

We can all be petty narcissists at times - defencive, bossy, arrogant, etc. It's the malignant ones who are like cancer to everyone they know and are incurable. That's the problem. Normal people who can recognise their own power plays and the like don't even need to be redeemed because they're not irredeemable. They are being an asshole. Narcissists are assholes, period."And I know the people who are deathstalking me will take great pleasure thinking they're right because I had to drop out, but &lt;lame excuse&gt; means it doesn't matter and they're wrong and I'm right."

See, now we have to guess what &lt;lame excuse&gt; is about us so she can turn it around.

Always avoid accountability Ragen, always.You are why I can't tell people I'm a libertarian anymore without them immediately assuming I'm a kook.Ridgeline?

Story checks out.I picked the Ravens this week.

We have all of these 3 point games.

I'm on Yahoo doing my pick asking myself "we always have these 3 point games and...oh fuck Scobee? Over Tucker?"

I even had to give damn Baltimore like 5 confidence points or some shit. Makes me ill.Yes, Josh Scobee did a wonderful job of that.This looks like it was written by a person whose country doesn't have Charmin Ultra Soft.

All kidding aside from the dry humour there, pro athletes are creatures of habit. There's a lot of structure that goes into their lives and by keeping things as routine as possible you eliminate unwelcome variables.Justin.

Justin.

I'm in a lot of fantasy leagues. I have you in most of them. 

Why?

Because I'm smart enough to know you're money...like any Steelers fan.

I figure if you're gonna beat my ass, you might as well get me some god damned fantasy points you dick. So thanks for the 13-15 points you got me tonight and no thanks to you for doing what you always do, which is be automatic.Ice cold?Scobee: "Oh yeah, Justin? Well I'll be sleeping in the rest of this week at home while your dumb ass is working!"As I look at the picture more, I think he's trying to roll her over to help her get up and just grabbed on to whatever handgrip he could find. That knee is to help push her away. Since she can't sit up, he'll put her face down and then she can get up on her knees...wait, I dunno because Tess needed help. Hmm."Yet more proof that being thin causes cancer."

"If she had some meat on her bones, she wouldn't have cancer in her bone marrow."

"Probably too skinny and didn't have enough weight to fight the cancer!"

We're at the point now where they can say that with a straight face./r/whowouldwin

This Faith person I have never heard of vs Frederick J. Dukes

Same matchup, but both are ~~blood~~hungerlusted

Same matchup, but they are in a pie eating contestNarcissism: proposing to change an entire culture to suit your whims

Not narcissism: proposing to change a culture that has nothing to do with you other than altruistic desireSo ~3 miles a day?

NFL players larger than her do that. 

Like others have said, I'd suggest something lower impact, but whatever. Running for 25 minutes a day at her size isn't impressive. I would expect that and more. It's just going to fuck up her joints over time."Nobody knows"

Then why do you pedal answers?

It's amazing, because you're a nobody and you know jack shit as well.  You are the epitome of "nobody knows", but as usual that doesn't apply to you because you're "somebody". 

Nobody knows except you. How predictable. I should have expected that after seeing you use a picture that is written about people like you. 

You can get as much evidence shown to you as you like, but if you go "nobody knows" then the picture is talking about wilful ignoramuses such as yourself.Probably because of Ragenocentrism, where the entire world revolves around the gravitational pull of her egomaniacal rotundity. Y'all don't understand Republicans/libertarians, but they have a point: Anglos don't do socialism well.

They fear turning out like you. The fact you can't do it as well as Scandinavia is puzzling. I don't understand why the UK don't wipe the slate clean and fix their system to be Scandinavian as much as the British don't understand why Americans don't do it.Or maybe OP can have a tartelette in small claims court.You need to Google this and check for a class action suit and ask that lawyer what to do before they come.Wait am I in /r/ShittyCarMods?Props to them for willing to do the right thing for everyone rather than the right thing for them politically.Quick story time:

When using the phrase "cutting off your nose to spite your face", my wife (a Francophone) finally said to me "Devin, you say that all the time and I have no idea what it means."

So I explained it to her as best I could and she kinda gets it, but says "That doesn't seem like a good way of expressing that idea."

It does!

It just doesn't register in the Francophone linguistic translator, thus the idea of cutting off one's nose to spite their face is a notion that Quebecois don't understand.

A prime example of that would be withdrawing support for the NDP who would institute of voting system that would allow Quebec more control if their fringe party would pop up in the future who are instead voting for their fringe protest party now.

Look, I know as well as anyone that this is a protest vote and that these people don't want to participate in Canada at all. But there is more than one way to skin a cat (another one she doesn't get) and politically the Quebec nationalists ought to support the one party who would give them a chance to come back in the future, which happens to be the NDP.I was actually going to post this as a self.post question a few days ago (and then remembered nobody ever participates in anything besides "what non football athlete would you want on your team right now" stuff), but decided against it.

My argument is/was that if we can give Brady all of this credit for dragging a bunch of nobodies kicking and screaming into the win column, then why not Cam?

Even the "elite TE" thing is the same, except Greg Olsen isn't anywhere near Rob Gronkowski.

We've not seen much of Carolina this year, so you have to take the word of...what, Panthers fans? No, you wouldn't.

Who else have seen the Panthers? Not many. But it's not a ridiculous notion. It's just that Tom Brady is playing absolutely out of his mind right now and an MVP would be a big FU to Goodell and he's trying very hard to get one.

And I still might lean towards Cam if he keeps this up. Tom has a run game. Cam has nothing. Tom has solid, no-name WRs. Cam has hot garbage. Ted Ginn is one of the worst NFL players I have ever seen and it's an amazing injustice that guy manages to stick around. He must know where the bodies are buried. I don't get it.

Riverboat Ron is no Bill Belichick. 

It's fucking Cam, dude. He's carrying this entire team. He consistent now. That's so huge for him.

Why should Brady benefit from history so much and Cam be punished? We're judging the 2015 MVP and Cam is playing the best football in the NFL right now.

EDIT: We're at 22% upvoted. Way to go /r/nflI think Julio has to be in the conversation, but he's not above Cam or Tom. I think Matt's in there, although vote-splitting will negate he and Julio.My hope for the Saints is that they wipe the slate clean. Trade Brees, fire Payton and take the $80m+ under the cap in 2017 and start over.

It's grown stagnant and it's wasting the best years of guys like Payton and Brees.

I'd really like to see Payton go to the Giants and replace Coughlin (who needs to retire) or be given full control of the Browns operation with NO MEDDLING FROM ABOVE. 

He would be an instant godsend to a lot of teams. He would work magic with Eli and make him take the next step into the top tier and the Giants would be unstoppable. He would get the Browns to be creative. 

There are so many teams where he'd be a huge upgrade. He shouldn't oversee a rebuilding effort in New Orleans. No it sounds like they got 6 HELOCs on one property, when a 2nd and 3rd is fairly rare; they probably misrepresented what it was.

"Oh, we need a 2nd mortgage" when they already had one...or four.He's a pastor now, eh?

It's like the opposite of Matt 25:40

"Whatever you do to me, you don't do for the bankers who committed worse fraud on a scale multitudes greater than I."

If he does 5 years on $1m, you should do 50,000 on $1bn.Yeah, when the Powerball gets above $250m I start thinking about how I'd make that money work for me to get $4bn so I could afford to rescue an NFL team from a hapless owner like the Spanos family and build something nice for the community.He brings up an ancillary point that I keep thinking about, which is Tomsula not having any cachet. 

You either get guys who couldn't get hired anywhere else or guys who want to usurp his job if/when he gets fired.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Template:San_Francisco_49ers_staff

It shouldn't surprise anyone the 49ers are struggling because they are outmatched at not only every player position, but every coaching position as well.

And I like Tomsula. He's exactly the kind of guy I'd love to have as an assistant on the Steelers.

An *assistant*.You know what's interesting to me?

Futbol fans completely get how a guy in his 20's can be bad because it's so plain to see they lack the quickness and endurance the younger players have. Creativity and experience can only mask so much.

NFL fans don't see/understand how players decline.I actually have Cary Williams in my IDP fantasy league because he looks pretty good out there, but I had come to the same conclusion/problem because in fantasy defense, the best CBs don't get stats. You want one that's pretty bad.

I have the #1 CB as my CB1, who is Jimmy Smith. He's a good CB who is having a really bad year (for him). He's got 18 tackles, which means there have been completions, but he's also got 2 INTs and a TD.

Teams are going at him.

Cary actually replaced Antwan Blake for me who you saw get some decent action at him last night. 

Just using our own scoring as a lazy metric, Jimmy Smith has 100.50 points, Cary Williams has 61.50 and Aqib Talib has 69.50

Revis only has 38.25 points.

What's the point?

Well, like I said, you have to be "bad enough" to get points. Williams is bad enough to at least be 13th overall in points.Yup...it's a worse version of the Cobalt/Cavalier, which is one of the worst-designed vehicles ever.

Because it is one.

I rented a HHR once. It was just facepalm bad. What a miserable design.Yup. The order code was 80YOMANYour three choices are to be a victim, an enabler or to leave. The first two get blurry and merge together. 

Victims who don't separate themselves from their narcissist are enablers on some level.

When you look in the mirror and finally feel disgust for your role in playing the two parts he requires, only then will you leave. Any other inaction or waffling is you enabling this.

I have some sympathy: you are a victim. But you're also an enabler. That's not victim-blaming. That's enabler-blaming. If you focus on the victim part, he wins. That's what he wants. It gives him power.

When you admit the terrible truth that he's made you into his enabler? Even withholding intimacy creates the conflict he desires to control you. You aren't in charge until you leave.I've watched the Eagles and Panthers and neither Funchess or Agholor have had a role of any significance. What snaps they do get are ones where the QB isn't really looking their way.

Quick also could be very limited...or not.

The devil you do know vs the devil you don't.

If past history is any indicator, Funchess and Agholor won't see usage again. If Quick doesn't see usage? There you go. With no prior "anything" to back it up, he could also factor very heavily in Sunday's contest.

The most rational choice would be Quick.Both are good bets, but I want to roll with Jones again this week. He's one of my "sneaky starts of the week" because of a confluence of factors, one of which is the fact the Chiefs give up massive points to WRs who play on the weak side and Marvin Jones plays the weak side.

The only risk to him is that the Bengals move AJ Green like Cobb or they overload the weak side and Sanu ends up on the weakest DB and gets it.

Otherwise the ceiling for WRs is a lot higher there than vs the Jets.I like them both. I have rather fluid/situational rankings and rather than say "Oh, one guy is above another" I just have them in the same tier/group right now.

I like Marshall as a True #1 WR, but I also like Sanders as a target magnet. Both are safe for their own reasons. 

If you absolutely forced me to pick, I would go with Sanders because when in doubt, I prefer to take the points. 930am in London could be a shitshow. Both teams could fail to show. That could mean no offense or no defense. Maybe both.4th week in I think there's a nascent history to look at with enough games and snaps for these guys.

Evans I benched because I still want to see his rapport with Winston grow, but I already know Maclin has good rapport with Smith and Cooper has it with Carr.

Keenan Allen has been very up and down which makes for a risky play.

The danger to Cooper is an early lead and they stop throwing, but the Bears are abysmal on defense. 

Logic says Cooper vs arguably the worst defense in the NFL and Maclin vs a team who should require them to throw often.I'm not all that worried about Maclin. If everything goes as expected, the Bengals should easily score on KC's DBs and then KC will have to pass to catch up while CIN will play a lot of prevent.

I actually have Maclin as one of the top plays this week. If the game unfolds as I said, he stands to be the recipient of a lot of volume which is great for baseline scoring.

I backed off from Hilton and Moncrief this week. I don't think they're bad plays per se vs the Jags, just that I'm not sure who their QB will be or how effective Luck will be.

Look, there's a chance Luck goes out there and lights it up and it's all fine, but I don't want to take the risk that they don't do it. I really like Gore this week because the Colts ought to run the ball if they are smart and the Jags can be run on. They need to stay healthy and keep this game close.

The reason I think those WRs could go off is because I can see the Jags lighting them up and forcing them to pass.

I like Crabtree to bounce back. Ball in CHI has been awful, but he stepped it up last week. He's been better. Still, Crabtree will be on Ball and I think that's exploitable. 

Marshall I also like because he's got a great role.

If it were me I would take the two guys most likely to get volume and a lower ceiling in Maclin and Marshall, but if you need to gamble a bit you could skip that and do the two Colts WRs. 

FYI, the wise guys have MIA/NYJ at 41 (I would take the over if you're looking for a parlay) and the Colts and Jags at 47, so there's probably more points to be had with Indy. But again, it's QB-dependent.

Sometimes you're down early. Maybe your opponent had Bell and Tucker. Then it would make sense to hope for an Indy shootout.I like them both, but Marvin Jones is one of my top-ranked plays this week because of matchup. He's the weak side WR and KC's weak side DBs are awful, they are the worst-ranked DBs in the NFL and they're banged up at the position. 

Factor in that Jones is playing really well and it's one of the best bets this week to have a high floor and high ceiling.

I think Robinson also has an incredibly high ceiling - if he were the top-scoring WR of the week it wouldn't surprise me and if he had 6 points it wouldn't surprise me.

If Jones has less than 14 points I will be shocked. It meant Sanu stole his lunch. While I think Maclin is the more solid play, if that Jets game turns out to be a shitshow, Matthews could easily get you into the bonus and the way your scoring is structured, that's an exploit you need to risk.

Maclin's line could be something like 8/11 for 82 yards and 1 TD, but Matthews could be like 6/10 for 144 yards and 1 TD. 

I give those numbers straight outta my backside because I think Maclin is a higher volume of conversions, but Matthews has the ability to catch a team on their heels and burn them. He'll be on Cromartie who is having problems getting his hips turned as guys run past him. He's hurt. I really like Matthews for your scoring here. Take the chance.Nope.

NYJ don't move their DBs. Matthews is the X, he will be on Cromartie and Jennings/Landry will be on the Skrine/Revis combo.Jones, Sanders and Marshall. Marshall is the only risky pick because that game could be pretty bad, but Jones and Sanders should make up for that. 

I think your best chance to get 40 points are Jones, Sanders and Marshall. Allen is schemed in a way we aren't privy to, so he's tough to endorse and Moncrief has more unknowns with his situation than the other WRs, despite being a solid play thus far. I wouldn't mess around with Luck being hurt this week.You have to risk Allen with a full point PPR. 

He had Week 2 with 2/4 rec/tar and then 15/17 and 12/18 in Weeks 1 and 3.

Simple math tells you that James Jones with his totals would need to have multiple TDs to match those receptions of Keenan.

Keenan Allen had as many receptions in Week 3 as Jones has had all year...and more targets in that one game.

If you're in a 1 PPR league, Keenan Allen should not leave your lineup despite the risk of him giving you an 0-fer.A bunch of part-time scrubs or Rishard Matthews.

How in-depth do you need my answer to be?Ah, Hurns. This is a sneaky one. Glad to see him on the list. 

I would eliminate him or Hilton. The other two need to go. They get a lot of usage.

When it comes down to it, if Luck is good to go, roll with Hilton. Otherwise go with Hurns. If I had to choose how the Colts will scheme the Jags, I think they try to take Robinson away. I think they will fail, but if they succeed it benefits Hurns. 

Believe it or not, the Jags can actually cover Hilton (in theory) because their DBs are decent. He's had 2 huge games and 2 decent games in the past 2 years vs JAX. I downgrade it if Luck isn't good to go. Hurns hasn't seen much usage vs the Colts, so he's a bit of a mystery, but I like him if Luck isn't good to go. 

It would make the most sense for the Colts to use Gore and run him into the ground.Vegas as the O/U for the Bills at 48 and Percy has been getting open and getting fed regularly. Quick is a mystery and Stevie is a "hold" for me right now because the roles in San Diego are still shaking out. 

Percy seems like the best play.Both are pretty risky. Evans is still building rapport with Winston while Moncrief has it. But if Luck can't go/is taken out or injured, does Moncrief have any chemistry with Hasselbeck?

If Luck somehow ends up ruled out or sounds sketchy, go with Evans.

I benched Moncrief in most of my leagues and Evans in the only league I have him. If I were you, I'd grab Marvin Jones off waivers and spot start him. If it's an 8-teamer, he's probably there. Under 40% owned.Your 2nd round pick or some guy you got on waivers in Week 2.

Hmm.

The guy you got on waivers in Week 2.

Amazing to say, but it's True. **SEATTLE** has looked alright defensing top WRs and Calvin is a step below his usual self. It's feasible they shut him down. They have the talent.

Even I am wrestling with keeping him in or going with Marvin Jones or someone similar this week. He's due to bounce back and have a big game. The Lions need this game badly. I could see them throwing up prayers to Calvin out of desperation, but his track record this year tells me they're a hot mess. 

I lean towards James Jones. Seattle are angry.This year I'm kind of cool with WR in FLEX over RB because of potential points. They get so much volume that the RB volume argument is lessened. You do have good WRs.

Going by the chemistry/makeup of your roster, I would go with Maclin and the Matthews for volume and floor. 

In an 8-teamer where everyone is stacked, you can't be the owner who failed to get production out of every position.They are statistically insignificant as far as separation goes, but Boldin has a higher role on the 49ers right now. I would stand pat.I would agree, despite Eli looking ownable. You have a crisis RB situation and it's better to be proactive than reactive.I don't have as much confidence in Matt Jones as I do Allen Robinson. 

The chance of you having a hole at WR is just as great and your option for filling it is way better with Robinson. 

Let's say all of your WRs do pan out, there will still be trade value. Jones is still a bit of an unknown commodity.I'm guessing he's another Kim Davis - electedIf I were a journalist at his next presser, my question would go like this:

"Sheriff Hanlin, you believe Sandy Hook was a hoax. Are you launching an investigation to see if the shooter was a government shill and are the people killed crisis actors or actual victims?"See I'm torn because I'd generally root for the people are uniforms are blue to honour over the people whose orange we honour.

I appreciate the sentiment, but I'd rather beat the Cardinals.http://www.rvtrader.com/New-or-Used-Park-Model-RVs/search-results?type=Park%20Model%7C198072&amp;sort=featured%3Aasc&amp;layoutView=listView&amp;IDP mixed with offense is pointless. There is so much depth and talent that it makes more like a daily league where you just pick "the guy of the week"

In regular FF, there are only a handful of guys who get points. With IDP, everyone gets them. There's no positional scarcity. And if you drafted enough IDP players to eliminate that, the offensive players would be only a trivial part of your team.

I started an all-defense league about...15 years ago and passed it off to one of my friends a few years back after we perfected it. It's incredibly fun. But mixing IDP with offense is so full of exploits as to make it silly to even go that way. 

The one year we tried our regular league with IDP, there was no point even drafting IDPs - you could just pick them up off waivers and do as well. With our all-defense league it's very painful to cut players because we draft enough guys where there is limited talent left on waivers, but also not teams full of lame scrubs.

We actually sent our league settings to Yahoo a few times and asked them to offer it as an option and they've never even responded personally (or at all), so we gave up. I think it would be popular. You think you like it now? Imagine trying it when it's been perfected and you take entire teams full of IDPs from every position and have to expand that strategy of yours to a complete roster.&gt;What a dick head

Bellend - he's English

WindowsNT feel...So San Francisco is simply more tech savvy?

Right...For some reason I always thought that story was about Belgium.

I seem to remember the story being about people going to Belgium to get these magazines and then taking them home to Germany or whatever.Now you know why Obi-Wan hated flying and guns: too much rage temptation.We're gonna need more ice.This isn't really a surprise. By now it should be common knowledge that only rest and lack of usage heals a hamstring. The fact he kept pushing it meant this was going to happen.

I had actually started getting Karlos a few weeks ago in anticipation of this. It's not like there was any sort of secret knowledge involved: THIS IS WHAT HAPPENS WITH HAMSTRINGS.Well Josh, congratulations on your future tenure with the New England Patriots where you'll win a SB ring.It's all about situation and context. If they're on passing teams, sure. 

The important thing is that things average out over time. If RB1 is on the winning team and they control the ball/clock and he gets 15 and RB2 only gets 7 points, you still averaged 11 points at the position. 

That's great. 

If you can average 10 points per position you're going to score 90 points. If you score 90, odds are better than 50-50 you win. The higher you go, the more likely it is. If you lose 114-112, tip your hat to your opponent and glare at the computer for random scheduling luck.

You don't need to score 130 each week to win. You just need to not put up a bunch of zeros in several slots. I don't aim for 14-0, I am for 8-6. I don't aim for 160-70 wins each week, I aim for 90 points. When I set my lineups I add it all together and see which combination is most likely to get me there. 

If you're concerned about 2 RBs, play your opponent. If you have them on opposite teams and his team is better at running and favoured to win big, odds are that your team will get into a garbage time passing contest. Maybe yield to him. 

Another thing: fantasy points are scored early. If an RB doesn't get going before the half, they probably won't get going. If you know your RB and know he's effective early in games and the opponent allows rushers to get the bulk of their yards early on, that's what you go with. If it's True for both teams? Go with both. They will eventually get their yards.

But if it's two teams who are top-ranked vs the run, weak vs the pass, etc? Then you need to add more gravity to situation. Studs should outweigh situation.

When I rank players, I do it like an equation ((player)+(situation*ranking) sort of thing. They are additions or multipliers or modifiers to the main thing. That's why start your studs is the first operational in your order of precedence, but other factors ought to modify it.So far this Indy game looks to be a shootout, even if Luck is limited or is not in there.

Bortles is up there with the top half of QBs for attempts and yards with Luck. 

The prospect of a London Shitshow should keep you away from Tannehill and Kaepernick is in a very unstable situation.This is tough because there are two lines of thinking:

* Taylor in a quality matchup that could require both teams to keep pressing

-vs-

* Carr vs the worst defense in the NFL who have allowed tons of fantasy points to opposing QBs/WRs and are even worse since losing Allen

Your risk with Taylor is those teams slow it down and try to run more. Your risk with Carr is that they get so out of hand early that they stop passing.

I think the higher ceiling play is Carr, but the higher floor play is Taylor. If it means anything to you, where I had the choice this week I took Taylor, but I am starting OAK WRs with confidence.I would keep rolling with Freeman. Last week had two things: one, Freeman benefitted from some wide-open holes. Against the Cowboys? Wow. So I am starting to trust that O-line. If they can beat the Cowboys in the trenches, that's pointing upward on the Freeman hope graph.

The other thing is that he was just running well and that also matters. Until just recently he never looked to run it inside. I think it's his diminutive size/psychology. But he took it everywhere when asked and that's also good.

Dunbar could have more limitation on him with Christine coming into this week's rotation and Hill is somewhat of a mystery right now.

The 49ers are a hot mess. In the one league I have Hyde I have him in there, but I am leaning towards other options. 

What you're really asking here is who has the hotter mess: Cincy at RB or SF at everything.

If Hill struggles, they have Gio. SF doesn't have anything *but* Hyde. Neither are great, but I would go Hyde.Ah yes, the old "WR3 vs WR2B" conundrum. 

I would roll with Stevie. Hankerson is an afterthought: that's Julio's team. I had seen a statistic where Matt Ryan's QB rating when throwing to Julio was like 120-130 and to everyone else it was 60.

I don't know that stat for Rivers, but I'd wager his QB rating to Stevie is higher than his baseline QB rating. 

I also think part of the reason SD lost last week was that the Vikings took away Stevie rather than Keenan. Rivers looked bad. If they want to bounce back, they can't target Allen 15 times a game.

Stevie could be seeing his role eroding, but I'm sort of stubborn that he will bounce back. I'm not confident enough in either guy to own them in my leagues, but if I needed a WR I would get Stevie every time.The Seahawks really pushed Bennett around last week. I am forced to start Ebron in a few leagues, but I am not confident. 

Dunbar could be looking at a role reduction this week with Michael being added into the mix and CJA has a much larger role.

However, this is full PPR and your FLEX slot and FLEX is where you want to take some calculated risks. I think I would go with Dunbar as I expect them to keep passing to the backs - read this:

http://www.dallasnews.com/sports/dallas-cowboys/20151002-cowboys-vp-brandon-weeden-needs-to-step-up-missed-opportunities-in-atlanta-game.ece

That means he's got a tendency to check down to the backs when he's in trouble. I kind of like that for Dunbar. I think Matthews might be a better start at Flex even if Foster is in because he's going to get the bulk of the targets and has a pretty high ceiling if that happens while Foster could see limited work and be eased back into the starting role.

If you ask this again next week, I might give you a different answer.

I have both Denver and Carolina D in different leagues and the ones I have Denver I am considering dropping them for Carolina. The Panthers seem more likely to get some sacks and turnovers. If the Vikings are smart, they will run AD...all day.One good thing about the Packers is that they are showing persistence: when they are ahead, they keep their foot on the gas. 

CJ0.5k has a tough matchup. Normally in a lopsided contest where the Packers wouldn't need to pile up the points you could expect them to run more, but Rodgers will take end zone shots on 3rd down and Jones is very good at those. 

We've yet to encounter a scenario where Jones isn't a must-start in 2015.ARZ have been pretty dangerous as of late. Stick with them. Too much upside.As long as Reed stays healthy, roll with him. Bennett is due for a big game and OAK has been abysmal against the TE.

The only reason I'd flip to Bennett for you would be that you're projected to lose big or are already down big. He does have upside and could be the only weapon to bring them back from being down.A lot of my opponents are starting Cameron this week. Last I saw he was going to be active, but that doesn't mean he won't be limited in some fashion.

I think I'd go with Clay simply because I'm more confident he plays a majority of the snaps and/or finishes the game. My opponents with Cameron? I'm hoping he goes out often or gets pulled.I don't like it. The Bears are in a lot of trouble and the Cardinals are rolling. Larry's new "slot-like" role is great. Teams can't figure out how to defense him. 

Randle is a guy whose role they cannot stop trying to give to other people. Bell could get the job back if anyone gets hurt. 

I'd rather be on the Fitzgerald/Bell side of that deal.Even if you had more depth at RB, I would pass.

Lacy should have points in the QB range. He's just more valuable due to position.I think so. 

While Ellington will get the job when he comes back, he's well-known to be on a pitch count and with the Johnsons showing effectiveness, that only reinforces it. 

Decker is a solid play every week and I think he could challenge Bryant for a slot on your starting lineup while the same isn't True for Ellington with your RB situation.

If you did one of those "projected points +/- for the season" things, I think you'd be higher with Decker.All depends on record. If you're 2-1 or 3-0, do it. If not, you need to win now.

Gordon ought to increase his role as time goes on and so will Bryant. Those are "win later" players. If you need to win now? Stand pat. You need Blount.Even when Jackson is healthy I don't like him. Last year he got dropped and wasn't picked up again in a lot of leagues. 

If you must drop someone, drop DeA. If I took Jackson for DeA, I would try to flip him.The Cowboys want Weeden to throw downfield more this week so Williams might bounce back. Then again, he's a terrible WR and that limits him. 

Williams has value this week because the Saints can't stop anyone. Dallas wins often in NO and it might be close and keep both teams throwing. Montgomery could see little usage if the game gets out of hand early. 

Williams...I learned critical thinking in Catholic school. This was even more important:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Catholic_social_teaching

I don't think it gets more liberal than that. I went to a Franciscan school and learned that as well as very liberal politics.What if I win the Powerball?&gt;"He's crushed. He's devastated. He regrets the action he took that night," said Capt. Mark Perry with the Georgia State Patrol.

No, that would be the victims.

Poor choice of words, Mark.That's the kind of mouth where you just leave a can of Friskies on the floor and she opens it and feeds herself!Imported from Holland.The moment a weaboo can show me their brain is genetically Japanese is the moment I stop cringing at them and embracing them.This one never gets old:

http://i.imgur.com/mJrgTZ1.pngNothing against Ryan, but KC is terrible against the pass in ways that are as close to a lock as you're gonna get.

I would even go so far as to say you should spot start Marvin Jones just to double up on points, sort of like splitting a pair of 10's in blackjack. Best bet you can make.There is no reason to bench Palmer. He may have 2-4 bad games this year, but trying to guess which ones those are is like 12.5%-25.0% odds. That's bad gambling.Neither are very attractive. Dalton/Carr/Taylor aren't on waivers?

Stafford is all about turnovers and so are Seattle right now. They are hungry and angry. 

Tannehill is probably my choice because even though it may be a London shitfest, he does have options for throwing the ball. He will get completions on Cromartie at least.Oh easily Dalton. If they were putting out bets on him, you'd have to spend $100 to make $10 this week. 

The Chiefs cannot defense the pass and they have bad players as DBs, plus injuries in that corps. Dalton throws and has weapons.

It would like hitting 00 on the roulette wheel for him to fail.Normally I never want to start Cam because he's so up and down, but he's on a solid roll. Follow the trend.

Tyrod is alright and he's performed well, but he's looked bad and gotten points/wins in spite of his failures.

If you want to say "two similar unknowns", the tiebreaker for me is that Cam looks to have taken the next step and Taylor still looks inexperienced.Just stick with Ryan. Brees might end up getting hit and out. 

I have the same shoulder injury that he does and when I throw a ball I have a hard time keeping it down. I know this very well - he could absolutely sail one over the middle into Barry Church's waiting arms...

It's easy because you know that Ryan is 99% gonna finish the game. What percentage would you give Brees? Not 99%. Interesting.

I'm gonna say Carr because of your scoring rules. The Bears are not good against the pass. In fact, they are arguably the worst team out there. 

Role is important - you want guys who will get snaps.

CJA will probably get 60% of them minimum, AF 50% minimum and Ameer and Matt are a mystery.

That said, if AF has any bad news before gametime I would be more comfortable with Matt Jones as a high upside longshot. This week I am "hold" on Abdullah. I want to watch and see who has what role. Even though I am heavily, heavily invested in him...30 leagues? I dunno...a lot. Anyway, my objective eye tells me Riddick ought to minimally get more snaps if not take over the primary RB role there.

Sucks to be me...sucks to be you, sucks worse to be me, but I don't think you can use him except as an even bigger longshot than Jones.I just think Stewart is on his way out. Maybe he bounces back in a big way this week vs the Bucs, but I saw enough of Rawls last week to like his potential.

Karlos is inarguable - he should be spot started over studs this week - guys you drafted in the first 5 rounds. His matchup is that favourable. He figures to be an incredibly important part of the gameplan this week.I'm hold on Woodhead and wait-and-see on Spiller, so CJA would be it.

I'm very curious as to how the Chargers approach the Browns. They have a lot of people banged up and it showed last week in how Rivers was being pressured. You know, I had the volume of that game off and didn't follow up, but I think the real reason they wanted to pull Rivers was that they were afraid he'd get hurt.

Woodhead could end up blocking or being a blocking decoy and catching passes, so that's very high risk. 

Spiller...we just don't even know.

Play it safe. You blew an 8th overall pick or whatever on CJA for a reason.CJ0.5k has already been guaranteed a large workload, so you're golden there. 

Your RB2 is going to be a risk no matter what - I would gamble on Matt Jones because of his upside. Martin isn't making a case for why he should never be taken out and McFadden's committee got even more crowded with Michael getting put into the mix.Hold on Gurley. I started him "just because" in a league last week. I don't think they're serious about his workload, even now. Look at how they dicked Brian Quick around. I don't trust STL at the moment. 

If we knew he'd be a feature back, he's easily your #1.

I think you need to gamble big with your RB0 strategy and take both of the pass catchers - Woodhead and Dunbar and pray the games unfold in a manner that benefits both of them.

One reason I don't like Martin is that I think Carolina is going to take them out of the run game early and force them to pass and he doesn't seem to be the guy to make the most of that, at least not compared to Woodhead and Dunbar.I benched the WAS RBs and if I had to, I would start Jones in a pinch, but you don't need that. We need to better understand their RB situation and I'm afraid they don't even know it themselves.

Karlos is the #1 this week. He figures to get a lot of work in running and passing situations. I would go with CJ0.5k as RB2 over CJA because I like his potential workload more.Frank Gore is a very good bet this week. With Luck ailing, they are going to need to run the ball and Jacksonville is stronger vs the pass than the run. His strengths play to their weaknesses. 

It comes down to Karlos vs Arian and we know with almost total certainty that if the Bills run 60 plays, Williams should be in for 50 of them. If Houston had Foster do 30 plays I think that would be huge. 

Karlos is my 2nd choice.Set it and forget it. Don't even look back.

I'd get Freeman in there and see if they can keep opening up those huge holes for him for the second week in a row. I want to see Ivory play a full game rather than make any uneducated guesses about him.Jones and Crabtree are both going to be lining up on weak side CBs who are really, really bad. I really like the odds on both of them.

Hurns is as well, although that whole game is a mystery as we don't know if Luck is playing and it will affect both teams.

I wouldn't drop Dalton. I would double him up on Marvin Jones for compound scoring.I really don't like Forsett or Gore this year so far...although I do think they have some decent matchups coming up. Problem is, you're so deep that playing matchups seems dumb when you could just ride your best players over time. 

If I absolutely had to drop someone it would be Eifert. 

I would have been more enthusiastic about Forsett if they had used more zone and less man blocking, but...I don't get what they're trying to do there.&gt; I am really weak at WR.

You are?

None of those WRs on waivers really interest me and/or are worth dropping or starting over what you have if you do it carefully.

Boldin is dependent upon the 49ers putting it together and I cannot say for sure that Aiken is guy #1 there. 

There's a cornucopia of WRs on your wire for a reason...In a bubble, I guess...the rest of your team putting it in context would help, although I will say this about Gates: last year he was spotty and ended up waived in a significant number of leagues.

The only thing I can say is that Hillman is owned in less than 50% of leagues and Gates is already owned in well over 50%.

From a "value" perspective it would be alright. Adams' arrow is pointing down at the moment. There's enough scoring to go around in GB where it's possible to have their QB, RB and WR - but it should be a WR that is higher on the QB's progression.

That's not Adams.

The philosophy is unsound in some situations, sound in others. This is the former rather than the latter.When I did my leagues, my goal was the Coleman/Freeman duo and I would take Freeman before Coleman. As August dragged on, I picked up waiver guys by sacrificing Coleman rather than Freeman.

Despite Coleman's strong start, I still think it's going to end up being Freeman despite his diminutive stature because he's more experienced and skilled in pass pro and that's the most important thing to the Falcons right now.

Morris is worth rostering, but not at the cost of anyone other than Spiller. I understand why you want Spiller in PPR, but he's not been getting on the field and Ingram has taken a surprising step in his pass play repertoire to the point where I think he's on the verge of being an every down back. 

Sometimes the best move is to stand pat.Think of it like gambling. Carr is like hitting on 16.

It's just a bet you need to take. You bust, you bust.All other things aside...Brees losing vs Dallas, the Cowboys not having Romo, blah blah - all that jazz, the one overriding question is his shoulder and if he will be able to throw or not.

Scenario 1: He throws, but they are awful throws because his shoulder is toast

Scenario 2: They run the ball because he can't throw

Scenario 3: He is fine and does fine

2 out 3 scenarios are bad.

Tannehill:

Scenario 1: Is a London shitfest

Scenario 2: Is not a London shitfest

50-50 is better than 33-66. Either way you're making tough bets, so I'd go with Tannehill. 

Look, if Brees is Breesus, don't be mad. Just know he's healthy to go back in *next* time.Buffalo's defense isn't all that rough; last week was the first time they looked more like a Rex Ryan defense as opposed to a "missing Jim Schwartz" defense. 

I like Buffalo to run the ball and control the clock and I like Manning to throw to keep them in it.

Brees...I just don't like. Not coming off of an injury.This is one of the tougher ones.

It's not an issue of "this guy vs that guy" as much as how you salvage your week. No matter what you're in trouble. Once you accept that, you need to think about making the best of a bad situation. When it's a lose-lose, turn it into a lose-*least*. 

Psychologically you look at in a greedy way. "How can I get the most points at the top end?" But when you're faced with a lose-lose, you have to switch it around which is "How do I lose the least?"

If Luck could get you 24 and Rivers maybe 18? That's greedy thinking. But if Luck could get you 0 because he can't continue and Rivers ekes out 8 points, you have to be happy with 8.

Think of it like this: random person with power over whether you live or die gives you three hands of blackjack. He's showing a face card. Each of you can hit once.

Hand 1: 13

Hand 2: 18

Hand 3: 16

Which hand do you hit?

By your logic of wanting Luck, you're trying to hit on 18. It should be between "do I risk busting by hitting on 16 because I think he has 20" vs "do I risk not beating his 20 by hitting on 13?"

Maybe the next card is a 4. The exception does not make the rule.Oh god...you poor people. Some of these questions I'm seeing make me sad for the world.

Hey, look. Don't beat yourself up on this. There's no good answer.

If it were me in your position and my value system, I would take the injured Brees over the ineffective Kaepernick. Just as a rule of thumb I try to stay away from imploding situations. Sometimes it works, sometimes it doesn't, but over time as a philosophy I think it works out better than risking injured guys hurts me.So you're hoping they can play some QB?

The way you're looking at it is "who has the big week" and if that's your criteria, Dunbar and Sproles are the way to go. Not just for PPR, but for the hope they get heavily involved in the passing game.

Straight up I would start CJA and Crowell as they should both easily get 15 rushes and a couple of passes. I'd rather just "take the points" on the lower ceiling than go "all or nothing" with 3rd down/situational RBs. 

That said, you sound like you're a gambler. It's either your nature or necessity; I dunno. And if that's how you roll, roll the dice on Dunbar and Sproles. If you want to take it easy, CJA and Crowell.Since you're 0-3, you have little to lose.

I like doubling up Marvin with Dalton this week. Sometimes a parlay bet makes sense and this is one of them. 

I call it "compounding" and when you get a chance to do it at a high probability it's a strategy that will give you a big advantage. 

What have you got to lose anyway? Fitzpatrick has a wrinkle; they can pass on MIA, but this game could be ugly in a bad way while JAX/IND could be ugly in a good one.

In a perfect and just world, the Colts are going to run Gore 25 times and he will be very effective vs JAX. They will have to respond by throwing and with IND having nobody on D it will work very well.

That's the most likely outcome, but that's why they play the games. Man...there really is not good answer there.

It was asked earlier and my advice is the same: The Fuchness monster and Aghowaliao are known commodities: nothing and very little to indicate hope.

Quick, being a complete unknown quality might surprise. We don't know his ceiling, only his absolute zero floor like your other two guys. We know their ceiling and it's very, very low.The weather shouldn't affect Matthews too much because he runs so many short routes. 

That Dallas game isn't all that great for anyone. Matthews is still a solid play, even when the situation is bad. He's pretty much a guy you want to leave in there.One?

Easy.

James Jones. 

We have yet to see a reason as to why he would be taken out. While Lockett is explosive and I expect him to have plenty of chances to return the ball, Moncrief ought to get a lot of checkdown action. 

I don't like Cooks this week. Even if Hasselbeck has to play, he will find Moncrief. They've at least worked together in the past.Ginn is a terrible football player. Landry is not.

Don't hitch your future to bad players. Nothing against Amari Cooper, but James Jones shouldn't be a situational play anymore. He needs to be left in your starting lineup until proven otherwise.I prefer to leave Calvin out. I've benched him...tough to do, but I really think Seattle is going to take it to them. 

I don't think Jones should be benched and Cooper stands a really good chance vs a weak Bears defense.Last week I said to start Jones over Cobb because the Chiefs weak side CBs were bad and Jones plays on the weak side.

What they did was move Cobb over to the weak side and threw to him there.

That stuff does happen.

Revis is great. Skrine is great. Cromartie is hurting. He plays the weak side. Where Matthews plays.

I think Matthews is a good play if they don't do like the Packers and move their #1 over there. 

Regardless, I would start Jordan #1. I don't think he can be taken out. Too much volume. I would also start Maclin over the Dolphins duo.Oh man...there's no Marvin Jones on waivers?

Andre can't get open. He's awful. Colston doesn't even play on but about half of the snaps.

Andre? Because he might get more snaps?If you need a big game, I would say Sproles followed by Johnson.

Spiller's role is still unclear and Benjamin isn't a volume guy. 

Sproles might get you a ST TD unlike Stevie, although I could actually see Stevie getting the most PPRs.

Go big. Go Sproles.Marvin Jones all the way. What teams have done to that left side of KC's defense ought to have a grand jury convened in Wyandotte county to press charges against visiting WRs for assault and larceny.None of those three are benchable. 

DT?

Jones and Hopkins are tied for points and given that Jones has had 0 bad games and DT/Hopkins 1 out of 3 bad games, Hopkins has more points.Man you are hosed. VJax and Matthews are the two I'd have in for sure and between Ginn and Montgomery...I guess Montgomery. Ginn is just awful. The Colts and Dolphins could both afford him right now. The Dolphins could even send Lamar back. The Colts desperately need a pass-blocking/receiving RB that is effective. 

The Bengals and Broncos could also afford him. I think the Bears would like Gio or Hill salary-wise.I just messaged the mods...Fuck it, this'll do for nowRather than test him deep, they wanted Revis to push with his legsAnd they're running right at Skrine and Revis...They tried to fool them by running strong with a weak bunch...Jets knew. Play before they wanted a weak side rollout...Jets knew.You're right, Dan. There's no way it'll pick up a 1st down. But each of those plays have been designed to physically push the DBs who are injured like Revis and Cromartie.There we go. Thanks.I wonder if Ivory is gonna be effective now. He looked a bit banged up after the last series."Child-sized Grimes"It helps to tackle the receiver before he gets the ball.Grimes was already holding Marshall before Fitzpatrick even rolled out or threw!Why make that throw on 3rd down?

End zone or nothing.

This guy went to Harvard?Good: They have to use him

Bad: The Jags know exactly who they have to stop

With an injured Luck I was high on him this week. With no Luck? ^^^ha ^^^^ha

Not that optimistic. I guess the good thing is that the Jags are weaker vs the run than the pass and the Colts don't have to play to that strength, but the weakness.I was wrestling with the same thing last night, but not Colts for Jags.

Colts are an extremely dangerous play, even if Luck were healthy. Their defense are awful and Jacksonville aren't an "automatic play against" anymore.Frank's whole career he had the 49ers O-line, not the Colts "worst line in the NFL"

Also the 49ers got rid of him because due to his age he wasn't as good anymore.I'll comment here, but I'm waiting for the REAL next Game ThreadThis is very simple to remember:

No matter what, if a guy is in there, you own him unless you remove him 5 minutes before kickoff time.He works regularly with the backups...or did...so that would have been Moncrief. This is exactly why you negate "start your studs", dude!

When a situation is that uncertain or unknown?

Start your studs is when you have some idiot wanting to start some scrub because they have a nice matchup instead of your first round pick.I would have played Jones regardless.

In fact, in the 1 or 2 leagues where I have Hilton I'm fairly certain James Jones has been in there since Week 2.I already grabbed him this week in a league with the hopes they could get him into range a few times, but the risk is there: if the Jags open it up on that garbage defense, 3 points won't be enough.I did the same thing last night.One thing to remember about the Gore vs WRs argument.

1st series: Jags stack the box and stop Gore

2nd: Jags exploit a bad Colts D. Jags 7-0

3rd: Colts stick with the run and Jags sell out to stop it. 3 and out

4th: Jags start with good field position, kick a FG. Jags 10-0

5th: Colts try to run, but exploit the pass and it isn't there. Punt

6th: Jags get another FG and Colts start to panic. Jags 13-0

7th: Colts are falling behind and start to pass and it collapses like dominoes

This isn't unrealistic - they abandoned the run game/Gore last week in the 2nd half.

Why?

Because they got down early.

So yeah, this can happen.

I would just stay away from the Colts if you can. I liked Gore way more with a thread of Luck throwing the ball.The Colts are one of the worst IRL *and* fantasy defenses in 2015 and the Jags can at least move the ball.

People don't dream of starting their 21st-ranked defense vs the 22nd-ranked offense (or whatever their actual IRL rankings are) because it's a total crapshoot.

You're not doing good vs bad. You're doing bad vs bad, which is a complete risk.Look, the answer is always the same: commish needs to restore all teams to their original state. 

This is a rule that needs to be in your official charter.

Whenever this shit happens, you restore from backup, deleting all current data.One hour down, 13 hours of football to go...Ever since that non-PI in the end zone, both teams have thought they could get away with lots of contact on the WR but the officials are adjusting.The British fans especially appreciate that Cameron flop at the end to sell the penaltyRight there is a classic example of a contingency.

When things go bad, his job was to throw to the corner of the end zone. Simple as that.Should have been holding on the Cameron one, I agree.That Ryan Tannehill fellow: he's alrightThat Stoneburner guy looks like an extra from BraveheartIvory: 76

Miami: 66

Refs: 102All day to throw. You gotta come up with that!We want to look tough in front of our former colonial masters.I love the name "Douzable"

It sounds like someone from Gundam WingChewing cud. Explains his lackadaisical approach.&gt;in metric.*

(*Imperial Gallons)I think it's short because he doesn't have control until he's moving well back of the marker.Uhh...okThis game is driving me up the fucking wall.

The Chiefs are easy to throw on?

Naah, let's just skip that. Never mind Dalton is 14/17 and just burned the Chiefs deep twice (except for a drop), let's keep not attacking that weakness.

Do you want to lose, Cincy? Because this is how you lose.

Finally there's the big play downfield. Why not all day?

~~Parker Lewis Can't Lose~~ Andy Dalton can't miss. He's thrown the ball 17 fucking times? That's it?!?

The Bengals should be winning 35-12.I think it's worth going because it will expand your conceptualisation of the play. Meaning, what you see on TV isn't the whole picture and when you see things in person the pacing is different, as is the peripheral view of the play.

Afterward you can't help but watch games differently because you understand the things you don't see on-screen, such as substitutions and the way the DBs play.See, that's what I thought, but this guy says they're in the box and the ones that get cancelled/not picked up will have a code in them, but the others do not.

Sounds dumb.No, I didn't preorder yet. I have PS4 and X1 and didn't want to decide until the last possible moment. Should I go X1 (which shows sold out) I don't wanna get screwed. 

I'm gonna hope it's as you say because that's how it should be.The guy at the store told me "no", I guess it's two trips.That was a fairly straight kickLacy was all set to power in and didn't expect a wide open lane and sort of decided to hit someone anyway rather than take daylight.This Supergirl thing is so dopey

"Why, because she's just a girl?"

Nice swirling winds?I know y'all are watching this game and thinking "man, so many of these plays are so close, this sucks" but I assure you that so far that Packers/49ers game is even worse.Who else feels another McManus FG coming up?Oh for fuck's sakeayy lmaoHillman got punchedThis Crowell kid is alright. I think Audie Cole was the only person there who didn't know what their assignment was.The thing about Kuhn is that we can all always tell when he's gonna score, but the defense never seems to know that."Top 25% Race Finisher"Damn, even the offense was letting the Packers score all over them.I don't like the name Delvin. 

Devin? Elvin? Devil?

He should change his first name to Coolstory.&gt; Who paid for registration?

My prediction: her stalkersIf that's the criteria, why isn't Ragen being crucified?All of the gun-toting conservatives in Medford could finally cull themReally? 

Responsible?

If you have any duty at all it would be to return what's left of the apple to it's general environment. Why should we add apples to our landfills when the earth will reclaim them right then and there?No, because AFAIK there is no law in any US state that defines food as litter, nor is the definition of litter one that would normally include food. Alright, Weeden timeThis is a whole 'nuther CMV:

"I think that non-native species are universally bad and can think of no example where plants or animals brought from a different bioregion to another have been in any way beneficial."FUCK DUDE JOSH NORMAN GOT A FLAG FOR THE SAME EXACT SHIT TODAY PAY ATTENTIONNot for $10k. Those things are the kings of secondary market value.2012-2014 Mitsubishi Lancer with less than 40,000 miles on it.

Still plenty of new and has lots of warranty left on it.

For a first car you want to limit your budget for repairs. Mercedes are incredibly expensive to repair. http://www.k5optimastore.com/products/unaviI paid $0.99 for Steel Diver.

I waste way more than that all the time, but every time I see that game it bothers me that I paid anything for it.YOU INC BREAUX?I'm not just amazed Williams caught that, I'm amazed he caught anything.Y'all gotta admit, that was the prettiest throw ever.Won 4/5

#1 127-86-7, 2nd place, 6-4 championship win

#2 122-82-16, 2nd place, 9-1 championship win

#3 131-79-10, 1st place, 8-2 championship win

I don't know my final scores of my roto leagues, but it should be 1st place with 104-106 and 3rd/4th place with 75-78

I'd rather talk about my 4th place team. I never recovered ERA/WHIP from bad pitching in April. I think my ERA was like 8.11 or something to finish the month. I got it down to 3.83 at the end.FUCK NO FUCK ME FUCK THIS NO NO NO NO

THIS IS NOW 14 HOURS OF FUCKING FOOTBALL. ENOUGH. I HAVE WATCHED THIRTEEN GAMES TODAY. NO MORE!Yup. He got downgraded for average.Yeah I think Beltre was among the worst 2 weeks ago, so if you survived his bed crapping he won it for you.We used to do a 20-team league. I loved that league. 

Biggest drama we had was me winning in pitching and I picked up all of the streamers 2 days before Sunday and dropped them so my opponent couldn't beat me.Of all the people to do it...Spiller? Wow.Yup. You gotta understand statistics and trends. There's so much data and information out there that you don't even need to watch the games.

180 degree opposite of fantasy football.My daughter had one...first car...ended up fucking up the transmission, but it was the tranny. It had a taller gear ratio. That was all.

http://www.cars101.com/subaru/forester/forester2004.html

http://www.cars101.com/subaru/forester/forester2005.html

&gt;manual: 1st 3.454, 2nd 1.947, 3rd 1.366. 4th 0.972, 5th 0.738, reverse 2.272. Final 4.444

Then you'll see with 2006 it changed:

http://www.cars101.com/subaru/forester/forester2006.html

As a complete side note, if you want the manual, get a 2004 or 2005. But if you prefer the automatic (I like the AWD system on the automatic better) then get a 2006. It still has the same final drive, but the '06 looks better and is at least not as old.

The hp numbers were always a lie. The 2004-2005 didn't have 210hp. It's just that at the time the STi was sold with a 2.0 engine and people would have been pissed if the family wagon was beating it's ass due to a larger displacement.So do I. The new Forester is just a completely different vehicle than this.

The platform is solid. If they just updated it, I'd buy a new one. Man, I am Q&amp;A guy tonight.

Around the time this ad came out, someone on a 350Z forum was trolling the shit out of them because they all thought the 350Z was as fast as it looked. It's a bit of a dog. Someone went there with a Forester story about how he beat his buddy's 350Z and it went viral. 

That ad was timed to respond to that as Subaru have always been pretty nimble.Yup. My daughter paid $10k for hers, had 100k on the clock.We had both an 04 FXT and a 2005 9-2x (Linear) and I truly think that Saab is the best deal going right now. You can /r/battlewagon that thing if you really want to. If a deer hadn't suicided itself on ours, we were going to put FXT shocks on it for a slight lift.

Speaking of deer...we live in a really rural area, lots of unpaved roads. There's nothing these vehicles can't do. The driveline isn't the issue, it's ground clearance.

I went all up and down the back roads and mountains of rural San Diego county in the FXT and it did whatever I asked of it. I used to have a Jeep Liberty 4X4 and an Isuzu Vehicross and overall the Subaru wins because the AWD system works at speed. The other two were only better at crawling. 

That said, there's a "secret trick" that most Subaru owners don't know about, which is if you need to crawl and set it into 1st gear in the automatic, it'll lock at 50/50 which ought to get you out of whatever trouble you're in.

Anyway, back to the Aero. You could pay a lot more for a WRX or STi, but why? It's the same basic car. And while I love the FXT, I don't think it's worth it to buy a 2004 FXT for $10k when you can find yourself a 2005 Aero for $6k. The FXT isn't 40% better because it costs 40% more. Glad to know I'm not the only person with a spare Subaru and DD's a Civic as well LOLYou've got it bass-ackwards there.

The FXT seats are the ones to own. People swap them into their Imprezas, not the other way around.For all of the astute observations that could be made about how he plays, I just want to say how pissed I am that he's gonna save Fisher's job.Well I watched the game on my main TV with the volume off and then relegated it to a smaller one at halftime when it got out of hand, so I may be confused at the "blur of usage", but it seems to me that when Nate Washington went out and Shorts started being inconsistent that Hopkins' usage really went through the roof.I can tell you why he succeeded. It was plain as day.

The Texans decided to take Jones away and shifted their defense to the right side of the field, leaving the left side and running lanes inside vulnerable.

Maybe in the future some team will try to take Freeman away and let Jones beat them.

I started Freeman this week despite Karlos being the better stream on paper because I figured the Texans would assume their base rush would be enough to stop Freeman and they would need to support their terrible DBs with extra help on Jones. 

Which they did.

What I didn't count on was Jones being shut down the entire game. I figured he'd get me some garbage points late, but the Texans died with their boots on (pun intended) and they defended Jones until the bitter end.Yup. Usage correlates to knowledge of the playbook which equates to snaps in practice; he is clearly coming along. 

I expect it to only get better. 

I think the same is True about Barnidge as well.Only one I'd have bet against is Ginn - if he isn't wide open, he sucks. 

The other 3 have legitimate NFL skills. They're a solid play any week.Well, as someone who actually played fantasy back then it was...Roger Craig.

A lot of people forget that he was a FB (as a lot of guys were).

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/players/C/CraiRo00.htm

It wasn't Alstott. 

If you go back to Craig's days a FB, he was consistently a top player relative to his RB peers. Guys didn't generate those kinds of crazy stats. 

By the time Alstott came on the scene, no league I knew of had a FB slot anymore and as an RB, Alstott was...maybe 25-40?

Craig was around 5 or so.I started Jones. It wasn't really anything he did. He was open - a lot, although I will credit the Chiefs for trying to keep a lid on him. He got a lot more respect than Sanu and AJ on the bulk of the plays.

Here's what I said in the Game Thread:

&gt;This game is driving me up the fucking wall.

&gt;The Chiefs are easy to throw on?

&gt;Naah, let's just skip that. Never mind Dalton is 14/17 and just burned the Chiefs deep twice (except for a drop), let's keep not attacking that weakness.

&gt;Do you want to lose, Cincy? Because this is how you lose.

&gt;Finally there's the big play downfield. Why not all day?

&gt;~~Parker Lewis Can't Lose~~ Andy Dalton can't miss. He's thrown the ball 17 fucking times? That's it?!?

&gt;The Bengals should be winning 35-12.

The Bengals were very lucky to win that game. If KC could have converted some of those FGs into TDs, the Bengals would have been whooped.

I was saying there that their gameplan was horrible. At the time I wrote it, the Chiefs were still in the game (beginning of the 3rd) and it was incomprehensible to me. The pass was working. The Chiefs were boned. And they refused to turn up the heat.

You know what Lewis and Dalton haven't won in the playoffs? That's why. They could have annihilated the Chiefs and put up 300+ yards passing before halftime. The Chiefs looked that bad. But Dalton didn't push it and they kept at the run, playing it safe.

It wasn't just Jones that suffered. They all did. The whole day he was the deep threat and if they truly had to pass, they were looking short, like AJ.

If they took some shots to Jones he would have wrecked them. The one shot they did take was when he finally didn't have a safety bracketing him at the top and he fucking dropped it. Got his hands up too late. 

Other than that, it was 100% gameplanning. Despite the score being what it ended up as, the Bengals were lucky to win. They had a graphic in the game where the Bengals were +51 in the first half and -17 in the 2nd half. They could have closed that game out way earlier - passed and then run. Instead they ran and then ran some more. The Chiefs kept having good possessions because they would settle for 3. If the Bengals went up 21-0 early, the Chiefs would have had to abandon Charles and throw low percentage stuff.

They should have used Jones.Don't drop him. Don't.Sanu is just an ok WR, but he's more of a short range or gadget type of guy.

Jones can stretch the field and is great going deep. He's very good at getting behind the CB early. In Latvia they also have app called potatofy to find potato. But when app finds potato, is only secret police and sadness.

EDIT: What, no love for /r/LatvianJokes? Come on, lighten this up with a little levity, people.Of course, especially when it comes to things like taxing us and stadium issues.

This is a problem I have with politics, period: conservatives want to make "doing stuff" against the law and liberals want to make "doing stuff" against the law. Both are some kind of subtraction.

What we need is a "Fans' Bill of Rights", along with many other areas in life. 

Something along the lines of...say...if you accept tax dollars from the community for your god damned stadium, we get a stake in team owernship unless you fucking pay us back.

It's amazing to me that we give away our rights and interests just so that teams can get a free ride.

You can take that logic and expand it to anything like privacy rights, consumer protection, you name it. NFL Network shows them. You can go to nfl.com or use the NFL app on XBOX One. Not to go all /r/conspiratard on the whole gang here, but the 49ers are punishing him for holding out combined with their general meltdown and Kaepernick's specific meltdown.

http://espn.go.com/nfl/story/_/id/11252945/vernon-davis-ends-holdout-reports-san-francisco-49ers-training-camp

What, did he suddenly suck? No. He was always the same TE with the proclivity to break your heart from time to time. They just stopped using him going deep. They stopped using him after the holdout.

His career catch to target conversion is .614

Since ending his holdout it's .523

It's interesting because Kaepernick's completion percentage has stayed roughly the same.

Either he's not trying or they're not trying. Given that his usage has fallen off a cliff, logic says the 49ers are the ones not trying. Not only are his conversions of targets to catches down, but his targets are just way down. Perhaps it's a vicious circle - his targets are down because he's unreliable? 

You could say Boldin took his opps, but they coexisted in 2013, so it can't be competing with Boldin for targets.

You can't say it's attempts - Kaepernick's attempts have gone *up* every year. In fact, not only has Davis had less targets, he's seen a *smaller percentage* of them.

The 49ers are nowadays widely believed to be a pretty screwy bunch and I think that if you look at all of the evidence, the stats clearly come into focus under the lens of him being punished. Check yourself:

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/players/D/DaviVe00.htm

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/players/K/KaepCo00.htmWell they made a lot of 3-point punts.Scuttlebutt says it's a common problem, which is that he's one of those guys who wants more control than teams are prepared to give.

He probably hasn't earned that.

It's really an impasse: he would need a lot to leave his job in the media, but no one is going to offer him enough to do it, so he isn't interested in lesser jobs.How could you not?

In one of the games yesterday they showed an infographic about the refs being on a record penalty pace and the colour guy said that like 22% of all refs were new due to guys being fired and/or leaving.

The strike in baseball changed the league forever...for the worse. Hockey has never been the same or as good since their labour strife.

I think the same is True about officiating. 

I don't know what it is about interrupting continuity, but it's a serious problem in not just sports, but every facet of life. 

Just as you can't expect a winner if your team rebuilds 20% of it's roster in a year, I don't think you can expect great officiating if you do the same.Tom Brady = tallYeah he was awkward even in college, but now he's more like a George Clooney.Carr always looks like he's about to steal a car and then he opens his mouth and you realise he's 110% about The Lord.&gt; Jury Noneification was used in the Deep South for decades to shield lynch mobs from justice. It's not someting that should be celebrated or practiced.

That's such a terrible example or justification. I was gonna upvote you for making a valid point (that I disagreed with), but this is completely disingenuous.

Juries in the south during the time period you're referencing were notorious for being filled with "good ol' boys", not an impartial jury of your peers. You just completely undid your entire point. In fact, if you want to talk about Noneification, your example proves where it's misused because of flaws leading up to it.

Jury Noneification is fine when people have no ulterior motives. You yourself said:

&gt;Juries provide an arbiter that has no personal stake in the outcome of a case, so that the case can be decided without fear or favor.

When jury selection and the courts back then were biased as hell.I'm about 80% on board with that analogy because it's mostly enabling.

People who enable addicts are themselves terrible, terrible people.

But Julianne is one of, if not the main reason/evidence why I deem Ragen to be a narcissist.

I just...detest feeders. Man, have you ever seen comments on YouTube videos from them? They are creepy. Far creepier than most people imagine. Icky.

Anyone who enables to keep someone else in their addiction is a special kind of narcissist. That is a level of control that takes the worst part of the narcissism dynamic (enablers and narcissists) and manages to combine them both into a perfect storm of ruining someone. 

It's not a fear that the addict will leave because the level of control over them is indisputable. She is not independent. When you have significant handicaps and the challenges they bring, you are dependent. 

If crave power, it's got to be great to have someone that utterly dependent upon you. 

EDIT: there's an episode of ST:TNG where one planet is giving "medicine" to another and enriching themselves. The "medicine" is a drug and the "illness" it treats is withdrawal. I always thought that episode was a great example of an addict and an enabler and how the power dynamic is so completely tilted as to be evil. If you watch that episode and think of addicts and enablers you know about, it shows how completely immoral it really is. I don't know of many things in life that are always immoral, but controlling addicts through their addiction has to be about one of the most universal ones there is.I'm surprised he had time during his nonconsecutive days off to make that sign.I'm an American, I live in Quebec.

When I'm in NY/VT/MA/NH or whatever, if I'm talking to people and it comes up, it goes one of two ways:

* I wished I live in Quebec/Canada

-or-

* Why would you want to live in Quebec/Canada if you're an American?

The former are, almost universally liberals and the latter are almost universally conservatives.

My basic speech goes like this:

"I'm a lifelong registered libertarian. They are very socialist in Canada, particularly Quebec. But reality trumps philosophy and they are doing better up there because their politics work. They don't spend a third of their tax dollars on the military like we do - they spend it on themselves. People there are happy because you can work 20 hours a week and still afford to live comfortably since you don't have to pay for health insurance and a bunch of other crap."

This one really gets people in VT/NH where housing is expensive:

"People here make $8-$10/hr and pay $800/mo to rent an apartment. Up there it's hard to find a job for less than $12/hr because people won't work for less. Depending on where you live, rent is $300-$700/mo if you need a car or will use public transport. You make more money, you don't pay for health care and it costs less to live. They have a robust middle class and the 'poor' are not poor at all. There's less crime and less social strife. Why do you think they're always down here spending money, but we aren't up there buying anything?"

Liberals get that. Conservatives don't. 

It has nothing to do with conservative or libertarian philosophy, it has to do with what works. Here in Quebec, the idea of working your ass off is offencive. Free time and family are important. Hard work for hard work's sake is ridiculous, but conservative Americans don't realise that. You work hard to get ahead, not get by. They don't understand that simple disconnect: they don't have a choice to work more to get more. They have no choice but to work more to get by.It's all relative.

It's like thinking joyful movement is somehow comparable to the high you get from a thorough workout. 

Moving around for 10 minutes might seem cool, but I guarantee you that if these people could surf for several hours they would know what they're missing out on. 

The same goes for sex. 

They think that "soft whatever" is great, but unless you're into fucking rolls and crevasses, athletic sex is way better. If you don't know the difference and are just glad to be "gettin' some", then I suppose fat sex is fantastic compared to no sex at all. 

It's a sad indictment of life when the choice is "something vs nothing" as opposed to having plenty of "something" choices.Imagine how he pissed.Too bad she can't channel her orthorexia into actual healthy food.

Is there another term for this? False orthorexia? Where you only have to believe you're eating healthy?Mail Champlain? 

Because in French it's backwards - "21 Forever" or "XXI Forever" rather than "Forever 21"

We have some strange laws when it comes to names (and they're only about to get worse) where things need to be Frenchified. So things like "Tim Horton's" has to be "Tim Hortons" due to the apostrophe not being deemed correct. 

"Pour toujours, 21" doesn't make sense. "21 pour toujours" does. 

Thus the logic would be they did that, but keeping the name "Forever" as a proper name rather than just a word. My guess is that they got away with using the word "Forever" because they put it into French grammatical context, but in the future they will be forced to change their name.

If they were then TTG pour toujours, then you'd be right. Because of course here in Quebec. TTG, being tres, tres grand or Extra, extra large. Sometimes you do see EEG.What about 5-hour Energy and their shitty songs and the never-ending triumvirate of Nationwide/Geico/Flogressive insurance?Can we rewind the clock 5 days?

Because I thought that Steve Smith to the Panthers would have been good. If he were mature enough to swallow his pride and man up, he could have finished his career there. It's Cam's locker room now and he could have helped him. Lord knows they need him.

I still think Baltimore are the team who should have done the fire sale first, not Chicago. And when Carolina did take on salary, they took Jared Allen? What? He's not a receiver. They need *receivers*.

Another thing is that I think both teams are really backward as far as personnel goes at RB. Stewart is the exact wrong kind of RB for what the Panthers are doing and Trestman won't give Forsett (or Taliaferro) a blocking scheme that works most of the time. It's infuriating to watch.

If the TNF gave was the only Ravens game you saw, you saw enough: When Forsett got stuffed? Yeah, they were man blocking. When he blew up? They were zone blocking and he was cutback running *like he did last year*.

Why not give him zone runs every play? Beats the fuck outta me! They want to do more man blocking, so get a back like Stewart who is built to run behind that. Simple!

Cam needs a guy who can improvise and help in the pass game. Why not Forsett?

I think if the Ravens dealt Steve Smith and Justin Forsett for Jonathan Stewart and Devin Funchess, both teams would be much happier and better off. Stewart would be the next coming of Jamal Lewis there and it's what the fans like and what suits their defensive philosophy through a complimentary run game.

EDIT: I should add that despite Funchess being a great prospect, the Panthers have a chance to "win now" and should. It's because when you have a near death experience where you could die in an instant, it makes you think about what you're doing.

Source: I've nearly died on several occasionsAh this takes me back to the "who needs ABS days" arguments on bike forums which took me back to "why do cars need ABS" arguments on car forums.

Same people were always the "I'd rather die than wear a helmet" crowd.I loved Demon With A Glass Hand.

To this day I wish they'd do a ST "Adventure of the week" show with different actors guesting and sci-fi writers of note.Which in turn proves the social issues as that's a silly response.These comments are pissing me off.

You don't need to be a fucking psychologist to suggest a person has autism.

What, should parents ignore signs in their kids until they complete a doctorate?

Stupid.

If you think you are sick, you go see a doctor. Man these comments piss me off. Maybe the autistic people are all of the ones who can't see the difference between you suggesting she get checked out and you making a diagnosis.

Way to stigmatise autism, people. Yeah it's so horrible that to even suggest it makes you a fraud. God forbid people get help they might need.Shaka is hard for me to play because he's too belligerent. It's hard. You think "enough is enough" but it never is for him. It's hard to be that relentless. Since when does Ingress use that much? It was always pretty light for "always on"That went from a Wilson TD to a Hauschka FG right thereGlowinski must have Hauschka on his fantasy team and needed a 4 point FGAlright Wilson must need Hauschka to get a 5 point FG for his fantasy teamDamn, he's maybe the 2nd best FG kicker in the NFL right now after Gostkowski. Probably not a coincidence their teams faced off last year in the SB. I'll say it again: Riddick is probably the guy who should be RB1 thereWhy didn't Calvin keep running through the ball there? Lawson was playing hard mode "I gotta touch the goal line before I can turn around and make the play"Oh, just what Detroit needs - less LBsHe floated that one a bit too lightly for my comfortI'll say this for the Lions: they're tightening up when they need toThis whole thing is a conspiracy to get Hauschka 50 yard FGsNoooooo not Fred.

He and Ebron get these minor looking things and are gone and Big Ben gets Gumby'd and he's back in 4 weeks. WTF, human physiology?This is so strange to see Calvin playing the opposite side to keep him away from Sherman and onto Williams.

Can't beat Sherman-WilliamsThat was actually a 20 yard pass that went for 8 because Stafford keeps taking eleventy step drops due to pressureProps to Riddick considering his upfield blocker completely blew his assignment and committed a likely penalty LOLMan what in the HELL is Stafford doing there?I hate that end zone shot. If you threw underneath in front of the 1st down marker, you can get 10 yards. If Calvin or whoever can fight for 4 more for a 1st down, great. Otherwise it's a very makeable 53-yard FG. Now it's a punt. Dumb. I don't like Caldwell.Man Rawls had no idea thereOMFG KamBob Seger is goneThese exchanges are terribleThe problem is that these center/QB exchanges aren't smooth and it's taking Wilson's vision away from the field.Actually I think that's part of the charm of SRS/SRD: they wear their hypocrisy proudly. They know they're a shitposting sub. 

It's like /r/punchablefaces - it's far funnier now since the SRSers took it over. 

I say you have to look at it differently. They're kind of like the Joker. They just like to watch the world burn. I don't think they think/believe they're better, they just want to prove everyone else is as shitty as they are. It's not that they think they're higher than you, it's that they think you think you're higher than they are.

My $0.02I don't think so. 

One thing the Admins have admitted is that moderation tools suck. 

If you make an effort to deal with the deluge of shit that infests subs as a moderator with the crap they've given us, I think you have a fair argument that it's the Admins who have failed.

AFAIC, it's not /u/maybesaydie or anyone else's job to ban FPH-level users/posts. It's the *Admins* job. Moderating subs should be to keep spam away and content on a certain theme, not to deal with users who violate the site TOS.

By asking us as moderators to do that (I don't mod this sub)? It's unfair. I refuse to do it. It's not my job. I'm not a paid admin. I don't have access to those tools. It's not my job to enforce the TOS.

If the kind of people who'd get this sub banned are allowed to post here, I would ask the Admins why they didn't delete the users before going after the subreddit.

This sub's rules match the TOS and no BS is allowed, period. Sitewide rules trump subreddit rules.And TBH, if you see posts like that, downvote them.

The mods shouldn't even have to do it. It's on us. If we as a community agree it's wrong, we should comment on those posts and say so and downvote them.

The mods shouldn't have to babysit us to enforce community standards. If we believe we aren't FPH then it's up to us to not allow that shit here.If anything, the banning cleaned up the stragglers here.Very heads-up by Wright.Dagger"Due to complaints from Draft Kings and FanDuel, we are looking into this matter."Or, as the old Ratherism goes: you're entitled to your own opinions, but you're not entitled to your own facts...*Ragen*If you see a jerk, ie someone breaking the sitewide rules, report them to the ADMINS./r/1200isplenty should be banned for being a self-harm subreddit /sSRD is more rational since the banning, but they are still about the lulz. 

They're self-aware enough to deal with SRD when it leaks into SRD.Yeah that was very informativeI will say it again: Not Earl Thomas, but Kam Chancellor is the best and most important player on that defense.http://www.nfl.com/static/content/public/image/rulebook/pdfs/15_Rule12_Player_Conduct.pdf

Illegal batting courtesy of /u/jeffp12

ATL has seemed to be a bit of a "libertarian", so I think that makes sense. Well, they all sort of are. This is the slippery slope of identity politics: if it's good for the geese it's good for the gander

Like I continually say when these threads show up, -isms are the polar opposite of civil rights and civil liberties. By definition, civil rights specifically **does not** name groups, but human conditions.

Once you start coalescing groups and having group grievances you invite other people in to co-opt your group and it's ideas. If you keep it totally agnostic and just deal with things like equality or discrimination without specific groups, you win. 

That's the huge schism you see in Tumblr: trans men threaten actual women. Crap like that. It's not about raising everyone to the top it's about knocking people with privilege or success down and some group filling the power vacuum. 

I find that a lot of people who say they're feminists are actually civil rights activists, but they are beholden to the identity. It's no different than when they survey conservative Republicans and tell them Bernie Sanders' platform and they agree with it, but then they claim they hate socialists and Democrats.

Labels are stupid. They hold us back. And as long as feminism exists for fat acceptance to latch onto, fat acceptance will do so. 

There's no "civil rights" question when it comes to fat acceptance. If someone specifically discriminates against you for any reason other than your qualifications or merits, you ought to be able to have *legal* justice. Not *social* justice, **legal** justice. 

When you give rights to one group you take them away from another. When you stop seeing groups, no one has their rights or privileges redistributed.

Once once we stop with identity politics can we fight conditions like access to health care, voting rights, poverty, fair education, etc for all people.I was at BB and Walmart today and it was the same price both places, but of course BB has GCUIt was a prediction. Ok hen, so can we also stop saying that Frank Gore "looks awesome (except for those plays called back because of offensive holding opening lanes for him)"???Gore *has* been the problem because

* He isn't effective running the ball

* His failure at pass protection is to blame for Luck's turnovers in injury

* He's fumbling the ball

etc, etcHe's had 3, 4, 21 and 6 points.

Remove the name.

"Should I start RB that has 3, 4, 21 and 6 points?"

Yeah that's felony fraud...you should delete this.

http://criminal.findlaw.com/criminal-charges/fraud.htmlIt always freaks me the fuck out when Jalen says "reddit" on the radio...like, did he just say that?

And then on The Blacklist they said it twice.

Crazy.This is why they come on reddit, folks.I identify as a black...attack helicopterYou could do worse...It's no Cabbie, but it'll do.

You can tell he thought about his answer: the lone wolfWe should ask that question to the All-Stars next yearSoooo...not Hyperspin then.&gt; then I drove a Tesla

You have our official Subaru permission to let it go.But the bar is far away from the machines, so it's likely in compliance with the regulation.

Seriously that place is huge.I find it interesting how they used intimidation tactics to protest the injustice of a culture of intimidation. That they tried to suppress a voice because they feel their voices are suppressed.I already dropped him even before tonight. 

Detroit's problems don't have much to do with him.

Last year, Calvin was facing double and triple-teaming, leaving Tate wide open or on very limited coverage.

Teams are putting a single man on Calvin. He hasn't been bad, but he's not good enough to open things up and spread the wealth around.

I would drop Tate in most situations and also consider trading Calvin if possible. http://imgur.com/gallery/YNwqlUBAh yes, the old "why isn't x player doing well with his new y team" mystery.

He may need time to get acclimated. He may have chemistry problems with Wilson. Maybe both. 

All we can see is that he's not really improvising and he isn't finding ways to get open. Since we know he has been capable of them in the past, all that can be said is that it will take time.They're .BATingNo shit

/dead USB portDude, Joique Bell was droppable in August when Abdullah was tearing shit up. Riddick should be #1 there and he's not. The only reason you'd keep him is because the Lions are so dysfunctional that they refuse to use their best guy, which means Bell has a shot.Injured safeties, no coverage at the LB position.

I have watched their games and guys are basically running free.

It's the NFL. You gotta pick something to stop/beat you and the Raiders aren't picking TE as what they try and shut down. 

Aside from that, if you are willing to run across the field to catch a pass, you can have success vs the Raiders. There was one play Royal had where no one could touch him that was just emblematic of that. &gt;Two guys id pick up now are Tevin Coleman (he will be the lead back by the end of the season, there's a reason he was starting before his injury and there's no way Freeman keeps this hot streak up) 

I respectfully say "BULL SHIT" to thee.

You know what the reason was?

He was healthier. That was the reason. 

He started with the hammy:

http://espn.go.com/nfl/story/_/id/13387802/atlanta-falcons-rbs-devonta-freeman-tevin-coleman-sidelined-hamstring-strains

Coleman got over his first:

http://www.foxsports.com/nfl/story/atlanta-falcons-devonta-freeman-tevin-coleman-081715

&gt;Rookie Tevin Coleman made up ground in the race for Falcons feature back \u2014 a thing fantasy football owners desperately hope will exist \u2014 by merely having an 80 percent healthy hamstring this preseason. Coleman's four-carry, 2-yard performance on Saturday probably won't clinch a majority share for him, but did show that he's closer to playing form than Devonta Freeman (hamstring), who isn't expected to return before Week 1.

http://www.sportingnews.com/fantasy/nfl/story/2015-08-31/tevin-coleman-devonta-freeman-fantasy-football-value-outlook-sleepers-busts-atlanta-falcons-running-backs

Sorry, but you don't have your facts straight here. As someone who has started Freeman heavily since before he broke out, it was always clear he was the better choice because of his experience as a pro and his skills in pass pro.

Tevin Coleman may have better NFL size for inside running, but that's only if there's contact behind or at the line. Freeman has wide open holes and takes the right ones. Furthermore, he can protect Ryan and knows receiving way better. Coleman is raw and these skills are rare for inexperienced players to have. The Lions, even without their troubles are not great for Stafford. 

His value in the past was volume, something they are trying hard to limit. His turnovers/sacks are more mindful now, which also means he isn't taking any chances or being productive.

He's neutered. 

I have no evidence to say "now they're 0-4, Stafford will unleash the dragon."

With his dragon locked up, so are his fantasy prospects.Colston for Snead - take the guy who is going to get the job

Britt for Austin - take the guy who is going to keep the jobWe need to know who's available, but as it stands now your questionable players can be matched up weekly if you make good decisions. Seems to me that you need WR, but you didn't say who's on waivers.Dude, I dropped Matt Jones before he played on Thursday night. I saw enough of him to know that he can't be a bellcow back there and the other guys suck so bad that it's guaranteed a committee. 

Are you gonna hate yourself for benching him the one week out of 4 where he goes off or love yourself for the other 3 weeks out of 4 where you avoided him? Be rational. Think about it. 

**THE EXCEPTION DOES NOT MAKE THE RULE**

David Johnson? He's basically Matt Jones. Why do you want to trade one bad situation for another. 

Jennings might be seeing his role re-expand. He's worth a flier. Hillman is the same. Duke could see his shrink as he benefitted from scheme last week.

I don't feel the need to roster Spiller...at all...in any of almost 50 leagues because I could have Hillman or Jennings (or someone else). You can let him go.I wouldn't waste time on trying to deal them, I would go after what you want. Don't be greedy. Waive them both already.

I'm not sold on Andrews. Too much situational RB usage there and scheming. Bradshaw? Roll the dice. Hurns? He's turning out to be Bortles outlet throw. I don't like Doug's situation. I do like Karlos' and would "deal with it" if and when Shady gets back, even though he might end up with less than 50% of the snaps and Martin could still be RB1 there. RB1 of a bad team vs RB2 who is a great back on a good team?

Steve Smith is notoriously bad in October and November as of late. Let him go. Grab him again around Week 12.Clay is Rex's new toy. He likes the guy.

I like Clay as a lower ceiling, steady weekly play moving forward and Eifert as a gamebreaker type of guy.

Last week I was very high on Marvin Jones and rightly so - he was open all day deep, but they were content to use him as a decoy to stretch the field running long routes.

The week before, Eifert had that role.

Cincy gonna Cincy.

They're gonna do that do you.

If it's a DFL, Eifert is a great play situationally. Over time I think Clay makes more sense because you can't survive too many goose eggs at several positions.

EDIT: I should add that I was high on Eifert as well the week before, the one where he did nothing and he should have been used and wasn't.I already started dropping Abdullah last week. The RB situation there is too muddy and crowded. I like Hillman as a back and I like his situation.

I don't like Ginn at all. He is the classic "free release" guy. He cannot beat coverage and I don't trust him. He did well because the Bucs were sending 2-3 guys after Olsen. If you bump him at the line, he's done.

Hankerson is still not high enough on Ryan's progression to be anything other than a WR4 at best. Hurns is his team's WR2 and Austin is likely their WR1.

It's a shame you have Cooks because his cost to you and potential handcuffs you. If I were redrafting I would take Hurns and Austin before Cooks, but I can't say to drop Cooks for one of them.

I would probably do Abdullah for Austin. You're plenty deep at RB with no studs. If you play your matchups carefully and start them against teams who are weak vs the run and not likely to be able to pass on your RB's defense, you have the best shot there. Adding one more choice to the mix is redundant. WR is your real issue. 

I would even consider dropping Taylor or Thomas just to get Hurns as well. QB and TE are a luxury when you're that in need at WR.Spiller yes, Jones no.

Here's why you're in this thread: "Why do I keep Jones? Did anyone watch?"

Jones was open ALL DAY. But the Bengals decided Jones was going to spread out the Chiefs and...they would run the ball and throw high percentage passes at opportune times. Jones' problem wasn't that he sucks or got replaced on the depth chart, it was that he was asked to be a decoy. 

I didn't like Spiller's usage at all and seeing Khiry continue to get looks just makes that entire situation a disaster there - even if you own Ingram it should worry you.

Coleman is a quality back and his arrow is pointing up, but Freeman is the better RB overall and ought to have a bigger role because he is more versatile. Coleman would be his handcuff. Spiller won't rise to assume Ingram's job if he goes down. It would be a mistake to give up on Jones, but he is a risk because they've also screwed Eifert by using him as a decoy.I like Bortles. He's got decent weapons and his team is bad enough to need to throw. He's an ok QB. The others will all lose their job at some point except Stafford who is stuck in his own Jim Caldwell personal hell.&gt;recommendations?

Find a time machine and go back to Tuesday after Week 1 and waive the Dolphins?!?

I can't believe you've held them this long.&gt; Addenum: None of them apparently ever saw ~~**Poltergeist**~~ *Scooby Doo*

FTFY

&gt; I mean, how else does one fight back and gain any measure of justice?

I can tell you that if my attorney would agree to it, I would put all money in an escrow account and willingly forfeit it on the condition the officers lose their POST certificate forever and do time as felons for assault.

If we had a law like that? Oh shit, cities would go after their bad cops like you wouldn't believe. &gt; Sadly, I doubt this happens Californians love their parties and incumbents.

There's no hope. People keep voting for Issa.I remember that video. My impression was that she was trying hard not to lose her shit and have a breakdown right then and there.

In general, to me she is:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thousand-yard_stare

I semi-believe her. I am sure she was bullied her entire life and these threats (real or not) set her off. 

IMO, she's having a freakout. I don't think it's because she's lying, I think it's because she's trying not to flip her shit. When you watch it with the context that she's about an inch away from going full raving lunatic, it makes way more sense. The way her voice shakes and quivers - that's not her lying nervously. That's her barely able to keep it together.I wonder if she'd be able to even get a regular job at this point.

Can you imagine being an employer and Googling her?

And I mean...this is already after the creepy ass face-to-face interview where she shakes, quivers and stares at you without blinking.&gt;The right guy will love you for what's inside

Arteries with a creamy centre, filled with custard and nougatAh, I see. 

She's implying that black=fat

No, that's not racist-sounding at all.Good luck. It's probably soon from when I wrote this.

Advice: Even if things don't go your way in court, don't worry. You will have more chances to get things right. It's a process. Remember that. Sometimes you have to play it out until the process works.We know we can predict this better in the way that roles change. Maybe after 4 weeks someone will inherit a meatier role due to injury or whatever.

As a side note, I've discovered the same thing as you've said and because of that **plus** the beginning of bye weeks, I switch to average points since overall totals will begin to change. Of course the other reason is that with 4 of 16 games played, it's time to start forecasting based upon what we have so far.Even liberals in Vermont carry guns.

You won't find a better state. People are nice, it's safe...concealed carry works. There's nothing. You just do it. That's the law.

Vermont is the gaping hole in your argument.And how dare those gun toting soldiers keep the firearms for themselves and then tell us True free 'Murricans that we can't have guns! It's all a plot to keep us from fighting back I tell ya!Axe body spray makes you a bold alpha maleEver since this Matt Forte shit became news, Denver was the obvious destination.

Forte makes ~$7m this year and the Broncos have ~$7m in cap space.Welcome /u/TheVetNoob

COME DEFEND YOUR RANKINGS - EXPLAIN YOURSELF!Look at every team around Seattle above/below them.

* How many of those teams would beat them in a sudden death game with better than 50-50 odds?

* How many of those teams would beat them more than 5 times out of 10?

But there's 32 of us.

Phew, I'm ok. XDLack of playoff success counts as consistent as well.

I was extremely disappointed in Sunday's game. You guys had plenty of chances to put the game well out of reach and the Chiefs kept in it, chipping away with FGs.

* Dalton couldn't miss all day

* Guys were open all day

* KC has the worst passing defense we've seen in a long time

And you guys did a 50-50 run/pass balance and the Chiefs outgained you guys. If you want to win in the playoffs, Sunday was a great tuneup for how to do it. You should have put them away early, built a big lead and sat back and played defense. Smith had no protection. If you had it lopsided, you could have sacked him 10 times. 

That game was 14-12 going into the half. It should have been a much greater gap. They were within a TD of you guys until the 4th quarter.

Against a playoff team you cannot do that.Their offense looked pretty poor without Lynch (and has), but the defense is reinvigorated with Kam back.

And Lynch is coming back.

Do you punish them for Lynch being a scratch and then undo said punishment when he returns?And I think most Jets fans would be one of the teams who would not want to face the Seahawks.I really liked Hasselback this week.

Rather than Luck's whole "I'm going to have Gore pass block and fail and then get me killed with a league-leading 68 hits on the QB and 8 turnovers" thing, Hasselback said "fuck it" and had Gore do the exact same thing on every play, which was to leak out into the flat and "If I throw it to you, catch it and then fall down for 1 yard every time" shit.

He is smart enough to not depend on Gore to keep him upright with that line. 

You need Bradshaw, stat.Random D-linemen &gt; Max UngerI was the same as you.

I actually had to walk away and imagine the tiers. Where I'd group the teams who are similar. 

There's a big ol' tier in the middle of about 16 teams, but I couldn't put Seattle in it.Not only that, they get this shiny new TE at the cost of the C who'd keep him safe and said TE can't even improvise on these scramble drills!

Hey Jimmy, here's an idea: turn around and see where your QB is and help him by running comeback routes when he's flushed out. Worst-case scenario is that you could block for him when you converge.We're beyond raw. We're worn down to the nub.You guys are a good team. I actually had the hardest time with the Titans because I kept moving other teams around and the Titans are moving and I was like "That's not fair, I gotta try and stop this" because you had a bye. 

I had to remember what it was that I thought and keep comparing it...Mariota...I don't know if I'm giving him too much weight without a lot of evidence, but he tempts me to rank you guys much, much higher.It came from a place of angry respect. We gotta get our shit together and make it so we're not forcing the Ravens to beat us with their best weapon. It's like we're asking for it.Still less painful than a reminder recapping what happened.

Seriously.He can combine the objective with the subjective and come out with a total ranking.I thought we voted that was your job.

You repeat the lines "submit your own rankings" and "this isn't an ordered list" and my job is to say "Peyton Manning sucks."Yeah but we're not saying that. We're saying she went there, she lied about the scope and duration of what she claims to have done.If that's the case:

"Hey Ragen, seek professional help."I want her to complain to shitlord physics for making her have to use spokes instead of composite wheels.&gt; I'm thinking she didn't actually run ~~more than a couple of miles.~~

This sounds like paradise compared to what we're living in right now.Those two fans are gonna be drenched in beer very soonWow, uh...Tanaka...stop leaving these pitches down where they want themI was about to say a 3 pitch inning so far he'll be able to go 27 innings tonightYea!....uhhI think part of the reason everybody loves the Astros is that SOMEONE on waivers saved your fantasy team at a point in the season.Mendoza line hitting?

Check.

Pop?

Check.

Ball carrying in NY?

Check.

Greg Vaughn/Ruben Sierra 2.0 confirmedRasmus to Pittsburgh confirmedDude is young enough to bounce back quicklyHe's gonna have Girardi bring him a sharpened bat and then fall on itO fuck come on dude, nut up and groove one in thereI'm surprised they went with McCann tonight.100% agree with McCann, especially since he's been dealing with that strike zoneWe need a GIF of that "FUUUUCK"Up next: a 4D tesseractHe's #1 Clippers fanEspecially when he was just framing pitches in it 2 minutes earlier.Yankees fans always seem like they're a pro wrestling matchWay to field your position, 1
&gt;I'm here to hate on the Yankees, 

Yeah!

&gt;their fans, 

Tell me about it!

&gt;and the city of New York.

WutYes I also hate baseballU da man"What's up with that pussy sushi shit"He's gripping - he's everywhere.

EDIT: painted the corner, there you goShould not have let Geo see that same pitch two times in a row dudeHe should have been more aggressive with the lineup card tooPresence on the team. IMO, 99% of their success is his example and leadership. He's such a fighter.

EDIT: Thanks, ESPN for echoing my sentimentsYou can not only tell how he comes off the mound that it's down and away but that it's a miss. Terrible telegraphing.Unless how baseball is played is fundamentally changed and we have a new era that comes in, no one will break Henderson's record even if they manage to have 20 years of wheels.LOL like he shavesThat's fucked up because Grohl has two decades on him.

Hard Livin' Rasmus, baby.Sharpen your nails or they'll get caught in the tangles."The search for the perfect log to swing"In honour of Derek Bell.Archer is an example of how the network presidents force commentators to dumb everything down. He doesn't work for anyone so he can actually say relevant shit.It's hard to think he's 27. He talks like he's 37 and looks like he's 17On 3 days rest?

Sports radio in Houston is gonna explode if they do thatYeah these pitches and the strike zone need to be seen because the zone is unstable and both pitchers are hitting and missing it and the batters have no clue what to swing atI hear adrenaline really mattersGirardi: you are a catcher. Tell your SP not to throw any first pitch strikes in the zone. After the first leadoff homer you should have fucking told him.

This inches you closer to getting fired.Until tomorrow...please I hope notI think they were afraid he was going to endorse Trump on-airAh, there's the call to IcyHot Smart ReliefYou're coming aroundHonest Tea Honey Green Tea

SmartWaterYeah I think he was just gonna be in for one inning but Kruk said "fuck it, turn my mic off so I can eat, no one wants to hear my shit anyway" and they kept him.If you told me Keuchel was gonna get 6 K's on 3 days rest, I would have said "maybe", but in 4 innings? Wow. He could get 12 at this rate!It's ironic that we're talking about athleticism with McCann upHe could slow it down, but then Kruk might get a word in edgewise and we don't want that. Every "um" and "err" is a "STFU Kruk" to my ears.I'm still amazed Reynolds got a job back. It's not Papelbon-level, thoYeah but he's not an *athlete*I'm hoping Kruk chokes on a chicken wing and they have to bring him backI keep wishing there will some some "great Sikh hope" that makes it and the Yankees get him and have to be faced with religious discrimination. Fuck, I hope the dude can wear a sword.Chris Archer commentary: 

What a time to be aliveI can't wait for Suzyn to cry tonight. I'm considering going to my car to listen to the 9th.Talk to the dude who filled out the lineup card. Everyone said not to do Young and McCann.

I was listening to Steve Somers the other night and some dude called in and eviscerated Girardi for not taking chances with his lineup and just "going by the book"

"Fans don't know"...well this one did.&gt; and does she want to be there?

No, she can smell Kruk's dinner on his beard from there.As a Montrealer who's seen us give a lot of love to our Mets, you can absolutely have us as 2nd team. I liked her comment on the "plane of the bat" earlier.LOL better yet, send Krukie out with a mic into right field to talk to the fansIf you like Astros pitching, this game is 5 stars for youShit he may not even make the rosterWoody Harrelson is with me and he's asking if everyone can please keep the conversation on Chris Archer. His time is very valuable.Oh I'm deadly seriousAnd to all of the pundits who said Girardi wouldn't have the balls to sit Gardner:

You were rightCardiac snagThat should do it.

Time to hit the showers.And again, Gardner started WHY?!?Winless?

Being serious, if you've watched these two teams, Bradford is getting bottled up. He looks stiff, mechanical and uncomfortable.

Mariota is like...off to the races. Things break down? He makes stuff happen. He moves around.

If you ask me, I think Bradford's problem is that he's not getting rid of the ball fast enough. Now if you wanna say it's because no one is open, fair enough. But he's gotta step up into the pocket or move or something. 

Mariota would move around until people got open.

Going back to the receivers being open, I think that's a Chip Kelly issue. Over and over again we see plays where the pocket is breaking down before anyone gets open. That's playcalling.My kids play whatever they like and they all have different interests.

You actually *don't* have to play with them. They like to figure things out on their own, too.Justin Durant (of the Falcons, I assume most people don't know who he is) ought to make the Pro Bowl this year. He is at a minimum good enough to make it, but I don't know if his reputation will grow enough to get votes.

I can't say the Falcons are the worst if they have someone that's Pro Bowl calibre. 

I will, however, say this (since you said it) - Manti Teo is just terrible. 

I liken it to playing an all-defense fantasy football league. You don't take a guy like Revis because he's so good, no one goes at him. You want a guy that kinda sucks because teams will pick on him and he can get you some stats.

That's Manti Teo this year. The numbers are there, but they should go after him.

It's pretty telling that he's amassed 33 tackles and only had 4 stuffs. 

Same goes with D'Qwell Jackson - he's leading the league in tackles, but only has 4 stuffs. Freeman is alright, but Jackson is done. I think Indy have the worst corps, despite Freeman being pretty good.Sell high on Freeman, but don't think Coleman is going to come and take his job.

Sorry, desperados out there. You can pray all you like that Coleman is going to dethrone him, but Freeman's only deficiency coming into this year was a history of poor inside running.

Guess who is tearing it up inside with a better set of blockers/scheme in front of him? Yup - they addressed his only weakness.

Freeman was always the #1 choice on passing downs because he understands pass pro and how to leak out and be a hot read for his QB. Coleman isn't skilled in pass pro and had no practical experience to even have chemistry with anybody yet.

If you want Coleman, handcuff him to Freeman. In my drafts this year I took Freeman before Coleman and I dropped Coleman right away. He's worth owning as a handcuff right now - that's it.Dude - look.

Take out your pen.

Write "Andre Ellington 15 carries from here on out barring injury or blowout"

Because that's what it's gonna be. They have said so many times that is his workload that it's not gonna change. He brings more to the table than the other backs because he's the most versatile one they have.I don't like it. Tate isn't a complimentary fit.

They should have never let Torrey Smith go - I'm sorry Ravens fans, but I know it, you know it and Ozzie knows it.

Without that deep threat to stretch the field, the run game suffers and Flacco can't use his best asset, which is his cannon arm.

Tate isn't that guy. If football were a MMO, FPS or whatever, the Tate Class would be the all-around guy who isn't good at any one thing.

If the Ravens want to compete, they ought to try and deal for TY Hilton. That signing was a mistake. They paid him when Moncrief was there all along. I bet they'd even throw in Andre Johnson for free. 

A three way deal where Tate goes to Indy makes a hell of a lot more sense as he's the sort of guy who could be a Reggie Wayne-type of player with Luck. They don't need Hilton. That's not even Luck's game. Hilton is a deep threat - that's all. 

Baltimore would be making a mistake. Tate is no Anquan Boldin. All night Monday you saw Tate going down the left side and unable to comeback and get clear of the defender. Boldin would beat their ass to get open, which is why he was a great checkdown receiver for Flacco. He's comfortably riding the pine while James Jones takes his place.Dude, you're crediting Vontae with name recognition. He wasn't playing well and now he's banged up.No, sell Megatron.

This is the first time in his career where he's being shut down in consistent single-coverage.

Freeman's arrow is pointing up, Megatron's is pointing down. Williams is a shitty WR and if you have him you will be tempted to start him. He lacks the all-around skills to be consistent.

I would see about Williams for Hillman. If the Megatron owner is like me, they know they need depth at WR. 

It will not surprise me if Megatron is revealed to have some sort of nagging injury and is half-assing it the rest of the year.

In a league with me? Make me an offer on Megatron. You'll be surprised.So no tooth fairy or Santa or Easter bunny...too traumatic for the future?I bet you live within 20km of Asbestos!Those are the words of:

* Someone who can do better

* Someone who hasn't found their True love they can't live without\u5927\u6839\u6e90\u6c0f

Ha ha...because everyone came from that family tree...ah I kill myself sometimes.&gt;Are You Ready to Believe in the Cincinnati Bengals?

I've been ready to believe for several years

&gt;But is this the year the Bengals finally break through the NFL's glass ceiling?

Not unless things change. Like the old saying goes: doing the same thing over and over again and expecting a different result is the definition of Marvin Lewis

&gt;But a quarter of the way through the season, this iteration of the Bengals once again appears to be a very good team 

Like every year

&gt;How many times have overzealous talk-radio callers actively wondered whether Dalton was good enough to be an "elite" NFL quarterback?

On Sunday, the Bengals had a chance to let him be one and didn't. I'm aware of the stat line for Dalton and it could have been 25%-40% higher. You know how to win in the playoffs? You gain experience. They could have put the Chiefs away early. Learning how to win. The Chiefs were within a TD or less until the final moments of the 3rd quarter.

I don't get you guys sometimes. I really don't. For all of the times the *other* team has put you away, you'd think people would have the light bulb go off and say "yeah, that shit the other teams do to us? We need to do it to them. We need to humiliate them. Crush them. Demoralise them. We need to go for the jugular."

Marvin Lewis is not that guy. After that Chiefs game, I gave up. I give up. I've defended him long enough.

I don't know how Andy Dalton is supposed to gain experience and take the next step as a *winning quarterback* if the team won't let him. The fucking training wheels are still on. He was on point the entire game and his throws were limited. You know who throws 70% completions? Weeden in Dallas in a babysitting role. That's a fact. Tom Brady doesn't throw 70% - not even close. He takes risks. 

Risks?

Sorry, not allowed. Marvin says so.One of my good friends is an EE but ended up with a job doing server presales. I did the same thing, but I was a fake "engineer" - I was a network engineer. A lot of what I did was designing solutions for people. So did he. So did my ex-wife who was a backup strategist. Another friend of mine who was an EE is now a programmer/project manager/team leader.

You get what I'm saying? 

Engineering is, in my *professional* (and I mean that literally, not as the saying goes) opinion one of the most valuable degrees because it's the one degree that certifies you in being able to find solutions. Like with me - I sold *integrated solutions*. 

Let me give you another personal example. There are tons of network engineers who can knock my socks off setting up, running and maintaining a server. My job was to design what they needed.

You could be a ME and design a perfect engine. Doesn't mean you could race it in F1. You can design the perfect processor. Doesn't mean you could program it well.

You say you're an artist or a creative person? Dude, that's where engineers thrive. That's why I wasn't a network *administrator*, I was a network *engineer*. 

You think your career is going to be a mechanical administrator. That's line assembly. 

You have the ability to find solutions and be creative. You have an in-demand profession. You can be choosy. You must have missed career day or internships or whatever because you haven't met the right people. You can have an exciting career that suits what you like, but you have to know how to find it.No, I have not wondered if Ragen is going to commit suicide.&gt;Look, PFF NEGATIVELY GRADED Freeman 

That's simple, don't listen to PFF.

Look, I'm not trying to insult you here, but there's no other way to say it: when PFF is better at analysing football than I am, I will listen to PFF. When you are better at analysing football than I am, I will listen to you. All I see are a litany of errors in your analysis here.

&gt;4th touch: 3:08 - This is the first touch showing what I'm talking about. The hole is collapsed 2 yards before he gets to it. He has plenty of daylight to the left side and this can go for 5-10 yards before help arrives, even more if he makes the unblocked DB miss. Instead he runs into the back of Dimarco, 4 yards.

That's wrong. It's a designed run. You don't understand what you're seeing by the run blocking, the playcall or the defensive alignment. If anything, this is 180 degrees opposite. 

Houston is in a 5-2-4 alignment there. Right there, Freeman is supposed to read that and go "ok, I have to pick the A gap where the LB isn't because the LBs can only plug 2 As and 2 Bs."

The Texans are blitzing, a run blitz or a pass blitz, but they are bringing pressure. This is a read play by the offense. They are taught that when they see this alignment, everyone pushes forward. If you delay like you're suggesting, the edge rusher can run blitz. If you PA, the edge rusher can get whoever has the ball. If it's a pass, the FB is on the wrong side to pass pro and Freeman is too far back. 

I say this often: I always liked Joe Theismann because he would call the exact outcome of a play before it happened and Paul Maguire was always wrong. Football isn't a mystery. I told myself that if Joe could do it, it must not be a secret talent, so I would do it as well. It's obvious what Atlanta is going to do. He has no option.

Furthermore, if you look at how the Falcons line moves, they are creating a hole RIGHT THERE for Freeman to run in. This is a sprint run and the Texans were fooled; the edge rusher overran the play. The RDT was playing 6 technique, FFS. You think he needs to break it outside, but 55 is unblocked. His job, what they do in practice is to follow the FB who blows up his assignment, which is the LILB.

I mean...look, I'm not gonna break the rest of them down. You can downvote me and call me an asshole and that's fine, I'm used to it. But you need to get back to the drawing board and double down on analysis. You picked maybe one of the best executed plays as a failure.

/sorryI rarely ever "friend" anyone on reddit - one, I think it's useless and two it doesn't really do anything except distinguish a user. I don't use RES, so I can't tag you. I'm just doing the rare "friend" thing as a reminder to read what you say in the future.

Well-said.Their ideal world has our earned privileges being their rights and our rights being eliminated.I didn't even get 15 words into it and I lost it. I'm gonna end up having asthma if I read the rest. Take my upvote.Lebron is the first player in a very long time that I've felt no reservation about liking.

Think about that Derek Fisher shit with Matt Barnes. I never liked Fisher anyway and we always knew Barnes was a douche. The worst James ever did was be totally out of touch with his decision, but he's not malicious doing "side bitches" stuff like Victor Cruz.

You hear news that Fisher dicked his lady over? Ok, a little shocking, but not unexpected. Barnes? I'm only surprised it wasn't worse. Victor Cruz? Meh, typical. 

I would be shocked if James did any of this.

He moved back to Ohio from Miami *for his wife*. Dan LeBatard still can't accept that. It just goes to show you that if James is gonna fool you, it'll be stuff like that.Target has these mini-sliders that are awesome if you make them right.

I let them thaw enough to remove the cheese, then I fry the patty and bun. Tastes just like fresh.

Burgers come back really well. You can take them home if the cheese is on the size and they're plain/dry and they're just like fresh.There's the interrelationship of a vicious cycle where ignorance creates superstition and then superstition makes people more ignorant, but it's more than that.

I can't speak to the veracity or validity of the research, but I've heard it postulated that 50% of the people are just genetically predisposed to superstition. I suppose it could be something similar to why some are born introverts, others are born extroverts or anything else. I have no way of knowing whether that theory is right, only that it merits further discussion and possible research.

Religion is a way to coalesce those people and their predilection towards superstition into groups. And I think superstition makes sense from an evolutionary standpoint: the person who let fear prevent them from doing something stupid was able to pass their genes along down the line.

Ultimately, if it wasn't religion, it would be something else. You have conservatives who aren't particularly religious subscribing to wacky conspiracy theories. You have liberals who aren't religious at all subscribing to dogmatic social justice theology. It transcends politics. It transcends rational thought.

I admit I never really had to try and not be religious because it always seemed irrational to me. To others where it just makes sense? I try to understand from their perspective that it's very compelling.

Anyway, do you think our society would be better if we lived on the whim of moral relativism of the militant left who have no regard for rights or earned privileges? How about the right with their inane blatherings about conspiracies with FEMA camps and school shootings? And their convergence in a vaccine-less, gluten-free world?

In fact, it might even be worse if those things became the new religion. I actually remember (or am imagining) that being the issue before you even posted this because one of the selling points of RB4/why we needed to change was that the kit was velocity sensitive. The people who are also complaining about the pads would fall under the same logic.I'm a broken record here in /r/vancouver on this, but the solution has always been the same:

If you are deemed an investor, your property taxes go up yearly by a factor of 10 unless you rent your property out at 10% below market rates. 

I live in Quebec. And people here are a lot different. The societal attitude towards flipping properties in BC is one that is admirable; good business. Here I would almost say the idea is abhorrent to most people. 

Instead of the "Vancouver Special", what I would term a "Montreal Special" is something like this:

http://imgur.com/HmN1DmC

At the bottom level you have a 1 1/2 (bachelor) rented out by an Italian kid with a Jetta and the other one is some Quebecois guy who takes the bus to his bakery job. 

On the middle left 5 1/2 is the Greek guy who owns a restaurant and owns the building. He's the landlord. On the right is a typical Quebecois family with 2 kids who work boring office jobs and park their two Honda Civics in front of the garage under a tempo.

The top left level is a girl who goes to CEGEP and rents out her 2nd bedroom to another girl who works as a server at the landlord's cousin's restaurant. At the top right is the creepy 45yo guy who is permanently on the dole and his 2nd bedroom is filled with old books.

Bottom two people pay different rent. The young Italian kid pays $500/mo and the Quebecois dude pays $350 because he's been there forever. The family in the middle pay as much as the Italian kid because they've been there for 10 years. The girls upstairs split their $700 rent between them and the hermit guy pays $375 for his 2br because he's been there for 20 years.

The idea that you'd raise rents on these people to...meet market demand? I don't even know. It simply wouldn't fly. Rent control is in place, the rental board sides with tenants, welfare doesn't have to be overly generous because everything is cheap as hell to rent. 

Property taxes are through the roof. That keeps prices down. 

Here's a random example:

http://sothebysrealty.ca/en/property/quebec/monteregie/saint-lambert/79241/

Strata fees are $8700 and taxes are $6500 for a $900k property. That doesn't even include the mortgage. 

I mean...you can own a $1m property, but you should be paying out the ass to do so. A few kms away you can buy a 2br condo for $160-$180k, so...the option is there to pay more.

You have to change the culture when it comes to property speculation. The whole "well that's what the market will bear" is the most retarded, intellectually lazy argument of psuedo-intellectual economics there is. The market is totally artificial. It has nothing to do with the ecosystem of the local economy or people there. 

I have to end this somewhere.

* Change the culture about speculation

* Understand that housing costs make even public aid worse

* Enact policies to drive down rents

* Tax investors, not the Greek guy who lives in a building he rents out

Finally, just as a side note, property values in Quebec cannot go down by law. If you buy something for $300k and want to sell it for $200k, the new buyer can pay $200k, but you need to come up with the extra $100k. While I think that's a fucked up law, it's a testament to how important property taxes are. In New Hampshire, that's their sole tax and they're one of the top 5 best-run states. I think BC is a lot like NH. If all taxes were 100% property taxes? I'd like that.We're all frankly surprised he's still alive.

In the back of my mind I think Rivers makes a "greatness run" when the other two have retired due to being dead.And I'm sure you do know those couples. But do you know the why?

Do they love each other for their personalities?

Did one or both get bigger? Or smaller?

Is it the case of some guy who is whooped?

Is it a guy who has trouble with the law and needs anything he can get?

I doubt your grasp of statistics about "everyone being happy" is indicative of your credibility or reasoning:

http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/08/02/happiest-states-_n_3696160.html

If you think the unhappiest states are the happiest...well wait until you go to a happy state. All you know is your small world, relative to itself and that's sad.

Hey, guess what? Let me put on my "Ragen Chastain Elite Researcher Hat" and show you something:

http://healthyamericans.org/report/88/

http://calorielab.com/news/categories/fattest-states/

LIKE, OMG! The fattest states are the unhappiest! The fit ones are the happiest? How can that be? But you were talking out of your ass so well! Who could question such sharp assertions?

I guess when food is the drug, everyone's an addict.Sure you can. And that Elite Researcher's name?

~~Albert~~ Ragen ~~Einstien~~ Chastain.

Ragenbert Chasteinstein.I'm surprised at two of them which I would easily swap.

I'm very wary of Murray this week considering he's banged up. In fact, my assessment was that Murray's workload is too high and he's fatigued, which is why he lost the handle on the ball twice late and Helu got more work. Del Rio had to look at that and think the stats were catching up, which was that he's being way overused. 

If there was ever a week to Alfred Morris "one last desperation shot", this is it. 

First of all, you *can* run on Atlanta. Secondly, the Redskins want to try and do it to slow things down.

If they can establish the run early, Morris should have an easy time of it. If they fall behind early, Chris Thompson is going to have a very productive day.

I'm a little better than 50-50 that Washington slows this game down and gets the run going, at least for a series or two.

EDIT: let me add that I had to waive Morris in a few leagues and it was painful to do so.While I like all three of them, with all of the injuries in Buffalo, guys like Harvin and Clay are going to really have to step up.

They're all nice bets, but I think the wrinkle here is Clay because it's the one known we have: who is going to step up and take the workload in Buffalo?There is one major exploit with Houston, which has been weak CB play.

I am starting them, however I'm also comfortable starting Moncrief. I'm trying to talk myself into getting Hilton off my bench, but I have better options.

Versus the Jags, they were pretty conservative. The Jags DBs are good and Hasselbeck took what he was being given. Whoever is at QB will have a chance to throw big passes, which makes HOU a very risky play. We know those are low percentage plays/throws, so there's a good chance of them simply being incomplete. But there's also a chance of Houston getting burned.

Anyway, the way DST has been this year, you're almost better off benching/not starting one probably 25% of the time. DST is a really big risk with all of the penalties. They could get helped or face short fields. Teams are throwing. See what I'm saying? The risk is there regardless, so you're looking at the upside.

The Colts cannot protect the QB. They lead the league in QB hits and turnovers. It's a matter of time before a QB hit leads to a FF to a FR to a TD. That's why you gamble on them this week. It's not trying to minimise risk anymore, it's praying for a strip sack TD or someone bringing one back all the way on an INT or PR.Every time I looked up, Crowder seemed to be doing something. But he's still low on the depth chart and coming back from a fragile injury he could easily reaggravate. 

Coleman is a dangerous play because Freeman is playing well. Plus, the Redskins are kind of a trap game in that they are better than people realise and can bring it. The upside I see for Coleman is that they shut down Freeman and the Falcons try to preserve him and give Coleman some punishment. 

Which leads to Boobie. Rex is pretty straightforward. If Karlos and Shady aren't getting reps in practice and Boobie is, he will get the bulk of the carries. 

Go with Boobie, but I like Crowder as a dark horse despite being absolutely buried on the depth chart.Skip the RBs. Karlos likely won't suit up and if he does it could be as an emergency role. Rex would shock us to play the coy coach and actually use him.

Murry is in line for a role reduction - he's been overused and it shows. He wore out in the 4th and made mistakes with the football. I want to watch and see this week.

Jackson is hot and you want in on that streak. I say this over and over, but he has rapport with Winston, which is hard to both calculate and quantify. 

The Texans will have trouble defending Moncrief and he should have lots of opportunity volume. Benjamin is heating up and is seeing his usage steadily rise. Baltimore possess some great CBs, but they're having trouble being effective with Suggs not there to add pressure. There's always a risk because of their talent, but this is your safest bet.

Tate has looked awful all year and Hankerson has too limited a role compared to your other options. Aiken is intriguing to me, but considering he's a "swing for the fences" guy like Benjamin, Benjamin just has more of a resume to look at.That's why Moncrief is even better. Because of his proclivity to keep plays alive, if the Colts get into trouble, they're going to need him.

I like one of three guys to do well there this week: him, Allen or Fleener. When the QB gets in trouble (and he will), he's gonna look for his checkdown. That'll be Moncrief and the two TEs.

McFadden's role is too limited and Bryant needs time to get back and has limited experience with Vick who in turn has limited experience as a Steeler, period.Palmer will play, period. 

Cooks isn't getting the role any of us anticipated while Hurns is seeing his importance to Bortles grow on a weekly basis. Sucks to say your Week 3 waiver scrub over your Round 3 draft prospect, but it's Hurns.110% actuarial. Not legal.Speaking of herbs, he should smoke some pot and relax.

I read that article as "angry"...angrier than need be.And they can change...permanently.Make memes of what she says and submit them to /r/AdviceAnimals and then share those on Facebook when she's Internet famous.Wait...what...nevermind.

No, I've got it.

She thinks that Indian people are snake charmers so they can steal the Cobra's venom for themselves.Could it be gold or precious gems?

Buy it and find out! You can't win if you don't try it!AliExpress for trees, lights, decorations.

Order now.* "We don't need the F-35. Minister of Defence Starscream *is* an F-35!"He would have managed the oil sands far better.Those are all my trigger words.

They trigger my bullshit detector.I wished it didn't have those pictures. Or the text. Or even the URL.Yeah it'd be surreal to have him go to FS1 and be the normal guy he was on KTCK.At least you cut it down to 1 skirtCan I call you Peg?Which one? Be specific.Of course he will. Why wouldn't he?

Why overuse Freeman if you're the Falcons?Generally speaking all StubHub tickets go down the day before/of the game because brokers want to clear inventory, although right before the game they can bounce back.

I haven't reserved tickets for a live event of any kind except for a handful of times in the past 25 years. I've been to hundreds of them in my lifetime. I am fully comfortable buying tickets before the event because I will get the best seats for a good deal.

There are always exceptions and I've been close to being shut out a few times, but if you are more sensitive to price than you are actually going, just wait until the night before the game and monitor inventory to make sure it doesn't sell out.I find it's the best way to get clean after crapping, especially when it's the consistency of peanut butter.Wow, really?

Alright all you Boobie Dixon owners, time to become Herron owners!Yo, OP, can we get an NSFW tag please?The biggest problem you may have here is that you've forgotten the most important factor: Calvin is no longer being double or triple covered.

Teams are shutting him down with single coverage on most every snap.

Every single discussion that omits that most basic and glaring fact is dangerous.I first started playing with CDM in...I want to say 1989. I played for a few years. All told, I spent about $1000 total and won $11000.

DFS is similar to the old CDM/Sporting News/USA Today because you were picking guys based upon salary, but you kept them for the entire season. You had like 10 moves total you could make and it was rotisserie. Groups of 25. If you had the highest yards per reception, you got 25, etc.

The reason I learned Excel as a teenager was to analyse the salaries and find ways to win. I noticed who owned what, where the values were and I took them. I also understood that variance in certain players meant I needed to have multiple entries to cover all of my bases, which I did.

I know for a fact I was on a different level than other people because you had to submit your picks by fax or telephone and I would talk to the ~~bookies~~ *operators* there and they told me I was rare because I had so many entries. 

I stopped playing because I didn't see it as "sporting" or "sports" any longer, but using an unfair advantage over everyone else.

This is the same reason why I won't and don't play DFS, although I am confident I could make money doing it - it's the same reason I don't peddle drugs or work in real estate speculation: there are ways of making money that aren't worth living with if you have a conscience.If you're having trouble following the Texans QB situation between Mallet and Hoyer, just combine them into Mayer Hollet and then you'll always know who's out there.I call him Hoover because he sucks everything in.

I'd call him The Black Hole but I thought that sounded racist.Mmm...Pagano is gonna curse that play when he's cleaning out his officeHe never hooked his fingers - not a facemaskWhat a pointless push!Low effort there, ColtsThis ref really likes his face timeI like the playcall, but Gore is red hot. He should have had that play.GIF request with audio

4:03 of the 3rd quarter, Texans cheerleader is bouncing and "Good Vibrations" is playing the "bom bom" part and it says "Breast Cancer Awareness" as they go to break.

That's fairly intentional.My dream is for JJ Watt to chase me.

And by dream I mean worst nightmare. 

Because those are also dreams.Considering how they've thrown flags tonight, I'm surprised Hilton didn't earn one thereI think I saw that skirt at JCPenneyI have a question.

Did you hear Carol died?So meta.

We're into the rabbit hole, people.ABCers are on a roulette wheel just waiting to know where they need to land.

Tax the niqab to raise money to fight terrorism?What it boils down to (yet again) is that the New Democrats haven't transcended the notion of being a strategic vote for a lot of people. 

If you ask me, their ground game is weak in Quebec and they need to tailor a message to the voters here so they simply want to vote NDP, period.Yeah but it's so obvious it's hard to miss.

It's not like there's a huge effort to stalk her. It's instantly noticeable because it's so unnatural and unnerving for the viewer.I watched it again...last night?

Man, they played that riff way too much.I read on Wikipedia how it was "less well-received" because the public had tired of westerns and it didn't really get the respect it deserved or whatever. Kind of interesting because I watched Beach Blanket Bingo after that and it's another one of those trendy theme movies with the same thing going on. That whole era was kind of tragic because people followed trends rather than good films.

Even if you don't like Westerns, For A Few Dollars More stands alone as a thriller, drama, suspense/action, etc. 

The ending was a great crescendo and had wonderful foreshadowing.Yeah, I watched The Departed exactly once and once was enough for me. I far prefer the Infernal Affairs series - just insane movies. I really loved Edison Chen. Did you ever see The Fisher King?

Robin Williams had a really thoughtful period there for awhile. From the moment that movie came out and people complained, I have asked the same question to everyone who didn't like the ending:

How can you not question the holodeck in Star Trek with 24th century technology, yet the idea of a tesseract that transcends time/space that can represent anything is a dealbreaker for you?Yeah but the point is that if you have solved the mystery of gravity, the black hole isn't going to destroy you. 

The movie has a chicken-egg paradox. It wasn't that he entered the singularity to make the past events happen, it's that they delivered him into the tesseract safely. He didn't survive the black hole because it was "gentle", he survived for the same reason he survived the wormhole: it was designed to transcend gravity, time and space.If only they had the same attitude towards quick court trials, this wouldn't happen.Edit that to include the Matthews' and then we don't need to read any other postsDo people even watch games?

His pass blocking has been shit.

All of those league-leading turnovers and QB hits to Luck were on Gore. If you watched those games, he did nothing but miss assignments. He's why Luck got hurt.

Bradshaw is there to take his lunch because Bradshaw is a masterful pass blocker and is far better at reading defenses.

With Gore and Hasselbeck they changed it so that he wasn't having to do any of that.I started Moncrief. While his chart was trending downward, the usage was there, as was the opportunity. 

&gt;I wouldn't be surprised if he put up bigger numbers than Julio.

Only because teams are doing everything they can to take him away.

He and Freeman are both risky starts this week because we can't tell who teams are going to try and take away. If you halfass it and do both like the Texans did tonight, you let Gore and Andre burn you which is why I was really high on Gore this week. 

So far, though...the Redskins have been able to unbalance teams.

* All RBs sucked with PHI and no WR had more than 3 receptions

* All RBs sucked with NYG and Randle/Beckham had excellent outings

* All RBs sucked with STL and all receivers sucked

* All RBs sucked with MIA and the receivers were pedestrian at best

&gt;He and Kyle Shanahan are looking to burn their former team. 

Maybe so, but people aren't burning the Redskins right now. If anyone does anything, it'll be because they are a transcendent player like Julio or Freeman. Fringe guys have yet to do anything vs WAS. 

Something to be careful of. * Clay only played for Miami

* Miami was like 30th or some shit vs the TE so of course he would go offI got banned awhile back and never got an answer as to why.

Never mind the countless personal messages I got from people thanking me. I guess I didn't meet their mysterious criteria...whatever that was. I would even wait until posts were 16 hours old before even commenting as to not have my post subject to a popularity contest.You don't need to be a psychiatrist to ask for a mental health diagnosis of some kind.

I would go to a counsellor with him that is plugged into mental health professionals, ideally a group practise that has those sorts of people on-staff. If there's an obvious issue, you won't even need to bring it up.I can't even begin to list all of the aesthetic reasons as to why cellulite is unattractive.For some reason I always assumed you were a mod.

You should be one.It's always the same - they believe they can do no wrong. They believe their own shit. 

The lack of self-awareness is...staggeringly poetic. 

Glad to see it's finally coming to a head for y'all.John is so badass he could teach Kevin how to eat crayons properly.Parklife and Jeff Buckley's Grace came out the same time and IMO the whole decade paled in comparison after that.I don't think we're creepy. I think Ragen is creepy. You saw that video, right?

I promise you that I blink when I visit this subreddit.Yeah but it's pretty weak that she takes part in "sex wars" with them.She reminds me of Scientology.Gotta echo the RO because it will severely damage her supposed "court case"Yeah just wait until the abusive rapist husband/boyfriend comes in to finish off the woman who dared to cross him and she gave him the all clear.There is no such thing as an "expert"

I almost think the subreddit style should hide all usernames and karma scores. I especially hate the flair that says "oh, look at me for some reason". 

You should believe what seems reasonable and makes sense.

Don't get caught up on whether or not they're successful by some sort of limited metric. "This guy or that" is bullshit because it totally removes context from the equation. One person might say "I have x and y" and I would tell them to start x and not y and the other person to start y and not x. 

It's like saying "Here's the expert test. Do you hit on 15? Do you hit on 16? Ok, here's the card and it was a 6."

Like they were supposed to know it was a 6. The correct answer is "you always hit on 16, but the odds of not busting and being beaten are worse at 15, so you want to hit."

Then if the question is "this is my last chip" vs "I have lots of chips"...you can afford to stand if you have chips, if you're about to die there...you're boned no matter what. Luckily it's only a maximum of 160 characters, so the more serious people are safe. #fired #layoffsWell I'm hoping for an emergency personalitectomy.I agree.

The Seahawks can slow the Bengals down, but the Bengals will stop themselves for Seattle ever gets a chance.

It bugs me I can't go back and change my picks for the pickem, because the more this week goes on, the more I'm convinced this is a complete trap game for the Bengals who have played it relatively safe instead of elevating their game to the next level.

This is a playoff game for Seattle. They can't afford to lose. They're alright, but on the outside of the 6th seed. They might be a bit weak to face a very strong and healthy Bengals team, but Seattle needs it and the Bengals have yet to show they are willing to go for the jugular. He'll get his shot. The interesting matchup this week is Marvin Jones after a quiet week last week. He's gonna be on Cary Williams and while he's been good this year/hasn't been a slouch, that's probably their best matchup to try and exploit. People who really care about that stuff/track it use the 40-30-30 carbs-fat-protein macro ratio.

40% is a lot of carbs and people are able to feel ok, maintain/lose weight with that ratio etc. Carbs aren't evil, they're just kind of lame food because they don't build muscle or have a lot of nutrition.

You can do 30-30-40 with 30% carbs and 40% protein, but then you need to eat a high fibre diet or you're gonna get constipated and gassy.

Anyway, legumes and nuts are high in protein. Peanuts, white beans, etc - all are affordable. Beans and veggies are filling. It's hard to be on a strict budget with carbs because you don't feel full for as long with them. &gt; He is just speculating though, as is EVERYONE ELSE on this sub.

As "EVERYONE ELSE", I would like to defend myself and say that there are different kinds of speculation. My speculation is an educated guess based upon observation and common sense.

* He has more experience with Matt Ryan

* He is better at improvising

* He is more experienced and skilled as a pass blocker

* He is the same size, but much shorter which gives him a size advantage for pass blocking by getting under the defender

* He's better at pass catching and is more experienced

* He has a better command of the offense

* He is red hot&gt; If it's True that coleman was named starting back before he got hurt, you shouldn't let someone lose their starting spot to injury, so he's back on top when healthy.

??????

It was Freeman's job, both got hurt, Coleman was more likely to go and he got the job.

Nevermind that people lose their job to injury all the time, the goal was go to with Freeman and ease Coleman into the overall role as time went on. 

Jumping in here, it would make the most sense for Coleman to be their every down back because Freeman is short, but Coleman needs to put on about 10-20 pounds for that to happen. Over 6 feet is a bad height for RBs because you can't get below defenders and below 210 is bad because you don't have enough weight to break first contact or push back LBs.

Both guys are sub 210 (same weight) except Freeman is at least 3" shorter. Neither guy is the one you want as your workhorse and Freeman is ridiculously bulked for such a little guy. Coleman could get huge.They rhetorical "is there anything more lame" question?Gotta disagree. It wouldn't surprise me if he were a Pats fan from the time.

Belichick had very little say coming in. IIRC, Bledsoe signed his deal right before the 2000/2001 Draft (I don't recall the year he started) and Belichick was barely the HC at the time. He had maybe been in the job a few weeks. 

Bledsoe was never Belichick's guy, he was his old mentor Bill Parcells' guy. 

The contract was also very team-friendly, a sort of "earn it" deal.

You're arguing that "he signed a big deal so that means it's serious" and OP here is saying that Belichick signed Brady and brought in all of the QBs for a reason. They'd either push Bledsoe or replace him.

Speaking personally, I always thought Bledsoe was pretty mediocre, so I wasn't surprised when he didn't get his job back because it was obvious at the time they didn't have faith in him. You think it's a clear message and it's a mixed message. 

Sign a guy to a big money deal? You must love him!

Except that the guarantees were low and there was a lot of competition at the position for the next 2 seasons.Deleting cookies sucks.

Watch it incognito. I agree. I see that man running around and I just want to make the decision to say "fuck the patriarchy" and the rest of the diet and exercise industry. Seeing him run around like that just makes real my dream of casting off the chains of society's impossible standards and listening to my body. My body contains my dreams. It's time for me to listen and let go of fat oppression.

/fatlogicCan someone PLEASE TELL ME where he's getting the money for a pizza?!?Yeah people need to realise that Republicans aren't willing to compromise on anything...ever. And it's the speaker's job to congeal that toxicity into a lie that makes it sound like they're ready to deal when they aren't.It's to the point now where I roll my eyes and expect the worst when I hear "family" - for me it's like Scientology running the Cult Awareness NetworkIt's not the niqab, it's a symbolic issue. 

Take Quebec. We're not conservative here...at all. It's a very liberal province and pro-woman in many, many ways.

If you come to Canada, you're expected to make some effort to integrate. The niqab makes a very specific statement of rebellion, and more importantly about women. 

It's a very tough fight to keep women from being viewed as second class citizens. Equality may not be truly possible, but it's something we should try for. Wearing the niqab says that women are chattel and beneath men. These men and women who support it are sending a very strong and threatening message to liberal, secular society that wants women to feel safe in their home country.

Safety isn't being hidden behind a veil. Safety is refraining from active or passive acts that threaten women and their hard-fought freedoms. 

I don't understand how you can malign us all into "agreeing with Harper"...we don't agree with Harper. We agree mostly with a poorly-worded poll question. The issue is far more complex than how he's framed it. I suppose when you say it that way, it sounds like the government is paying him to stay disabled.

The system works!/r/TopMindsOf~~Reddit~~*Ragen*Why wouldn't they?

He's looked pretty good in the plays he's given, but from what I've watched he's very situation-dependent.

Which makes sense. How could he know all of the plays and reads?

But what they give him? He does really well. 

If you watch him play, he's in there on certain situations and tearing it up while Crowell is going to get the "normal" situations because they can call any play out of their playbook.

The downside to Johnson is that teams know what he's gonna do when he's in there so they can shut it down (if they're capable). I just don't believe anything I read there.

Chris Thompson has looked the best at blitz pickup and presnap reads by far. He's gonna keep getting snaps.I doubt it'll happen.

I call them "5 tool" players, a la baseball, but the criteria are different:

1. Run inside

2. Run outside

3. Pass pro

4. Pass catch

5. Hard yards (3rd and short, stacked box, goal line)

In the olden days, you didn't need 5-tool RBs because the game was so run heavy and effective between the tackles. Everyone lined up in the I/Pro Set facing a 4-3 defense, nothing exotic, just my best vs your best.

You see less workhorse backs because it's about scheme - which is also why workhorse backs are more important than ever: every time you have to change RBs, the defense can swap out D-linemen or adjust their scheme if they were in the wrong scheme (such as in nickel when there's only 2 WRs). 

Never forget, the NFL isn't there to please fantasy players. If a team discovered a guy like Bell, they would lean on him almost exclusively. 

I mean...name a starting RB drafted outside the first picks. I'll tell you a gaping hole in their game.As a side note, it's fully justified why he focused solely on his health.Carson Palmer should be left in until he proves he shouldn't be left in.

It's really as simple as that. There's only a handful of QBs who shouldn't be removed for any reason and he's one of them.McCown is an interesting pick because the Ravens have had such a hard time doing anything to defend the pass. Cousins has his work cut out of him if Atlanta gets ahead and forces him to throw dangerous passes.

I lean towards McCown to play it safe(r).No. 

Manning is averaging 12.8 PPG and Mariota is averaging 19.0

If I owned Manning I wouldn't start him unless things changed drastically.

Or, maybe you should start him because fuck the stats, his name is Peyton Manning which is worth 30 points weekly all by itself.I would just stick with Wilson. The chance he gives you a goose egg is almost nil while Taylor has played poorly enough to give you one despite his gaudy stats. 

I mean, I like Taylor and I'd take him over a lot of other QBs, but the reason you own Wilson is consistency. There aren't many people I would take Peyton over and amazingly in 2015 his brother is better.

Neither are performing all that well and since both have really favourable matchups, I would go with Eli. Peyton's had 2 week-losing efforts, Eli just 1. I can't risk Peyton.

For your 2nd team I would go with Tyrod. He's got a higher ceiling and hasn't had any letdown games...yet...he's well overdue.Don't overthink it with Brees. He's healthy, you took him in the 4th or 5th for a reason, just use him from here on out unless he magically sucks or gets hurt.Well there are reasons - you could play matchups, but as I just said to someone else, Wilson is the model of consistency and I value that highly in weekly formats. 

Smith actually did quite well vs the Bengals last week, but he's not as good as Wilson and didn't close it out. Cutler vs KC could do what Dalton did, but Forte could do what the RBs did. I think Bortles is probably gonna get 12-16 points. Wilson should get that as his bottom end.Hmm. Cutler is a serious boom/bust play and even if he goes off, he might score what Dalton has been averaging. 

I like Seattle's D, but they're also on the road. I think Seattle can hurt Dalton and shut him down, which also makes him a boom/bust. It's just his ceiling is higher.

Dalton.Brees. Keep him in there now that he's back. Especially with your PPC scoring. He's always prepared to carry his team.Wow, pressure is on. Gotta pick the right guy in that matchup.

Their PPG has been indistinguishable this year and Buffalo has been a sieve and Tennessee has been alright vs QBs. 

What worries me about Mariota is that the Bills are so talented and well-coached that they could really fool the young QB...and the same could be said about the Titans doing it to Taylor.

All things being equal, the only difference is that the Bills are giving up nearly 20 PPG and Mariota averages 19 PPG while the Titans have given up 14.3 PPG to QBs and Taylor is averaging 19.3Tough. I'm backing away from Rawls with Fred coming back. Blount at a minimum should get goal-line looks. It's his favourite wise-cracking alienI was big on Abdullah this year because I thought there was an opening in Detroit for an RB like that to have a big role, but they've been so god-awful that he's a luxury when they have a RB necessity. Make sense?

Hillman should keep a big role, but you never know. If I were the Lions I would be using Riddick, not Abdullah. 

If it tells you anything, I've dropped Abdullah outright in most of my leagues and even used him to get Hillman.Interesting.

My odd man out is CJ0.5k because of the possibility of a role reduction, while Gordon looks better every week.

Hill does have a tough matchup, but they really need him this week so Dalton doesn't have to win it on his arm vs Seattle's secondary. Then again, I was wrong about the Bengals last week - I thought for sure they'd throw on KC because they could murder them and they held back. Forsett is almost too perfect: they need to run and Cleveland lives to allow the run. 

He's a must-start, but the karma is bad here. It's like gambling - when you're on a streak, you ride it until it runs out.

It's as simple as that.

Freeman.I truly have no idea what the truth is about the RB situation in Washington, so I would be very careful. You'll kick yourself if Jones goes in there and breaks off an 80 yard TD (very possible vs ATL), but it sounds like he's not going to get many snaps. 

I hate to trade TD opportunities for PPR opportunities, but I'd go with the two situational backs and sit Hill. Gio and Duke. 

Sometimes you can't ask for advice here, but advice you can live with. In your case, I think you want to "live with" the PPR guys knowing that if it fails it was at least the most prudent wager.&gt; Am I insane for wanting to start Gio and Hill?

No and in fact I nearly recommended it to the person I just said Gio to.

I get why you're reticent to start Cooper, but he's really your FLEX play here just due to talent. If I could go back and do it all over again, I'd just "plug and play" - "set it and forget it" and leave him in for the prior weeks I took him out. The whole offense flows through him. 

After I'm done giving advice here I have to look at several leagues and decide if I'm keeping Murray in there or not. NO have allowed 3 of 4 corps to get over 100 yards and they've all had at least 22 carries. I like his team's usage, but I'm not sure about his.

Seattle just hasn't given up many points to the RB position, but if the Bengals want to win, I think they need to run it a lot. If you're PPR go Gio, if not hope Hill gets a TD on the 1.Since you didn't say how many, I'll rank them:

1. Hillman - I think he's going to be allowed to continue carrying his momentum forward again this week

2. Rawls - I don't love this with Fred back, but he does have a chance to see a lot of snaps

3. Cooks - I just don't like him until he shows that he and Brees are getting back on the same page&gt; I know it's bad.

LOL

Due to PPR, I'm gonna say Chris and Hillman. If Chris gets snaps, he ought to do really well. IMO, he should be the #1 guy there. I read that he's going to have 35% of the snaps. Which, if True is probably what CJA will get, but without those PPR points.

Hillman just needs to go. He's your hass. Ride that hoss.I'm glad you grabbed Michael (or were able to), but at least give it a week to see. You're going in blind.

Andrews is the same thing. Until TEN decides who their guy is, trust no one. 

I don't know what Andre will do...if anything. 

Which leaves you Duke. Least bad option there. You can't trust CJA's role right now. At least with Hill you know he'll have goal to go snaps despite Seattle being good and very desperate.Very simple to me, Hillman. He's playing the best football right now and ought to have the meatiest role.Leave CJ0.5k there, his job is about to evaporate. I would take Doug as a desperation pick, but I like Woodhead to be busy this week because of how the Steelers blitz. He's good vs that sort of stuff. More snaps = more opportunities. I'm a Mets fan and I didn't even go into the thread because I knew it was gonna be ugly and I like the Dodgers.

Let's not let this shitty umpiring define the series. I'm over it. I thought about "if he was out, Adrian gets a leadoff double in the next inning" and I didn't know if that was just as bad or not.&gt; FA's are full of lies.

I thought it was angst and nougat.His personal sphere needs new friends. 

If you know someone whose finger is on the pulse of society and thinks that way it's time to reevaluate what sort of toxic people you're letting influence you.Yeah but by calling yourself a feminist you are creating a concept that these lunatics can latch onto by co-opting the legitimacy of equal rights.

That's why I support civil rights. That specifically states that it's about *nothing* identifiable - not race, gender, religion, sexuality - none of it. It's simply about equality. 

-isms and identity politics pick winners and losers. Civil rights elevates the losers to being winners. It's a shame we've given up on MLK's dream for this social justice divisiveness and identity politics.I have owned so many earphones for my mobile devices over the years.

My MMG30 set is the only one that doesn't get tangled or knotted.

While I still think Sony have 10/10 comfortable earbuds for in-ear headphones, they get tangled and wear out and have cable/jacket separation. 

Anyway, from a former life doing audio production, I will also say their microphones. If you ever had to track down something with noise, hum or whatever? It wasn't the mic if it was a Sennheiser. I'm sitting here wearing a 15yo Adidas shirt right now that still looks pretty damn good.

The thing about Adidas is that they'll pay the extra couple of cents to make a product that lasts. I went jogging wearing my shoes from 2006 the other night. And I used to wear them daily. 

That's just silly. Yeah I'm gonna fuckin' scream if Kuhl ever sells out. 

Their pants are like Carhartt, except comfortable.I'm not sure heavy vehicle suspensions are supposed to last 100,000 miles dudeBeing a Devils fan helps.Terry Allen was a goal line battering ram.

Larry Centers was the ultimate pass-catching back and should be in the HoF.

Reed was a bit of an anomaly as teams tried to contain CC.

Braxton is a guy who ought to get more recognition. He was a solid safety. He and Atwater were one of the best duos at the position; very unheralded. What's funny is that their analysis is just complete garbage and CC still bought them anyway. It really drives home the point about how some players are best just doing what they're told because they don't get it.

I can't believe he paid for that, but as has been said some of the raw stats should have been done by Stats Inc or whatever for the public.Now you understand why teammates get into fights with one another. No, dude. Burned.

There's no chance his eyebrows burn.It's truly hilarious to me that she thought that was a good idea.

Either people have always hated her for no reason or she brings this on herself. I'd buy it to use it as he uses it, but if you get into an accident in that, you're gonna be sorry.

There's a common notion that young people think they're invincible and maybe you do or don't - I have no idea. But that car's not invincible. It's a piece of shit deathtrap. It's 22 years old. In an accident with a vehicle of today, that car will fold up and die with you inside. 

It's like all of these people who want e30 M3s as a DD. You want to track it? Best car ever. Driving in public and you get into a crash? Good luck.

For $6500 on a DD and something that's fun, I'd get a Subaru. Good reasoning is quantifiable because it's objective, honest and unbiased. You acknowledge pros and cons.


Intellectual honesty is the root of good reasoning. You can always be mistaken, but proper thinking is good reasoning. Reasonable people are wrong all the time. Unreasonable people are belligerent. I'm kind of just posting this as a personal reminder to me, but Bradford's throws are progressively behind the WR, especially when they're doing a cut and moving right.

That INT makes perfect sense because the Saints saw it and adjusted.Speaking of "behind the WR", Brees? Dat arm strength. The DB actually caught up to Cooks who had to slow down. Hey Philly WRs - slow down for your QB's throws when they're late.HAHAHAHA

Tell me more, fancy infographic, tell me moreKamar Aiken is Flacco's Dark Knight - he's not the deep threat Flacco needs, but he's the deep threat Flacco deserves.

That'll do, pig. That'll do.You know why Wright seems to have taken a step this year?

Upfield blocking. That was a beauty.When I watch Hurns make his moves, one word comes to mind: violence.I reiterate my "upfield blocking" comment in regards to Sankey as well. So nice. These are *the Bills* they're doing it to.Great commentary - that wasn't Martin being great, that's 99% busted playNow *that* is a great individual effort by MartinThere was nothing but Packers where he threw itThe thing I hate about those pick penalties is how inconsistent they are from crew to crewSam "Behind the receiver" BradfordI knew it was bad when he went down because it didn't seem appropriate for the play. 

Sucks. Lions fans patience with Stafford is Jesus-likeBest defense in the NFL?

Two stud CBs?

Amari don't care.OAK 7 DEN 3 in the 2nd

Things no one would have believed in August?This constipation/opioid commercial is fucking surreal.

Why did he take the underneath route that wasn't at the first down marker?!?Cute tryTom Brady hasn't been on his back this much since his first date with GiseleThis is finally what we've waited to see from BrownJohnson does all the work, other Johnson gonna get the credit with a goal-line TD?

EDIT: yupEverywhere there are fantasy owners going "Damn, wrong Johnson"Generally speaking when I watch football, I can tell the play for the offense before the snap.

With the Lions, I really have no idea what they're going to do.

And I don't mean that in a good way. Because I don't think they know, either.This is just sad nowWhat can Brown do for you?

Apparently snatch TDs out of the air.Tom "The Vulture" BradySince when is it Cat An Zare Oh anyway?

I thought it was Cat An Czar OhI like the play concept there but the ball was a hot air balloon thereThe Lions are like the Penguin meme today

* Get a great return at an opportune time

* Have it called back by a flagLet's see some Manning Magic here

EDIT: well it looks like his spell explodedMan, Weeden had Chandler Jones wide open but couldn't make the connectionI'm ridin' the Riddick train

Choo choo

/yeah I know what I saidCome on Lions, they're gonna play soft D with 54 seconds left. Do something.

EDIT: ^^^sigh...Just speaking generally, CJ0.5k has been a breath of fresh air this year. It seems like his mental preparation has finally caught up to his physical gifts. Every time he runs I like what he's doing. No more "cutting it outside no matter what" and dancing around. He's seeing the defense for the first time in his career and winning with his mind and not just his legs.That tackling is revoltingIt's interesting to note that the people who support this course of action would call you a "bleeding heart liberal" for even challenging their wrongdoing.Can you lend me a few bucks?

"How much you need?"

About ~~tree fiddy~~ $96,481&gt; I agree, it seems the medical staff should be disbarred

The county should have known to hire MDs rather than JDs.

"What, you mean Juris Doctor isn't the same thing?"

Well, at least they didn't hire PhDs.They need to expand that Heisman Infographic from earlier in the game to compare what Woodson has done to ManningNice second effort whether he gets it or notBob, Bob, Bob, Bob, Bob and Bob&gt;I've been busy recently and haven't really been active in r/ragenchastain. 

Neither has she...metaI think she would have written better and been error-free. &gt; I'd just as soon get the digest version from reading bob mcbobs summaries of what she's spouting.

Praise red boxes of text. Saves me from having to feel ill from embarrassment for her by reading more than a few words of her self-induced humiliation.I like that they are open and up-front about referring to it as a con.There's someone who is often cited (and I've commented about him before) - I want to say he's attached to a university in Ontario and does these.

He is completely full of shit. These doctors ought to be put under review for their irresponsible behaviour.

You can be born the wrong physical gender and doctors make you wait forever to get that corrected surgically, but if you're fat you can just pay like it's a nose job or something cosmetic?

I don't think so.&gt; I feel like a bad person

So did I, and then I realised I wasn't bamboozling emotionally fragile overweight people to lie about every aspect of my life in a quest to defraud them with an IRONMAN and remembered what truly bad people are.No matter what she will claim victory over herself and her detractors.

Also maybe we'll hear about all of the encouragement she got from people who worshipped her at the race because she's "one of them" - no more conflict from Ragen. Nosireebob_mcbob - she is living fat acceptance in her mind. 

She's basically Ellen Burstyn's character from Requiem For A Dream at this point. Well this is getting out of hand nowThey were softening up the Lions with the Johnsons so Ellignton could get hisYou ever have a dream that's also a nightmare?

I can imagine Lions fans dreaming "man, imagine if we had an offense that was normal and just used Theo Riddick to run normal plays and gain a few yards" and then you go to sleep at night and your dream is what they actually do. It's one of those confusing dreams that makes no sense. You want to wake up, but you just have to endure it until it's over.

That's how I feel before the game and now waiting for quadruple zeroes on the clock.I've never wanted a beige truck, but that beige Tacoma looks pretty goodDude, Cardinals. Stop throwing. I don't know what your obsession is with reaching 50 points in a game but let it go.Wow, nice play!Lions fans, I've officially seen enough of Joe Lombardi.We've reached Madden Time where they've got Taylor in so that all RBs on your team can get a TDTony Romo can't get back soon enoughWow that's great, but neither of those examples have jack shit to do with what happened in Seattle.DAE think there's a giant Microsoft Surface tablet under that hood and it's being hidden from us because they're afraid Apple will make a 42" iPad?I don't think we thought they'd go 0-5, but we thought they would struggle with a brutal schedule.

What we didn't think was that Detroit would look that bad going 0-5

Because the rest of the schedule after this is winnable, but only to a team that's playing well. Unnecessary Roughness?

Unnecessary Blitz is more like it.

Let's wrap this up. Come on.In a year of disappointing kickers, there's Gostkowski and there's everybody elseIs your team ahead by 2 with 2 minutes left?

Oh no, gonna play Prevent and lose the game.

Ahead by 5+ touchdowns?

Blitz on every play.

Shouldn't those be reversed?It has been tough. The Raiders really took it to the Broncos RBsI dunno why he keeps picking on Chung, dude is on point this set of downsDenver, you are the best team in the NFL

(at winning ugly)Brandon Weeden ought to take some advice from 12-year olds at this pointDude, I make my eggs with oil in a wok and I'm white. I have a setup of a pot of oil (usually hot) next to my wok, I ladle in the oil with my wok spatula, spread it around and pour it out and then put my eggs in the wok with no flame. I swirl them around until they set and then...

* scramble them

-or-

* fold them and make a paper-thin omelette. 

Butter is just for taste, but not with scrambled or omelettes. You want oil. If I'm feeling different I use 50-50 olive oil and butter, but not usually. Butter is best for regular fried eggs because it's salty and adds flavour. Scrambled eggs or omelettes usually have something else to add flavour.

All I can say is that if you use oil with scrambled eggs, you will never need a nonstick pan and the same goes for an omelette. I don't own any nonstick cookware and my omelettes never break or tear because I use oil as you do.Ouch. Sorry Johnny.That's why they're better this year than last year. When they win close games they look confident.Push with Bush?

Push push in the Bush. In honour of Al Michaels, the "Push Push In The Bush" song:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1PmX1xcCjfMWestern PA livin'Come on SF...oh wait, the fans expected thatDwayne Hair-usRagen, let me make those questions "bashing" for you:

* Besides referring to a fat, disgusting piece of shit human being who is worthless and should kill themselves; an Alaskan dog

* Like Chubby Chasers, Plumper Humpers and other disgusting men, this word also refers to a ship's direction

I'm already bored. 

YOU'RE BORING US RAGEN. TRY HARDER. I AM NOT ENTERTAINED. THE LESBIAN ANGLE IS WEAK AND BORING.

Those are what insults look like. Then again, that's all you and your followers hear regardless of what is said.The only thing I agree with is that you have very little control.I just read her Jeopardy thing and I think she's self-deluded enough to stretch anything into anything.That replay angle really says a lot. Beckham knew he needed to adjust his comeback route to help his QB in trouble, kept the location of the CB in his radar (literally) and saved a busted play.Hyde or Celek, take your pick.The real hero of that scoring drive was the ticky tack PI that put the Niners on the 15Snee looks really strange with a defined neck and facial featuresSay what you will about "SNF duds" but this game got better as it went along and the subplot of Hayne and Whitlock have been pretty cool.He'd totally let his clock expire with 2 seconds to goIt was that or Dick ToiletWHATEVER YOU DO, DON'T GIVE HIM A CORTISONE INJECTIONThe dreaded double-barrel hammy aggravation I don't know why they abandoned the run, periodHerbert the Pervert has some advice for Odell Beckham on the sideline:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Vz8qh_l0BWA&amp;feature=youtu.be&amp;t=5Ok, we need another OT game.

What's the record?Well the reality is that you should tear those pages out of the playbook since there's no time working on them with backupsSince we feel bad for that PI call, we'll give you 3 seconds. Are we even now?Pot, meet giant mixing bowlMakeup call?&gt; some theoretical superiority of Coleman

This has never been an objective assessment, just wishful thinking by his delusional owners.

Going back to last year it was clear what Freeman could do. If you watched their games it's clear who the more experienced back is.

Coleman owners are like people arguing for Terrance Williams to be the #1 guy when Dez Bryant returns. It's retarded. It's detached from reality.I never planned to sell Freeman. I have said since August that it's his job.I did close to 50 leagues and while I don't have an exact count, I'd say I had JC in at least a dozen of them. 

The only handcuff I took was Knile Davis, but I started dropping him last week and this week (what timing, eh?) and my karma destroyed Jamaal's knee and I apologise. 

However, if I had him I think I would waive him for West.

Knile Davis has always had really deceptive stats because he'll rush 5 times for 3 yards per carry and once for 15 and people go "wow, he averaged 5.0 YPC" but it's not True. He doesn't work like that. I don't really think he's a very effective back. 

Of course I will change my target of West if the news changes leading up to Tuesday waivers, but I'm fairly confident West will be the guy with most of the work there and at least marginally ownable. 

I don't have a huge amount of evidence to say "Oh, West" - only what I saw today which was that he was alright on short notice. He obviously needs more time working with the first team offense and knowing the playbook, which is why Davis could have an opening, but he's really better than Knile from a talent standpoint.I have...I want to say 2 teams in the top 1% of all ESPN and they both have JC.

I will bet you that he appears among the top 3 players on teams who are 5-0 or in the top whatever percent of all teams.If you can only pick one, go with West.

If you have to rank them both, rank West higher.

In a similar amount of work, West looks to be better and more stable. Davis could get short yardage and goal line work due to his size, but the overall more versatile back is West.Perhaps. I'd wager the majority of teams who are winning leagues have Rodgers, Gronkowski and or some WRs - however the WRs who are the best might be ones like James Jones who were undrafted.

I know this: in nearly 50 leagues, whether I went 0RB or not, my teams are successful because of late round and waiver wire picks, not my initial strategy in the first 2-3 picks. 

I have teams which are heavy on RB and are doing fine. 

Would you like to see the roster of my best team, which is the top 1% of all teams on ESPN?

QB: Ryan, Roethlisberger, Newton

RB: Charles, Freeman, Bell, Foster, Ellington

WR: Maclin, James Jones, Hurns

TE: Clay, Olsen, Julius Thomas

DST: Giants (streaming)

K: Gostkowski

I mean, I'm pretty much 0WR there and have had Bell suspended and dealt with Big Ben being injured. And before anyone asks - I know how to auction. I have a dozen teams similar to this.

You tell me. I have no WRs at all. RB seems pretty valuable to me, provided you get the right ones.Do you have the capability of backward time travel?

No?

Crap.

He's just there to waste a spot on your bench until told otherwise.He looked like crap, TBH. I owned him in a few leagues going into this week and I will have zero problems waiving him outright for whoever replaces  Jamaal Charles or...pretty much anything.

A lot of people shit on Sankey, but all I see from the Titans are their RBs getting flushed out to the edges looking for holes that don't appear. It doesn't say anything about Andrews' talent vs McCluster's vs Sankey's or whatever, but of the O-line. I don't trust them to get the RB position right and when it does go right, I'd say your odds are 40-Andrews/40-Sankey/20-McCluster percent you guess the right guy.

&gt;but did catch about 50 yds

You can't predict garbage yards. From a statistical analysis standpoint you are giving that too much weight. In context...if I were a bookie giving you odds on a prop bet for "garbage time yards for an RB in the passing game", I'd have to do like 5-1 which is 20%

When you figure he's maybe 40% to get work and of that 40% he's got 1-5 odds to get garbage passing yards...I...how do you win there? You just plug and pray. There's no educated advice to give and you're way overplaying your Andrews hand here. Don't come here looking for a circlejerk over your picking the dude when you ought to be begging for a dose of reality to bring you back down to earth.

/downvote away Andrews owners (if you can reach the keyboard from patting yourselves on the back)&gt; he will alternate between 8 point weeks and 18+ point weeks

So far he's 5, 20, 18, 8 and 6. By the rotation it looks like next week is 19! Prepare the "Manning's Back!!!" circlejerk thread! Alert the moderators to schedule it for a week from now!It's explainable - he's throwing ducks. His velocity is all over the place. 

His receivers have to worry about getting blown up because the balls aren't arriving on time.Dalton and Tyrod are still unowned in a lot of leagues. If it came down to it, I would waive him for either of those guys. Not only that, but Glen Campbell made it sound so lonely.This guy sounds peeved. Maybe they use a bot like those /r/offmychest wackosIt's not the $10, it's the principle.

I can afford the $10. IDGAF about $10. I don't want an advantage that other people who are price-sensitive/conscious don't have.

When I think of some kid who's saved up his money to make what is a relatively major purchase of $60, that extra $10 might be another week's allowance and he's behind everyone who gets out of the gate and grinds. I guess he could catch up if he saved his money? But you lose that whole first week.

It's always about "you", dude.

EDIT: To add, before you or anyone else say anything, I owned two video game stores. I've sold more games than I can count. Price matters to a lot of people.Nowandthen?I would say that at some point the novelty would wear off and you'd see a doctor, but apparently we've yet to reach that yet.&gt;Anyone know how to make this in a crock pot and taste exactly like the ones at an indian resturant?

'tis impossible

Even the sauce is not a slow-cooked sauce. It's all "instant" food. The only "slow cooking" is the chicken marinade in your fridge. 

Without the benefit of a tandoori oven, the best I can tell you is to do this:

Get a ceramic pizza stone and put some foil on it and put it in your oven under high broil until the oven is 500F

Take your chicken that's in small bits and put it on a metal skewer. Put it under the broiler and turn it to cook it. Once it starts to char, it's done on that side. 

Make the sauce instantly: you need garlic and ginger (in a paste if lazy) and then equal parts cream and tomato. That's it. If you want it spicy, add in red chili oil. 

The chicken simply gets tossed in the sauce. It pretty much defeats the purpose because you're not trying to get tender chicken that falls apart, you want flashed heat that sears it and seals it all in.

It's really no trouble. As I said in my main post, it takes a few minutes at most to completely cook it under a broiler in the oven. I don't think that's bronzer, I think that's genuine leather. What does she think, fat is just attached to your insides like plaque waiting to be roto rootered out?

That's your high cholesterol diet, dear.If you have an Aldi near you, they have a special purchase standalone model for $29 right now. Even makes rice.&gt; I pooped water in the end.

So sly.Or...or...stay with me here:

* You could shake some powdered parmesan cheese on the grease and make it extra yummy

Or...wait, there's more...

* You just not eat pizza because it's a carb/fat-heavy calorie bomb of 200-300 calories **per fucking slice of it**

Yeah, you might save 2 pounds and gain 28 instead of 30. If you care about your weight, pizza is just about the worst goddamned thing you can choose to stuff down your gullet. I think about that picture of the two women with the table-sized pizza who are guzzling straight from the 2L bottles of cola - must be genetics!&gt; Of course I am sure one under the influence of FA would miss that message entirely and substitute their own.

If you put green peppers on it, their skins are indigestible which burns calories. Pizza burns calories! The more you eat, the more you'll burn!I think what they're getting at is that good restaurants don't cut corners with part-skim mozzarella and use fattier cheese and the meats on it are very greasy.I don't eat Dominoes and maybe it's them or Pizza Hut, but one of them actually greases their pans in butter oil to crisp the crust. How do you dab that?They stopped giving sex tips after their readership stopped having sex.Or they're illiterate. Sam was really disappointed when he learned his name wasn't "Felcher"The showers were the only place the Patriots and Scott Pioli hadn't bugged.It's not companies, it's self-sponsorship. You gotta make your own way. Your degree helps as does your French and English fluency, but you need those years of work experience in your field to pump up your point score for immigration.

It'll take a few years. It's faster to come do postgraduate work and work in your field. Flipping your student visa to a job or permanent residency is easier and likely faster than waiting for your own sponsorship.He should be prone to saying it your way anyway as the word native to him is pronounced "toe-maht" - all he'd need to do is add the "oh" and his native word is the Queen's English!I live in a place more to the left than Bernie Sanders and adjacent to where he's from (Quebec borders Vermont) and all of these things work fine here.

We have a high minimum wage (relative to our cost of living) and virtually no one makes it anyway. Only kids working at McDo make it - stuff like that. Our college is ridiculously cheap, but you also get paid bursaries to go. We regulate costs, which would need to happen in the US along with medical and drug prices. 

It works.Yeah, one thing I disagree with Bernie on is repatriating foreign income. It's already been taxed once abroad where it was made. If BMW makes money in the USA, they pay US taxes here as they should. They don't then pay additional German tax on what they made here.

Republicans talk about simplifying the tax code, but it should be for corporations to remove all of the loopholes.

&gt;and that corporations can and do relocate operations to such countries.

If I went back into business for myself, I wouldn't incorporate in the USA and I would do my best to avoid doing business there because of tax laws. If they fixed them? Fine. As it stands now? No.I always think of two things when I see these.

One, there should be a federal law that allows people to dissolve the HOA if there's a majority wanting to get out. That way the HOA would then have to work for the good of all. If it was too oppressive, the HOA would disappear altogether.

The second is that places that have laws about upkeep don't have/need them. Those laws should supersede HOAs as well. If your community has a law to keep your lawn orderly, shovel your sidewalk of snow or not keep broken down vehicles on your grass, what do you need a HOA to do?

I can understand strata/condo associations needing more say because of common walls, hallways, etc. But you should still not hang your laundry on your balcony./r/raisedbynarcissists

Someone find these kids and send them there.

"I'm punishing my kids to support my own opinions and to have power over them."Fat money spends just as well as thin money.I wonder about the legality of this and if it's why she's stalling. Maybe she's saying she's starting her long run so we can't say "you don't look very flustered after such a long run"

As it always goes with Ragen, things are ambiguous and they don't mean what we think she's said.&gt; and a not particularly expressive face?

This is a woman who can talk for 2 minutes without blinking&gt; She claimed at the beginning that taking a selfie is a "reward" for finishing a workout

So she's been eating them.So wait a minute - this person is harassing you via PM and wants to report *you* for harassment?

Further proof that fatlogic is nothing more than fat narcissism. 

If anything people who send threatening PMs should have their messages screencapped and posted everywhere to show others what they're doing.If you do things to try and evoke a reaction out of people, at least be accountable for doing it. When I do things to challenge people I'm at least aware of what I'm doing. 

Anyway, I do agree that she's doing well to define beauty standards. By me seeing her, my standards have moved their goalposts and she doesn't meet them. Now I don't think bodycon dresses are sexy, but only sexy in certain contexts. I have to say that Tevin Coleman speculators have been the most obnoxious football phenomenon since 2013 Broncos fans and any news that makes Freeman sound better is poetic karma that I welcome.

Check yourselves.A good start would be stopping downvoting people who are trying to tell you the truth despite it not suiting your opinion.

No amount of downvoting or wishful thinking is going to make the Falcons use him, ok?

Calm your collective nuts and throw some upvotes around to make up for the people who had downvote tantrums.This is all irrelevant as it's a simple math problem: 25% of 25 carries isn't enough for him be useful or reliable.&gt; I'm under the impression that Coleman is superior in talent to Freeman

I don't know why people keep saying that. 

Coleman is superior in *height* to Freeman. Which, if you weigh at least 220-240 is alright.

Both are just under 210 and Freeman is supposedly about 5'10" and Coleman is 6'1". 

6'1"/205 is the size of a WR, not an RB. 6'1" and 240 is a bruising back. He needs to bulk up because he's not going to win leverage being too tall to get low and underneath anyone.

Potential talent? Freeman is playing almost flawless football. Coleman is inexperienced. Maybe he gets to 100% of his potential. Freeman is there.LOL at the downvotes. You're right. OP took that quote out of context. It was only True for a short period of time. Before they said that, they said Freeman was the starter. Then they said it was an open competition.

Using only the quotes that suit your argument is dishonest and unhelpful here.I think you're both right in your own way.

I'm not a Falcons fan, only someone who watches every game and has no emotional investment or opinion in anyone. I am completely neutral and agnostic and will use whoever is the best bet. I have no attachment to anything other than reality.

Freeman (like Ryan) have both taken a big step forward.

In August I wanted to go into your subreddit and say "yo, the Falcons are for real this year" after watching your preseason games...but you guys already had it covered. All I could do was reflect it in the /r/nfl power rankings (which I did) and go from there.

What we've seen is both Ryan and Freeman take a HUGE step forward to the next level which is why these close 4th quarter games don't make me nervous. Ryan is there. And so is Freeman.

Which is why /u/IceMaine is right as well - last year's assessment, especially the inside running? He wasn't there. But he's shedding first contact or just outrunning it. He's hitting the right hole every time. He's better than Alfred Morris because Alfred takes longer to pick his hole. Freeman knows where it's going to be before it happens. He's unconscious right now. He's just completely different this year.

The only thing he can't fix is being small. He's at his maximum muscle for his body. All he can do is add fat, which would slow him down.Heathus savesLove us or hate us, at least we're entertainingI like that call. We can beat the Chargers DBs deep because aerodynamics will slow them down due to their massive hair.I get the feeling he or DeA willPretty good. I hear he'll be evolving to Raittaochu once they figure out how to make their logo into Thunder Stones.They saw the zone and split it right to Gates.

Veteran vision.We show the same thing, they do the same thing.

Again, these guys have a mental link.Not that Jarvis could cover Gates, but that's an obvious thing to audible to.Bell couldn't win. Two people to block coming from different directions. Only one Bell.Thank You Teo for being slow and letting us have positive yards instead of negativeSan Diego. You can beat us. Don't make mistakes. Don't commit stupid penalties.That play was a great example of a disguise - we make it look like everyone is covered except for Gordon, but we kept a bracket over him expecting him to get the dumpoff and he did.Huh? We came out in the wildcatYeah that penalty on the punt return was very helpfulIT WAS RAINING LIGHTNING BOLTS IN THERE MIKEWE GOT ZAPPED, MIKEBecause we need this win badlyNow keep doing that exact same play until we win.I was gonna say Bell ought to get flagged there...That's right, Mike. Gruden is wrong. Brown should not have made a move at all.I've wondered for a long time what it would take to get refs to call that one and apparently it's fighting for the catch.

You're supposed to give a "halo" around the guy of 2 yards and no one even ever gets called on that. This is one of the worst-enforced penalties, although they got it 100% right that time.With Allen out, San Diego can throw to their Allen over the middle. Or Stevie.Even though Rivers welcomes the blitz, I'm nervous that we're not abandoning it despite it working.Timmons on Inman?!?

Great vision Rivers.PA attitude&gt; Theyre like misquitos.

Is that a quito that is improper?Native San Diegan here: you are given a choice as a child - masochism or freedomPhysically we can beat San Diego up front, but if we keep doing this they can run blitz us from the edge and we're boned.Oh hey more penalties

EDIT: the team that wants to win should let the other team get all of the flagsOMG REFS AND PLAYERS WOULD ALL FUCK OFF WITH THE PENALTIES AND PLAY FOOTBALLLOL he likes Cock(rell)Holy shit guys, this redditor has real-life friends.

What are you, a wizard?You lost a SB to a team that lost a playoff game to TebowSo a half-fullback?

I propose we call it an optimistback.I hate how those terrorists always have awesome Toyota 4x4s like the HiluxYeah Jon because Vick isn't known for his progression skills, but his "staring down his target" skills.It also needs beaches and beautiful people to be on them.That wasn't a huge play, but it was one of the best cutback runs by anyone in the NFL this year.Bell using all the trigger buttons on his controller for that runIngram shoots in the hole

(ha ha)ITT: lack of SkyCam consensusYeah but Verrett has been on Brown like glue all night.Wow so I guess that SC job is gonna be open after all.

GL Steve.If he keeps making them, I propose we call him by his actual name due to earning itSo...does this mean we should all bother learning this PK's name?Holy shit we pushed that guy right into Rivers!San Diego should have challenged that. It wasn't too vague to overturn.Teo's slowness is actually helping him because Brown and now Bell can't juke him because he isn't quick enough to get out of their way when he falls for the move!Man no one could get a hand on him and slow him downSan Diego's average starting position has to be like the 10 yard line by nowTuitt can do two guys at once

/nastyTomlin managing the clock properly?

Chargers first down confirmed.That was the first time Rivers was able to connect with Allen on a crossing route during the blitz.Your son's a RB?

You didn't even say he's the best ever?

No fatherly pride?

No Gruden bluster?

Man, he must *really suck*Harrison was looking pick 6Eventually?That Lambo is pulling to the leftI think that in situations like that, there's zero cause for celebration.Wow...we got a turnover?Man, I'm really looking forward to us taking advantage of this field position and driving down to FG range and then throwing deep on 3rd down after losing enough yardage to make the kick impossible and punting again.Down inside the 5. Where Rivers feels most at home.I love how Dupree made the flappy hands as if it would make him fly to RiversRight as Dupree made that sack, my Mets just got a 3-run homer from CespedesWe'd be down by 4, except it would be 31-27Bell if you see Teo bracketing you, RUN PAST HIM. He can't turn around and follow or jump to deflect a pass over his head!Deja vu!That should be flag illegal man upfieldWe should show up in Steelers gear for the other two games and yell "HEEEATH" the whole timeOnly us melting down can melt down steel beamsYou shouldn't care what butthurt people think.Casa Guadalajara?

Fidel's in Solana Beach FTWVick was serious about believing he was a Charger there with that throwYo Keenan, you need to see a better barber. What's up with those scabs?666?

Hail Satan!If yellow flags are your sexual fetish, you are probably about to explode from sexual tensionThat woman has impressive molesPED withdrawal.I had to rewind my PVR just to watch Rivers rise up from the bottom of my screen. I don't know why I found that so amusing, but I did.How do you let Gates get that much separation on a blitz? He has to throw EARLYIf you are asking for statistics: Fantasy football is not a science. Like economics it's science-y, but it's also an art.

If you are asking whose opinions are most right and why: there's an art to it, which is intuition and that's certainly not scientific

There are no experts. There are only professional guesses.This game...I couldn't even fully enjoy that TD because of fear of the flag being on us since they have been so capricious.We're one pump chumpsFlowers needs to get a weave. He can't cover without hair extensions.If you hear the crowd and it's really loud, the Steelers did well. If you hear the crowd and it's quiet, the Chargers did well.Former San Diegan Adrian Gonzalez just homered. LAD 4 NYM 10Unzips...go on...No Jon, I love rugbyAfter a few of those middle throws to Gates you'd think someone would raise a hand and try to deflect it/r/Showerthoughts - Malcom Floyd should be allowed to wear all-pink like DeAngelo wanted and he could be Pink FloydMaybe if they both gain 90 pounds we can arrange thatSC about SC and SCThe girlfriend might be imaginary, but the pain is realIf you're a Raiders fan, watching DHB with us has to...not compute. At least it stopped the clock?That was "timely"We're lucky Wheaton didn't get called for holding there.I'd throw that play SD has used to Gates right here and try to run it in from 20 outPlease reset the game clock to 6 secondsThese officials suck. They missed obvious holding on Wheaton during the Vick run and they failed to remember to reset the clock to 6 seconds.Helmet to helmet dudeOh my heartI love that cameraman in the red. So San Diego:

* Shortie over long sleeved T-shirt

* Floral type of surf print

* Tan

* Sun bleached hairYou couldn't overturn that.IS THIS THE REAL LIFEI HEREBY BAN BANNING UPVOTE PARTY BANSThe people who get audited are the ones who take every possible damned deduction. 

Look - if you don't feel comfortable right now, just buy it. Keep everything from the purchase and re-file your taxes to get money back once you know it's alright. I watched Tomlin's presser and that was like the 3rd question he was asked and he said he didn't know/care and seemed annoyed. 

In the late 80's/early 90's I used to play fantasy football with a guy from Seattle whose dad was the clock operator for the Seahawks and his dad got fired for doing something similar. When they talk about "hometown" vs "visiting" clock...according to him these guys know what they're doing and the officials need to watch them otherwise they'll just do whatever. 

Now look, it could just be an honest mistake, but according to my friend Mike, his dad did this shit all the time. The teams knew it, everyone in the league knew it, but as long as it wasn't egregious it was part of the game. If you let it lapse that long it's on the officials to fix or catch. They didn't. They didn't even reset the clock on the 2nd to last play with the penalty after it ran down to 5 seconds. 

It's an interesting game of politics for the NFL because if they demand the Chargers fire the guy, they are also admitting the officials weren't keeping time as they are supposed to do. If they just say "it was an error", this clock operator will have gotten away with it. And don't tell me it's a mistake. It's their god damned only job. How convenient. 

Also Mike was amazing. He'd down a pitcher of beer and then ride his sportbike home. Never crashed, never got a DUI. I'm not sure how I'm supposed to feel here.

SBNation are owned by Vox Media, who suck ass.

Deadspin are Gawker, who are cancer.

And the NFL are being assholes and Goodell is a dildo.He had just done the ESPN interview right before that and she grabbed him while he was already on the way outDem penalties doeHe's got "Tevin Coleman Syndrome"IMO, Jason Witten is the best TE the NFL has ever seen (by a mile) and Heath Miller is about 80% of Jason Witten.

Make of that what you will.TE is such a varied position that it's going to reflect what you value in a TE, which is apparently pass-catching.

Those top 3 of yours are guys I would never want blocking for me. The ones you have most likely ahead of him, only one is a blocker of any renown - Witten. 

The young guys you named are not even remotely close in blocking ability. 

If it's overall TE, as in being able to pass block, run block and pass catch, it's Witten and then Miller.

If it's pass catching only? Heath is barely in the Top 10.

Heath is far more valuable to his team than everyone you named except for Witten and Gronk.I keep a Lumia with Here Maps around just in case.The only problem is you can't move the maps to your SD card.Oh shit, she's gonna add shit like esquire to her name.

When people go "you're not a lawyer", she'll just say "yes, but I apprenticed for a knight in England. You probably never heard of him."I don't get it. Is this "celebrate diversity" person going to celebrate the fitspo crowd?

If everyone is worthy of respect, why pick on people who want to inspire others to be the best they can be?&gt;In reality they\u2019re not even groups, just lame thieves.

Well I'm glad we can tell the difference between the "lame" and "awesome" ones.

He's in complete denial about what he does.I wasn't. Tonight was extremely situational. 

If you want encouragement, encouragement looks like...getting a ground game going. Him dominating and them not taking him out.

He got stuffed when it counted and garbage yards when it didn't.

Fantasy is about hedging bets. His points tonight were made in the most unpredictable fashion possible. It tells you nothing good about him, only warnings.

He and Woodhead both stay on my bench unless it's an emergency.

reddit, we have GOT to stop it with the "tell me I'm pretty" threads.I took CJA in 0 of nearly 50 leagues.

In the few leagues where he's been outright waived, I haven't even put a waiver claim in on him "just in case", but I have taken Hillman as a FA.

&gt;Can this guy turn it around

I feel like The Architect from The Matrix here.

"The question isn't whether he can turn it around, the question has already been answered before you asked it. The question is if you understand why he can't turn it around."

Why? Why did I avoid this guy universally like the plague?

Because I have watched him play. Some guys have "it" and others don't. CJA has potential on paper, but it doesn't translate in real-time game speed. 

Here's a player whose team is desperate to make him the focal point of the offense and have given him every opportunity to make that happen...and has failed. 

Your question basically boils down to "when will he pull his head out his ass" when it should be "how did he get it so far up there to begin with" because he is clueless.

Hey - I love to be wrong on guys who end up pulling their heads out of their asses, mainly because it's so rare. Until he does it, he's not startable. He's still unsure in pass pro, he doesn't get Manning and how to help him as a hot read, his lane selection behind the line of scrimmage is bad and his physical running looks tentative. 

When Chuck Knoblauch couldn't throw to first, it was obvious. But when this guy can't run, everyone wants to know when he's gonna turn it around. He's averaging 11.4 PPG

How hard can it be?That list is the list of someone who dropped their first 2-3 games if he did that.It's not really only a deep threat, it's that he can keep getting yards after the catch.

He's a violent runner. You have to watch him run routes. He's big, strong and he breaks ankles with his moves.

So much of the wasted conversation here is comprised of factors that are minimally important if not unimportant.

*WATCH* him play. Understand *why* he's open. That's why he's a good bet to keep starting. Teams can't take him away or shut him down. He isn't dependent upon scheme, situation, garbage yards and all that shit. 

There are very few WRs in the NFL who "write their own ticket" as it were - guys like Antonio Brown who are open on a fairly regular basis and are just waiting for their QB to get them the ball. Hurns is open *all the damn time*.

It's one of the less risky plays to start him right now.God I fucking hate PFF. I can't believe you suckered me into going to that site if only to see if they got it wrong.

And did they?

Sure did.

Any mention of him having stat inflation from that one 60 yard play he had?

Of course not! 

Why?

Because Cris Collinsworth.Of course it's a dumb stat. It's PFF. It's what they do. They sell people on worthless stats. PFF is the gluten-free choice of fantasy knowledge.Yup, I was gonna say that he looks way sharper out there running routes and getting open than Cooks.

Cooks doesn't have Drew Brees problem, Cooks has a Cooks problem.

While I don't know if he actually lines up as the WR1 instead of Cooks like you think, I do know that Brees is good enough to go through several reads to find the open man and this kid makes it happen.Only hits at point-blank rangeYes, I'm doubly disturbed at this one.&gt;Tom Waits' "Tom Traubert's Blues," "Give My Compliments to the Chef" by the Sensational Alex Harvey Band

If you ever wanted insight into Robert's sense of humour, you've got it right there.2007 New England Patriots vs 1972 Dolphins for the right to SHUT THE FUCK UPEven the rays of lightI was gonna post something similar - that car is totally from Texas due to the hail damage. She didn't have covered parking at her apartment, which is pretty rare. Even cheap and shitty places have it.No you see the silver Civic is gone so it's like totally different weeks.&gt;Watching this train wreck is more addicting than ~~drugs~~ *Mountain Dew*.

Same difference
Let me also give a "Thank god" here as well. 

Same exact problem upgrading an Acer. It was dog ass slow. Kept my from upgrading a HP I had to roll back. Now I can do it clean!The niqab isn't a problem, it's the people who oppose Harper's stance on it that are the problem.  

People are so damned determined to say "nuh-uh!" that they fall for it. They're so obsessed with sounding tolerant that they fall right into his hands.

Furthermore, he's exposing liberal hypocrisy to his base. 

The answer is simple: there is no room for symbols of female oppression in a progressive, secular society. "Let them live and let me live" is a conservative libertarian view these days. You are supporting him either way. Even agreeing with him supports him unless you add the words "progressive, secular society" to it. 

If you take the issue back, he loses power and it bounces back to his Base to ask why he's aligning with those kinds of values. Unlimited tolerance isn't a progressive value.Hey thanks for coming to reddit - we always appreciate it. 

I was just wondering if you could talk about Princeton and your path to professional football from an academic school and your thoughts on going that route.If only there were some sort of...contest they could engage in to settle it where they'd "play" to see who gets to go "off" to the next round. We could call it an "offplay"Someone alert /r/conspiracy and /r/TopMindsOfReddit - we've got some distinct groups for both of them!There's a Jacksonville State?Well considering their reputation as the most "homer fanbase", I don't think we could ask for a more objective ranker.I think you're both right.

Ask yourself why people are so upset that Seattle *aren't* ranked lower.

It's not their innate sense of justice. It's comeuppance.I think it's interesting because there's a team that have been rather impotent on offense, failed to find their run game and look pretty solid on defense.

I could be speaking of the Broncos or the Seahawks.

The fact people are up in arms over one and not the other tells you a lot about attitudes. Perhaps people should be upset for Denver being the worst undefeated team. 

People are taking record and weighing it too heavily. If you want to say Seattle look like shit as a way of justifying them being lower due to record, shouldn't the Broncos looking like shit make them lower due to record?

The difference is, people *really like* the Broncos and Manning.

I had a hard time ranking both Seattle and Denver and I think that if those two teams played 10 times, Seattle would win 7 of them. Even I think I weighed record too heavily, but I couldn't ignore it.Exactly. We won and went down and I'm not even upset. I think it's a market correction; we were all guilty of wishful thinking or historical bias. 

I'm still not certain I have Pittsburgh right (I think I may have them too high), it's just that if you take teams and group them into tiers, about 75% of the NFL are awful on a whole 'nuther level. It seems like maybe Pittsburgh or Seattle should be ranked lower, but I can't group them with that next bubble of mediocrity.These power ranking discussions are fascinating from a psychology/sociology perspective because of all of the logical fallacies you see. 

I think that's the most enjoyable part of this. Part of me wants people to be more self-aware and realise their biases, but the bigger part of me is there wanting them to keep on keepin' on because it's a great experiment. It's the circlejerk on steroids. 

Kind of interesting when the circlejerk gets it right.It depends on if there's even 10 good teams or not. 

I just said this in a previous post, but take the teams by ranking and draw a circle around contiguous groups and make those bubbles your different tiers.

I think the tiers would look something like this:

Tier 1: Packers, Pats and Cardinals - good teams with few questions

Tier 2: Bengals, Falcons, Panthers - teams with a record, but legitimate questions

Tier 3: Broncos, Seahawks, Steelers - teams who have talent, but look bad

Then draw a circle over those 3 tiers. That's the "good" team tier. There are only 9. 

Tier 4: Jets, Bills, Giants, Vikings - up and down teams who have a short resume

This tier could be included in the other 3 if you like, but they are dangerously close to slipping way down. The rest of the teams are another tier.

I said in a different post that about 75% of the NFL are on their own "bad" tier and that Tier 4 is on the bubble between either of them. 

This year is really, really unusual because things are so far off, and if you want to be realistic, the Falcons and Panthers maybe don't even belong in a group with the likes of the Packers and Patriots at all.Better than Carly."The shitlord swimsuit companies don't stock anything in a 5X so I couldn't go to the store and get anything that wasn't an isty bitsy teeny weenie little polka dot bikini so I quit out of protest or those shitlords forced me out or whatever."It makes your hands strong enough to control the weight of an entire pound cake so you can eat it in one bite.No, don't be. Asian bras are starting to get it right. If you go on AliExpress and see the side gathering bras, they fit women with small frames and cup sizes, but have 4 hooks on the band. They're good because they move boob/fat from under your armpit and towards your cleavage. $135 for a vibrator?

Yet more fat discrimination. A regular vibrator is $20. More thin privilege if you ask me.That's high-level narcissism right there.Well shit, now we're not the sympathetic underdog anymore.She does?

I hope someone is archiving this for comedy's sake. Yeah that accident on the red one?

It was only 5mph.If you preorder you get extra calcium from day 1, but if you don't you will have brittle bonesYeah, I would really like to know what's up with all of the games I already exported, but I don't want to make a new thread. 

I exported RB1, RB2 and Lego, plus I own RB3. I guess we're just waiting whilst everyone else who used social engineering to get an export code is golden?IMO, a manual cooker is a warmer compared to one that's digital. 

Some features you want are things like moving to automatic warm - manual controls don't do that. You want to set it and forget it.

Manual cookers are things I would rather use to keep things warm as opposed to cooking.

I have four crock pots and two three pot warmers and I find that I prefer the crock pots as warmers. Although I only ever use my 2 digital crock pots. One of them has multiple-stage cooking. I can set cycle 1 for high for 2 hours and then cycle 2 on low for 4.

I think food comes out better that way. Often times I cook the same thing spread across the two crock pots and 2 hours high/4 low on one = 8 low on the other, but the meat is a better texture on the two-stage model. 

I think it's best to spend the money and buy one you'll keep forever from the start. I read this comment and couldn't figure it out, then I remembered you guys have more laws about guns than...anything and figured there's probably some regulation/loophole that could be used to take his gun from him altogether. 

I assume he could just apply for a CC anyway. Or move to Vermont.Sacco said "I should have done something about this sooner"

Maybe you should have done something now?Oh for fuck's sake.

Honestly, with all of the adversity the Bills have faced, I'm surprised they've still hung on.Sounds less painful than absorbing Bills-related news this season.

Yeah I grabbed Kane in my fantasy league. I think he's gonna bounce back big, plus he's a fun guy to watch. 

I even took a flier on Ennis, but he's got to step it up. I'm expecting big things from the Sabres this year.&gt; Yeah I've got no confidence in EJ.

Because EJ has no confidence in EJ.Most NFL QBs this year can't do what Taylor was doing this year.I debated whether to say this or not, but I think I jinxed him. 

When I was grabbing him Saturday night to stash in my fantasy leagues I thought "Man, who names their kid after parts of a car's steering and alignment mechanicals?"

Which of course led to "man, what happens if he hurts his knee? Is an ACL injury a bent outer Tyrod? Is an MCL injury a bent inner Tyrod?"

Terrible karma.Yeah, it's not like you have to take advantage of the one sunny day per week to do it all.Yeah, that's WC living. 6 hours is nothing. You gotta drive for culture and events. I went from San Diego to PHX to watch the Steelers many years ago. Now I won't even drive 3 hours to Foxboro to see a game.Tell him to kick this guy in the nuts for us because Bengals fans are scoring off us:

https://www.reddit.com/r/bengals/comments/3omfvg/leave_it_to_a_steelers_fan_to_take_up_3_spots_in/cvyovdvThe only time(s) in my life it hasn't been overrun by foreign fans is like...when the Expos would come to town because there were zero French Canadians in San Diego and then when the Marlins came into the league.

Part of the reason I like Cubs/Cardinals/Giants/whatever fans so much is my experience growing up in San Diego being surrounded by them at every Padres game.

It makes the shitty fanbases stand out more. I'm looking at you, Maple Leafs.Being a Clipper sucksLook at Freeman. He's been used thoroughly and he's gonna be dead soon if they don't mix Coleman in. A big back is needed in passing and running downs.

A smaller back gets taken out in running downs.

The exception would be big backs who aren't good in the pass game (like Ingram) or small backs who can still run hard (like Freeman).The Commish's job is to make sure the league is fun, fair and balanced.

You don't have absolute autonomy to do whatever the fuck you like with your roster - that's why there are Can't Cut Lists and the ability to lock rosters.

Never mind this was a mistake. I would ban the asshole who accepted it. This is an issue of managing your participants. Yahoo keeps everyone on waivers.

NFL shows them on W at midnight if there's a claim, otherwise they are free. It can take a few hours to process.

ESPN is like NFL.

There's a strategy where you can go in at midnight exactly and grab FAs if you're fast enough, but I have 6 NFL leagues and 25 ESPN and I can't do it in time. With Yahoo you just have to set them and hope for the best. Yahoo is especially fucky because often I see people get guys I had ranked with a higher priority. ESPN will give me the right guy, but show the adds out of order, ie I would have #1 priority but it shows me as the 5th waiver move.

In Yahoo I found that when it screws you on claims it's best to waive all of your players beforehand and then make claims with your empty spots. I had Lamar Miller on my "DO NOT DRAFT LIST" this year, but took him in a league just to say I had him and to force myself to follow him. Yeah.

By round:

1. Lacy

2. Calvin

3. Lamar Miller

4. Arian

5. Brees

6. Maclin

7. Big Ben

8. Agholor

9. Abdullah

10. Blue

11. Kendall

12. McFadden

13. Stafford

14. Texans

15. Parkey

16. Daniels

If you ask me, the confluence of failure comes down to Miller, Big Ben getting hurt, Lacy getting hurt, Brees getting hurt, Foster being hurt and Parkey sucking/getting hurt. You should all quit this shitty league after the year is over and he can dock whoever inherits the team their draft pick.Call it pity or sympathy, but I lack those things when it comes to examples of ignorance such as this. And whoever sold her this bill of goods deserves to have their stupid machine explode on them from the lies it tells.&gt; The real blame is on people who keep enabling her shit by giving her spots at conferences and talks.

The shit will hit the fan one day when someone at a conference has an iPad and googles her and sees the Dances With FACTS blog and actually confronts her in front of everyone. That'll be a mess - objective academics in bewilderment with social science majors being massively offended and Ragen tapdancing on-stage.The fact no one stood up to L Ron Hubbard early on means you have this tiny group of Scientologists who infiltrated the US government and nearly caused serious harm.

Society would be a lot better if we kept constant pressure on narcissists who are swindling people.&gt; because a lot of obese women think they can be just as ~~"glam"~~ *"fierce"* as they are if they put on a bit of makeup.

That word is ruined for me.&gt; Do you not worry about the oncoming shame? 

You don't understand something: she's a narcissist.

Go to /r/raisedbynarcissists (if you can handle it) and read the stories there. You'll see many common themes, but one of them are narcissistic parents doing things that are utterly humiliating to everyone with no remorse or even awareness of the fact.

When your quest is power and you'll do anything to get it because of a psychological compulsion, checks and balances like integrity and shame are worthless.

Why do you think they make such a big deal about "fat shaming" and all that other bullshit? Because they don't want to be challenged. They don't want reminders that what they're doing is morally wrong.

I say this over and over again: fatlogic is nothing more than fat narcissism. And narcissists don't feel shame. The ones who you can shame are the ones who can be rescued from the clutches of fatlogic because they're not truly narcissists, just people enjoying some power. It's people who are irreparably broken who are malignant narcissists and there's nothing you can do to change them, only thwart them.

That's why I think there should always be conversation about Tess, Ragen, ATL, etc because someone needs to shine a bright light on their festering mould.Ragen will never change.

Any sort of re-invention will only be to further her narcissism. 

Narcissism, like psychopathy is incurable. 

Narcissists feed on enabling hope that they can "do better" and "turn it around" - they will "get better" insofar as it furthers their goals to have power. 

Every single thing Ragen does is about power. Even reading her pathetic LJ you see a common theme from then until now which is power, power, power. 

"Change, or how to tell if someone is incurable"

Change is a lot like being converted to Jesus. Admit you're a sinner, accept Jesus into your heart and live your life in a Christian way from then on out. It's an important concept because it teaches people how to give power and glory to God rather than oneself and more important how to be wrong, ask forgiveness and change for the better. 

Narcissists will not admit they're wrong. They never get to the point of feeling remorse because they don't admit they're wrong. They never do right by those they've wrong by being accountable for their actions because they aren't wrong. They never change their behaviour because they aren't accountable for their actions.

Scientifically, Ragen has proven over and over on a universal basis that she is never wrong, never sorry, never accountable and never going to change.

She is, without almost any reservation an incurable narcissist and will never possess the awareness of self to be what you hope.

And Ragen, I hope you read this and prove me wrong. Not a facsimile of pretending to be humble, but actually admit how full of shit you are, who you've hurt and work the rest of your life on your knees to beg forgiveness for your arrogant megalomania.I didn't eat *only* McDonald's, but I did eat it every day when I lost weight. 

McDonald's isn't to blame for peoples' problems, it's them for eating way too much of it.I feel like we've just witnessed a miracle.

Does anyone else feel closer to god right now?Zero to me.

I have Freeman in dozens of leagues and just finished doing all of my waiver claims and I chose West and other backs instead. 

Ride the Freeman train until it turns to shit. Don't play in the shit.[I'm really reaching here](http://i.imgur.com/AEuBwX3.png)

Apologies to /u/axolotl_peyotl - I know you're not a Satan agent. Also, 6-3-7-19-5-22-11 you know what I mean.The thing I don't like is "parroting" - is it different when you think the other person is an idiot?

If I stick to the talking points about 9/11 or Benghazi, does that make me a good parrot? 

I don't understand, is parroting only bad when you think the other person is an idiot? Because if science is on the side of say...9/11 Twin Towers falling, how can we dismiss science about vaccinations?

Isn't it idiotic to pick and choose the science you like?&gt;or are all the cars lemons

Does not mesh with:

&gt;I'd really like a grand caravan or a town n country

I'm not being flippant here. If you're going to go to an auction and potentially save thousands, why wouldn't you get a Sienna or an Odyssey?Yeah but do you keep the sun in your pocket? Not unless you're some sort of God or at least demigod.BTW have you joined us in /r/CenturyClub yet? It's where we pull the strings of reddit from behind the scenes.I have inside information that he's going to start #1 RB this weekNo, the guy's a criminalAs someone who has taken care of two parents who have passed those ages, this is very True. 1500 upvotes: http://imgur.com/DTT8Ot0

2000 upvotes: http://imgur.com/56pkwqM

1,000,000 upvotes: http://imgur.com/XB67rXAHonestly the Japanese make better pasta than we do seeing as their ancestors invented the noodle and ramen is the king of all noodles.

Every time I go to Aberdeen Centre in Richmond (BC) I get Italian at a Chinese or Japanese place...and I live in Montreal. Either here or NYC are the best Italian and I get Asian-made Italian. That says it all. I grabbed him last week in NarFFL and no one noticed or caredWhen he takes the majority of the snaps, remember this: he won the job because he could pass pro better than Gore.DISCLAIMER: I will get downvoted by Gore owners...but if you listened to me through the downvotes about Freeman, you'd have owned him since August.

If Gore was "still the man in Indy", they would have never signed Bradshaw.

http://www.nfl.com/stats/categorystats?tabSeq=2&amp;offensiveStatisticCategory=OFFENSIVE_LINE&amp;role=TM&amp;d-447263-n=1&amp;d-447263-o=2&amp;d-447263-p=1&amp;d-447263-s=PASSING_QBHIT

As you can see, the Colts are #2 in hits. They were #1 until Hasselbeck took over and refused to have Gore pass block for him at all and made him leak out into the flat on every play.

Luck hasn't played in 2 weeks and is still #2 in INTs

http://espn.go.com/nfl/statistics/player/_/stat/passing/sort/interceptions

Not to mention he leads the league in turnovers when you factor in fumbles:

http://sports.yahoo.com/nfl/stats/bycategory?cat=Passing&amp;conference=NFL&amp;year=season_2015&amp;sort=48&amp;timeframe=ToDate

And if you have *watched* the Colts play, Gore is missing his reads, getting beat and failing to stand up the pass rusher. 

So no, Gore isn't still the man. It's like not knowing when it's over with a woman. She isn't fucking you anymore. She goes out late and won't tell you where she's at. She hides her phone constantly.

Yeah, she's totally committed to you.

/downvote away Gore ownersYup. He'll be RB1/RB2 quickly. They use him on 1st, 2nd and 3rd downs. They use him in the end zone because he can catch, run inside and run cutbacks. 

He'll be used in passing plays because he's better than Gore at pre-snap reads and pass pro. 

There's very little reason to remove him situationally. Gore is a guy you want to take out on passing downs because so far this year he's caused Luck to lead the league in hits and INTs. 

Don't get me wrong - Luck still takes lots of hits and they were 4th-worst last year, but they gave up 107 hits over 16 games.

Gore has allowed Luck to get hit 77 times in 4 games. 

I mean, why even come to this forum if not to get relevant advice? Of course he's valuable. You need to get him back.LOL he's an "expert"...my ass.

This is classic. 

&gt;Well, they didn't have Gore last year. 

That's right. 2014 they had 31 turnovers:

http://espn.go.com/nfl/statistics/team/_/stat/givetake/sort/giveTotal/year/2014

2015 they have 12:

http://espn.go.com/nfl/statistics/team/_/stat/givetake/sort/giveTotal/year/2014

In 2014 Bradshaw had 3 total fumbles, 2 lost and was on pace for 4 and 3 lost:

http://espn.go.com/nfl/player/gamelog/_/id/10693/ahmad-bradshaw

Gore has 2 fumbles and 2 lost and is on pace to have 6 lost fumbles:

http://espn.go.com/nfl/player/gamelog/_/id/8479/frank-gore

Luck's turnovers from last year also deceptive because he lost 4 of 8 fumbles on running plays:

http://espn.go.com/nfl/player/stats/_/id/14874/andrew-luck

They are worse this year with Gore back there. 

&gt;And those RB touchdown catches are monumental flukes.

Says the guy who doesn't understand scheme. How embarrassing.

When you have Gore in there, you are telegraphing to the defense that it's going to be a run play. If you are passing with him in there then you want the element of surprise, but he can't block anyone and give Luck time to throw. Hence the league-leading INTs, turnovers and hits on Luck this year.

When you have Bradshaw in there, because he can pass pro it means defenses don't know what the Colts are going to do. If they decide to pass and no one is there, Bradshaw kept luck upright enough to allow him to throw. Bradshaw is smart enough to get open and they will throw it to him for a TD.

Superstitious people credit things they don't understand to shit like luck or "God's will", but when science can explain *why*, you sound like an ignoramus because you are admitting you have no clue. Those TD catches all make perfect sense because Bradshaw was the final checkdown read and the defense can't cover everyone. If they fooled the defense and made them guess run and plug gaps, Bradshaw is open. If they call pass and Bradshaw chips his block and runs out, he has the ability to be where Luck wants him. Touchdown.

&gt;I mean, it was working, they rode it. But I'd hate to count on it.

Because you don't understand it. I would bet on it because I understand it.

There are no such things as experts.&gt;Who would you drop to get Bradshaw? Please LIST ALL drop-able!

Yes. That's who I would drop.

Your list ends at CJ. I don't know how much farther it will go.

Every single person you named there is in a timeshare and has no chance of inheriting a **WORTHWHILE** starting role through any reason other than injury. There is nothing to indicate any of those RBs will "emerge" to be a starter on their own merit. Obvious exception is Stewart who is instead worthless.

Bradshaw has a legitimate shot at assuming the starting role. The only reason he won't is that he's physically done. Think about Reggie Wayne. When he came back, it turned out he couldn't get separation anymore. It was over. If Bradshaw has lost a step, it's over. If he's the same as before, he will win the starting job until his knee explodes walking back to the locker room at halftime.&gt; Gore keeps getting better

http://espn.go.com/nfl/player/gamelog/_/id/8479/frank-gore

**Points by week:**

* 3

* 3

* 20

* 6

* 15

If you want to say he's "gotten better" because he's not averaging 3.0 PPG anymore, I guess you're pretty right, but that's a helluva low standard. 

So far he's produced in 2 of 5 games, which is 40%. He can't be "getting better" because he doesn't even have a majority of "better" games to bad ones. 

If you want to only look at the last 3 weeks, he's had 2 good games and 1 bad game. 

He has a nice matchup this week vs the Pats who you can run on. He's averaging 4.3 YPC which is nice. 

But he's not "getting better" when he's been incredibly inconsistent. 

Your RB should get you ~10 PPG at least 75% of the time. He's only averaging 9.4 PPG and has delivered twice and lost it for his owners 3 times.

He isn't "getting better", he's a tremendous risk.Bradshaw. Dallas has proven they aren't committed to any one guy and talked "rotation" and "committee" since fucking June.

We have no idea what the Colts will do, but if they're smart they will give Bradshaw at least 60% of the snaps. Bradshaw completely opens up their offense by being a versatile passing and running threat.Either of them, however Hillman is a very sneaky desperation start this week.

Cleveland cannot stop the run. It pained me to drop Hillman this week because he ought to do pretty good. Or CJA. Whoever they use. Maybe even both.I'm listening to NBC Sports Radio and they teased that Florio says they'll cut Murray.I'd contract the team, have a dispersal draft and then sell a new franchise.

If it weren't against the rules I'd sell the new franchise to the public.

It's taken my entire lifetime for the Bengals to evolve and roughly double it for the Cardinals to evolve.

I'm done being polite or giving False hope. With Haslam, I think the Browns are looking at perpetual mediocrity. That's why I'd contract the team. QUESTION: Can Baltimore support two championship teams?Compared to his shitty management, yeah.

I'll tell you one thing: if I were in charge, I'd be way more fucking accountable to the fans than he ever was by listening to them and acknowledging their concerns.

This is an example of "yeah, I could do better" and not be talking big/out of my ass.Don't forget the Vikings. If only they'd go back to the classic unis.So a top down approachHe will. Good GMs don't want to work for bad owners or had situations. The Browns possess both in spades.&gt;Coat the entire facility in gasoline and send Ray Farmer in pre-lit

We need a human sacrifice for the football gods. They are so angry.

Counterpoint: a fire that size could ignite the lakeI'm pretty good at socialising cats. They're subtle animals and if you can recognise some of their subtleties you can at least get their attention.

If the cat meows, meow back in an imitation/approximation of their voice. Also initiate with that when you're going to feed them wet food, clean their box, etc. That lets them know you're talking to them. If you meow and talk to them normally and meow some more they get used to your voice. Your voice can scare them. Instead of "here kitty kitty" do a "meow kitty kitty mrowr". Bonus if you can say "meow" 10 times ;D

If the cat closes his eyes at you, close them back slowly. The cat is saying "all clear" and you're responding "all clear" back.

If the cat does the "what's up" head raise, do it back. Try to mix in closing your eyes and/or meowing. 

Put fresh water different places (way the hell away from their food and litter) and meow to them when you do it. They like finding fresh sources of water and learn to recognise that your meowing means something.

Make a specific meow when opening food and embellish the noise of opening the can, silverware, etc. Make feeding time a comforting event.

There's a lot more you can do and your cat may be different, but for the most part if you try to understand how it communicates and communicate in like kind, it will eventually feel safe and adapt.At least you know they won't all be size XL, but whatever size you specifiedI predict this will be the worst-selling Humble Bundle of all-time.Free speech and protest isn't an absolute right; you cannot criminally harass people.

I think following someone with a gun is criminal harassment by the definition of the law.They could annex HEB/Arlington/Ft Worth and call it Shi Tpa Town.Yup. OBL is kicking our asses from beyond the grave. 

We gave his country extremists in power and he made sure we knew exactly what they went through. 

Poetic (in)justice.Let's make sure not to label it progressive thought. Progressive thought is reasonably tolerant and open.

It's regressive left thought. That's what they're mocking. Each end of the horseshoe is on the regressive side. Right or left, South Park makes fun of regressives. That's why the argument about whether Trey and Matt are liberal/South Park Republicans/whatever is a moot point. They push boundaries, ie they are progressives. The left doesn't have sole ownership of being progressive just as the right doesn't have sole ownership of being regressive.

Regressives are the problem and the censorship-loving left are it right now. They and the victim-complex Christian right are both using the same regressive playbook, just with different rhetoric.I thought you were going to say to remember to load the squirt gun so you can spray them every time they aren't listening.

/don't we all wishDoofus. Doofus. Listen to me.

You can't hit parked vehicles.

It's not ok, ok?No, I can't Hemi now. The only Hemi I owned couldn't into Hemi.It lacks back seats and it's RWD

Pretty truck-like if you ask me.Unfortunately for many governments, they classify unibody vehicles as commercial/trucks anyway and you also pay commercial/truck insurance to drive them.

I saw a Ford Flex today with truck plates. That's a minivan with a truck-like front end. We all know it.Yeah, let's not talk about /r/slovakiaglobesYou all are literally listing all of the work I have to do on my BMW right nowThe water pump and thermostat on my BMW lasted about 2k mi/6 months.

I barely drive the thing.Not only that, Ford wants the longest lasting trucks on the road as a marketing tool.

In the NE/Canada, trucks go to shit with rust. Especially the Ram. Man they are not well-painted.

Ford's going to have their trucks in great shape 10 years down the road when rust perforation really starts to take hold.&gt; and the biodegradable wiring nightmares

That is tied with the "eco-friendly paint" of the 90's with Honda are two of my favourite automotive engineering blunders ever.No they didn't.

They just protested the other threads by having a demonstration in the way of the posts.The driver had a great option: head for the traffic signal pole.

The guy would be off the car by his own volition or because of physics.Wincest?RC Cola is a fantastically simplified view because soft drink makers pay for shelf space and have their own merchandising. RC Cola's barrier to entry is that Coke and Pepsi price them out of the space and the market through collusion. Space in grocery stores is finite.

There's no limit to who can open up a competing ride service.

Just as there's meta search engines for travel that will compare dozens of sites for you with one click, all of the competing driving services will end up the same way. Those that refuse to participate won't get any hits at all and people will need to go directly to them, which I doubt they'll do unless they're ignorant.

If every single ride service is competing in a meta marketplace and Uber sits it out, that has nothing to do with Coke and RC.I have no idea what either of these things are about, only that I'm sad I missed both before they got moderated out.&gt;When will we see a size 22

When tabloid newspapers are printed sideways and wide-angle lenses are used for photography?

How the fuck should I know?

Seriously, if a size 22 woman was in that picture, she'd be taking a job from 3 of the other women who wouldn't fit in the frame.

Is that what you want? To take rare jobs away from plus-sized women? How many modelling jobs are there for plus-sized women? Not many. You'd have to kick 3 of those girls out to fit your size 22 in there.Lane Bryant

Sizes 14-14/r/awfuleyebrows and /r/awfuleverything are like...they make you question your faith in humanity.It's like Tess. Her upper arms are double the size of her head.

I probably have a bigger chin than she does and I'm a man with 17% body fat.

She's amazing in her proportions, some small and some incredibly huge. Her arm fat hangs over her elbows like a circumcised foreskin over where the shaft and glans meets.

I keep thinking if she lost weight and got her arms done for extra skin it would be exactly like a circumcision. Literally.The part you missed is the coinflip/points tiebreakerNever. And I have two reasons. One, is that like losing, I want to let go and move on to the next thing. If NFL players say to do it, then I will defer to their authority on the matter. If they're over it, then why aren't I?

The second is that I don't want to overthink what I saw. When you process the game in real-time, as long as you reasonably understand what you're seeing, your first call/impression is correct. Rewatching it is just going to introduce doubt, make you second-guess everything aaaaaand...we've negated point #1, haven't we?

Truly, for your mental and emotional health it's best to just let games go, win or lose. I see people who get way too up or down over football and (sorry) I don't want to be anything like them. The more you watch for the good feels, the more you artificially inflate them by replaying something that was only really amazing for the first impression. Then, when the bad hits, it's so far away from the idolised version of reality that it's devastating.

But hey, go back and forth. Live your life however you like.Unpopular brutal opinion time: Overrated, underrated and whiterated.

People love him because he's white, they're surprised he's good because he's white and/or they assume he sucks because he's white.

He drops a lot of catchable balls and he always has. He's great at getting open, especially on a short field like in the end zone. He's brave over the middle, especially the deep middle. He routes are ok, his moves are great, his hands are fine and his concentration is mediocre.

He's not any one thing. But I don't think he's played very well. He's dropped a lot of key passes that were catchable balls.The shittiest part is that in the 2016 Draft, there's only about 6 prospects that'll get taken.I don't think so. Right now Seattle are tuning up for the playoffs and won't let off the gas. They need the time to keep working on what they do right, in game.

BONUS: Pete gets to humiliate a Harbaugh

Take the over and give the pointsMan that is a steal. He wasn't kidding when he said he wanted to be a Raider.It shouldn't be dropping any percent. It should be growing nonstop.

Out of context, 1% seems like a trivial number when you say it that way. But it's a dishonest comparison without the context of reddit needing to keep growing. There are a lot of people yet to use reddit. The company is very iffy financially. Growth, rather than increasing current engagement is the best way to make money!I was trying to enjoy the silence, but the video had lots of noise.

False advertising.Because people feel like their vote/voice doesn't matter.

This isn't an election. It's a Clinton coronation.

I hope Bernie beats her, but I trust the DNC as far as I can throw them. I couldn't have described my suspicions better if I tried. Truth is stranger than my extreme hypothetical scenario.The Bengals and Ravens subreddits are a lot of fun.Also: get some chili.If you had held out even a seed of doubt that he isn't simply bloviating bullshit out of his pie hole with zero forethought, let that seed go. There's no way to believe he has a single well-reasoned or researched policy idea at all.&gt;After my investigation of the industry, my name was mud among the city\u2019s taxi plate holders, who were worried about losing their golden goose. One woman, who inherited a pair of plates from her father, called me a \u201ccommunist\u201d for recommending that the taxi plate system be abolished. \u201cThis is free enterprise,\u201d she declared.

Beck?

Just because you say it, it doesn't make it True.

Of course the answer was to abolish the whole system and implement a co-op...that was before Uber. Now? Cleaning is fine. My parents paid USD$16k/yr in 1980's money to send me to a military school where I cleaned toilets with my bare hands. 

You get paid to do it. 

If a rich kid at a private school can do it (and we all did it), it's not beneath anyone.Then let's get them transitioned to Uber.

The people who refuse to bathe more than once a month and smell like an ashtray's toilet can go to hell.I hope so, because this would be a game-changer if True and explain why the people most opposed to any sort of firearm laws are doing so: they believe they have a moral duty to inflict moral harm at an occasion of their own choosing.No shit. What difference would it have made? He was facing 36 counts. Would it have really mattered if they convicted on 24? 12?

He was guilty and fighting to fight. These SJWs are stealing attention from the crimes and justice for the victims by making it about themselves.  

It's amazing how social justice is truly about groups and not the individual women who are victims here. The only injustice these people care about is jury selection.I'm sitting on the pot in a rest stop and I'm sure my neighbour in the next stall thinks I'm tickled by my business.Gingers don't get dandruff. I thought everyone knew that.I've gotta tell ya man...considering I like hypermiling and do a lot of freeway driving on cruise control, the 320i sounds pretty awesome to me.

Just because I could afford a lot more doesn't mean I need to get it to have a badge pissing contest either.

In one thought you shat on people wanting a roundel for people wanting a number badge instead. Hypocrisy much?How do you know it's a domestic LLC?My god, that thing's got patina overload. It's patina has patina growing on it.Ki Lachance?

/got nuthin'Yeah I get the feeling this is one of those misquoted adages that no one realises is wrong now. That the original is "money saving the root of all evil for bad men, yet is the key to freedom for good men" or something.

Anyway, greedy narcissists will find some other way to wreck society if money were abolished.Cruelty is generally evil.One of the biggest mistakes made in this subreddit are people following/posting recipes with added liquid.

Think of your slow cooker as a juice extractor. Why would you add water to juice you just squeezed unless you wanted to dilute it.

Pretty simple, really: meat goes in, juice comes out.

There are exceptions of course. If you make chili with tomato paste or concentrate you need water. If you use tomato sauce, then that's your liquid.

One of the dumbest things I see on the internet are people who put a spice rub on meat and then wash it off by adding water. If your slow cooker is burning the bottom it's broken. Your risk is burning the top where no liquid is, even on warm.While that's good advice, you often don't need liquid.&gt;Prashant Raj

I googled him.

He looks like you'd expect.I will say this every time I see it: if people don't know the difference between *policy* and **law**, they are tools.

I can say that it's my *policy* to punch anyone in the nose who looks at me crooked, but the **law** says it's assault and is illegal.

When are people going to close this "policy" loophole?UK makes no sense. If you are forced to repeat a year, it's as if the year you failed doesn't count.That's why you don't make a 32yo situational power back the centrepiece of your offense, **RYAN**.Because it's how propaganda works.

I used to be friends with this guy Bill Werndl who was a sports talk rumour conduit. The kind of shit he said on the air got people up in arms. What he told me off-air was even more ridiculous.

These teams use reporters and the like to leak the info they want out there. It's NFL PsyOps. 

It's no different than showing run and throwing. Or showing pass and running. If you tell the truth every time, when you get interviewed/quoted, any sort of silence is seen as confirmation.

If you just say whatever all the time, it's like deciphering hand signals - what's real? What isn't?

Considering how much the Colts have thrown with Gore in there or run with their worthless RBs, I tend to approach this with caution.That's why I think you're gonna see some throws over the middle to the TEs, Andre and Moncrief.So a typical 2015 Gore outing.It's like deja vu all over againI'm a hold on Bryant if given the choice. He doesn't have the same reps/chemistry with Ben as he does the backups. If there's one guy who's likely to get open on the Colts it's Moncrief because he runs short routes and makes moves on them.You should rub that on our asses, too because that miss really chapped our hidesPersonal wealth is relative and defined in many ways.

It can be money, family, happiness, peace of mind - many things.

A dollar to you is meaningless while a dollar to someone in Thailand isn't.

You've elevated happiness to the pedestal of being a millionaire. 

Right now you're in debt with a negative cashflow.

Life is like a building that elevates you to the sky. You need a solid foundation and then to build incrementally, brick by brick. You want simple happiness, but happiness is only simple once you've mastered it's complexity due to repetition. That's why life throws challenges at us: we learn to absorb them, be immune, parry them or redirect them back from whence they came.

You need to practise self-defence and learn how to save a dollar. You are too focused on the big goal of being a kickass millionaire and not the steps you must take to get there. No one has explained to you that every dollar you save adds to your wealth in the same way that taking the time to enjoy the little things in life and take stock of your small personal victories is key to building yourself up, brick by brick.

If you focus on your setbacks and not overcoming them, you can't move on. If you're going to let go regardless, do you let go of your existence or your bullshit holding you down?

Whether or not you realise it, you've made the admission that you lack fundamental life skills. Of course you don't want to live life any longer if you're no good at it. People quit hard things all the time. But they don't get good at hard things without a little coaching, guidance and proper repetition.

Why don't you give yourself a chance to simplify and take pleasure in the little things before you call it quits? Stop and smell the roses. Think about what that means on several levels. You cannot conquer the physiology of your brain without a workout. You have to train it to deal with the parts that you don't control and don't make sense.The only way I can change your view is to point out that some people are more prone to reason and logic while others are prone to superstition, intuition, etc.

For people who are reasonable, peer pressure, bullying, etc won't do much to change their minds, only their outward appearance of conformity. 

For people who aren't rational? Well, they change their minds all the time. That's why they're always following the newest gluten-free vaccine alternative or whatever. Reason and logic are a skill. That's why you need to use analogies with people like that, so they can be lead to reasonable thinking. You can't just give them the facts because they will default to confirmation bias and selectively use the facts that suit their argument/preconceived notion/feeling.

I think what you're asking is if it's ok to give up on irrational people and I think your viewpoint is flawed because rational thinking is like playing guitar or sewing - it's an acquired talent. Even if you think you are genetically "rational" or whatever, you still had to learn how to reason over time. It simply meant you were interested in it.

Take "gifted" children for an example. These are kids who are just more interested in certain goals so their drive makes things easier for them. I don't think kids are gifted. I think they have different determination motivations. Just because you were gifted with introspective thought, you still had to take time to live and become reasonable through time and repetition. 

I don't believe that irrational people are simply predestined to be that way and it seems like you're saying they're a basket case. If anything, rational repetition taught to an intuitive person gives them the best of both worlds, which makes them potentially *superior* since intuition and following your feelings isn't a skill, but a desire and runs contrary to the forgings of the logical mind.Of all the Halloween pics I've seen so far (and it's a lot), this is far and away the best one.Thank god there's no more of theseI got about 30% through and got bored from the lack of contrition.We're going to emancipate you...from your jobInitial Jim Bob Cooter report:

* Amazed that immigration let him into the country

* He smartly moved Calvin to the (weaker) left side of the Chiefs and had him on Sean Smith

* He put both Bell and Riddick in at the same time and Riddick was playing WR against the Chiefs stronger side DBsInteresting the Chiefs have decided to come out throwing...and then West gets stopped for a loss.

They must know something we don't.I think they've found an exploit here with KelceTD-saving tackle by Tulloch. West took off like a bullet.YesThe only person more fooled than the Lions on that play was the FOX cameramanI love Levy looking back. It's because he thinks he was being held (debatable), but in my mind he's yelling "WHY DID EVERYONE BUT ME GO THE WRONG WAY?" in real-time.Apparently I'm glad we're not getting Chevy Equinox commercials here in CanadaOne of those great mysteries just happened:

* Did Abdullah decide to take that out of the end zone of his own volition?

* Did the team tell him to return the ball no matter what and try to make a play?

Either way, someone is desperate.dat (lack of) blocking doeAbdullah on Abdullah violenceSo far Jim Bob Cooter has lined up his RB as a WR twice and thrown to them.

I don't know if that's his own personal wrinkle or an indictment on the state of the WR corps and it's quality/depth.What about Jersey?Kelce was wide open and he's worked so far. Bad playcall.Dear Charcandrick West,

When your QB is facing pressure, doing the tango with the LB isn't your job. It's to find some open space so he can dump the ball off to you.

EDIT: on the replay, that was the worst "route" ever, CharcandrickBecause we're worse

-Sincerely, fucking duhHey Jim Bob Cooter, y'all got any of that offensive line coaching?It's a shame because the Chiefs are much better on paper.Yeah at the very beginning. Little flag route. Got knocked down.James Iforgothowtospellit pulled up as to not get a penalty and Smith took advantage.

They'll make him pay for that.TAKE NOTES, BARRYI always think Travis Lewis is Levy and then I remember he's hurt.GO CHIEFSKelce woulda caught thatKelce didn't even break contain until Smith had thrown the ball.

Anyway, TD ALEX "WHEELS" SMITHOh shit, now Smith is gonna think he's a good CBWow, he's lucky he used his big hand instead of the little oneHe could/should have checked down to Abdullah but Abdullah wasn't lookingBODY SLAMAs of today, you have evolved.

We dub thee:

Charcandrichard WestI just saw a commercial for Balmain X H&amp;M and thought it was a joke.

Google tells me: not a joke.I didn't know anything about futbol when I chose Everton and I doubt I'd change now.Sam Rosen has no idea what he's talking about, but John Lynch is doing a great job cleaning up his mess. Rosen seems to think the Lions can do all of these things, but they aren't making pre-snap reads and adjustments at all and the backs/receivers aren't working as the hot read.

You have guys meandering around and/or not looking back to see if Stafford needs to throw early.

Considering how bad the line has played, I think I'd run with my head on a swivel. But even if you didn't know that, the receivers need to see the play breaking down in real-time and they aren't.

Whatever Cooter has done right, he's completely failed here. This is fundamental stuff and they are completely lost. I don't know if that's something you can adjust at halftime. That's just complete lack of preparation.I don't know if it's Stafford selling "this is my fault" or how people will see it at home or in the stands, but this hasn't been solely his fault or even majorly his fault.

It looks like it's his fault because he's not ripping people to shreds. Maybe he should. It's not really his style, but if they're not gonna help him and instead get him killed/intercepted, when is enough enough?Coaching staffCaldwell needs to go to the NCAA and never come backVery convenient camera angleThere's this Bose commercial in Canada where these two teens are about to kiss and I swear the girl looks like that Pattycake porn actress/whatever she is.I dunno why they think it's brave, you're getting speared regardless."Blocking up front"

Hey Lions offense, are you paying attention to the demonstration?Yeah but that's a perpetual thingI'm excited for today because we're gonna see if Diggs can really take advantage or not. Don't you follow international news?

UKIP doesn't want any more loser migrants.Sam Rosen...I didn't realise how awful he was until today.COME ON DETROIT.

SALVAGE THIS GAME.

BLOCK FOR STAFFORD. GIVE HIM TIME.Illegal man downfield, Sam.Showerthought (literally at halftime)

Calvin Johnson is proof the Lions have quit on Caldwell.

This is a dude who can be full stop with triple coverage and come down a 14' high pass.

Now he can't even catch a ball in stride in single coverage with his man beaten.

He isn't *that* hurt. He didn't forget how to play.Crowd shot of British Lions fans contemplating their fandom choiceTabarnak, Duvernay-TardifThe flag hit the ground before the ball did.Pepperidge Farm remembersCome on, that's just cruel to give them False hope while Caldwell still existsWoo SqueezeSeriously some Russian oligarch should just buy AdidasEverybody loves Swamp ThingI'm bored nowBoth have plenty of disgusting brown water.The problem is no permanent solution at QB.

Manziel should have been cut a long time ago. 

You can't move on when you're still living with your drunken ex.So you're saying they are going to upgrade two more times?If the Bengals were a dance, they'd be this:

http://imgur.com/gallery/jsm0x2cI don't think you should trade with the Browns anymoreYeah, get it done. Just like Trent Richardson.

* You got fleeced by Michael Lombardi

* Grigson is a disaster

Actually, I'm thinking the Browns probably called you guys first.&gt; Is Farmer going to be in charge of trading their 2 best players?

Good question, isn't he suspended?

OH SNAP~~They would never trade with us.~~

These Browns are so hopeless, they probably would.No, I don't think Joe Thomas' nutritional regimen meets Chip's criteria.You know you're bad if a Chiefs WR gets a TD off youYeah so far that's a wasted pick. Well, if you insist but we would have offered draft pick compensation.

We giving or receiving? Can everyone just kneel down so I can take a power nap before the 1pm games?I don't think it's realistic because they don't have anyone to be an interim coach. In that case they should have benched them with 12 minutes remaining in the 1st quarter.Wasn't there a kickstarter to buy the Lions from the Fords?

Because I'd chip in a couple of bucks if it meant watchable football in the future.For some reason I imagined a giant sphincter with a big "KC" on it.I'm with you. I can't recall having the volume for a Sam Rosen-called game in a long time, at least not a single game where I didn't have the distraction of multiple games on other TVs.

He's terrible. He's been making play by play calls and analysis that's outright incorrect.Lance "GARBAGE KING" MooreInteresting coincidence because the Lions are playing like Mr BeanNo that's just Lion stoolThat TD was so fucking hot, Lance Moore was ON FIREBy a squad?

Firing squad?

Or just burned at the stake?

Really, I'm cool with either option.Yeah let's get Megatron all taped up so he can continue to injure himself in a game that's long decidedWhere's the horse collarOnly if it results in Caldwell's firing.

He's never going to SB without a ticketYeah but that show is terrible, almost as bad as her stand up routineSo British people...The face of dementiaI'm calculating a 25 minute power nap.

Come on Lions. Completions in the middle of the field.I don't think it's safe for you to lose too much weight too fast, which is also a health issue.

2 lbs per week is considered medically responsible. I would rather pay the extra money. It's not worth it to have loose skin because you lost weight too quickly.

And are you even eating a wholesome diet? You're going to lose fat and muscle. You don't want that. You need more than a veggie diet.

While I think you should lose the weight, do it under medical supervision. That way you can get a note from your doctor and maybe help yourself with the office politics.

Finally, use MyFitnessPal to track your nutrition so you KNOW if you're doing the right thing or not.That's really not the news we wanted to hear, but expected to hear.

Just preparing for confirmation of the worst.This is honestly the worst tackling I have ever seen by the Jets

EDIT: I mean all dayEric Decker. You might try covering him.Actually, the brutal truth is they're saying you're worthless except for being a conveniently wet hole side booty call.

Hitting Old Country Buffet on the way to the Walmart scooty puff isn't an active, fit guy's idea of a night out.

If you want to talk about misogyny, why would you even want the kind of man who thinks nothing more of you except a fuck hole to be used and discarded? Because he's hot? Are we going to argue that feminism is the right be vacuous and shallow?

Get real.&gt;Maybe my body size will change, and maybe it won't.

What will never change is your self-entitled delusions and ego.He was roundhouse kicking handicapped children at the Special Olympics up the road in his own personal "Tour Of Oppression"&gt; is this a famous radio station?

Indeed. One of the most famous radio stations in the USA and one of the few blowtorches on the continent. Guys like Dr Demento and Phil Hendrie grew out of their KFI roots.

It's a fantastic station. This Ragen bit is far funnier than anything Dr Demento or Phil Hendrie ever did.I prefer KNX 1070You work with a bunch of dumb fucks. I can't believe it took them this long to figure it out.I'll paraphrase what I said in the last thread:

&gt;You're fired, BisFitty

"I should tell my lawyer that you're *emancipating* me from my job?"&gt; I would have gotten to get the reaction of the couple that brought fucking Confederate officer uniforms!

At first I thought the conference call was to fire you.

Now I think it's to beg you not to sue them into oblivion and/or name them publicly. I love it!

Dan Bailey FGs are like crack for me!You should insist that the party wasn't cancelled, but surrendered to the North.General Tao TarkinLots of drops for BrandonYou steer the wheel 200' before the turnThese comments are now cancer 

Help me Obi-Mods, you're our only hopeNo Jalen gets it. The NBA gets reddit. I wouldn't be surprised if Silver himself was like "everybody reddit" because that's just how he rolls. The main reason why I'd go luxury over your "budget" cars are the safety features. Older economy cars usually don't have side airbags. Luxury cars usually do. Some econoboxes don't even have 4 wheel discs with ABS. How fitting, Colon on Colon violenceI agree. We were lucky to be there. We deserved it, but not like they did. The way they ate our bullpen up is on a level we don't touch.LPT: where there's smoke, there's fire

Or, in the case of the internet, where there's an army of enablers, there's a narcissist, addict or both.It's not the loss. I expected to lose. I picked you guys.

It's losing Bell. Out of the frying pan, into the fire. Get Ben, lose Bell.

It's cool. You can have the first two matchups this year. We'll just take the third \ud83d\ude08Yup. I remember people swarming to get the deals off the table and cleaning them out.Lego is never more than 30% off during BF. Usually the deals are slim. Target will do 20% off.

Lego will likely follow the same guidelines. Personally I think it's going to be brutal for them.

There are tons of TTLs this season, Lego has the most expensive one and the least discount on it. Skylanders and Infinity will be under $40, so half off. Dimensions has a higher SRP and will have a lesser discount. Dimensions will likely cost on sale what Skylanders costs at full SRP.

Where it won't work is if Dimensions has supply issues and goes full Amiibo and people flip shit Cabbage Patch Tickle Me Furby style and buy them up. Today Show etc will have to convince soccer moms that little Billy won't get one and his childhood will be ruined and lead to an adulthood of nonstop parental resentment if they don't get Dimensions.

IMO, Lego is gonna get smashed on this. Consumers won't look in video games for Lego, old gifters won't get it and the cost is way too high. Plus, Skylanders has their racing game, Infinity will tie in to Star Wars in theatres (and is a cheap upgrade for prior owners) while Amiibo will finally be attainable. Then factor in that Guitar Hero will need to be slashed in price and Rock Band will probably see a sale...

And we have Lego with their intransigence when it comes to price and value. They are outsiders here. I'm frankly appalled at the Dimensions prices. The expansion sets should be $0.10/brick + $2 or so for the DLC. It's up to 6 times that. Lego collectors are going to have to think long and hard about the price per brick.That's why they have that lever underneath, dude.And Rock Band 4

You need an adapter for old hardware. Sony stuff just works.I have a bunch of leagues where I got Bell, Lacy and Charles (auction).

This has been my most challenging year ever.Dude I saw Dr Yocum and Dr Fronek for my labrum and they both guessed the severity of the tear before even looking at my MRI. They could tell by watching me move the joint.Enter keyword "TORN" and we'll double your initial deposit up to $200!Today was a bad day as both a Mets and Steelers fan. Sucks if you're a Jets fan as well.

At least the Devils are hot lately. They're a few points out of first.

I think we all knew all along these Royals were not gonna go away. I'm ready to let this season go.They do?

What's wrong with people?

It's a dragon movie. About dragons. Dragon apocalypse. What did they expect, On Golden Pond? You would maybe have one shot to make a change, so if we're going to make a change we should do it right and go to the UN and argue for a 24 hour time clock that is universal worldwide.

Days would change at Greenwich Mean Time and when you have a system like this everybody would just set their clocks based upon whatever time the sun rises and whatever time the sun goes down - it would be the exact same time everywhere on the planet.

People would get up and be active during the day based upon when they were facing the sun which is the most natural for humans anyway.I find that whenever I use myopic the way OP did, people misunderstand and/or downvote it because they only have a myopic, narrow usage of the word: the medical condition.

Downvote me, myopians. Maybe the photographer is CujoIf you like Justice Porn, you like King.I guess the other half was the population.I tried to upvote your ABTF paragraph on mobileThis Draw Something is relevant:

http://i.imgur.com/9044eM6.jpgI almost picked up my laptop to post "kidney injury" during that game and when Marvin Jones got hit.The Broncos were playing their best football of the season last night and it wouldn't be enough to beat the Patriots except maybe 1-2 times out of 10.

I'd lay 4-1 odds minimum to get you to take the Broncos.Don't let your own fandom confuse you. You had a shitty gameplan and poor execution. You let the Broncos dictate to you and push the Packers around rather than do that to them.

The Patriots have way better coaching and preparation than you do. The Pats would put the Broncos on the defencive and they would crumble.Didn't you see last night when they trotted out the "22nd ranked" stat about Rodgers?Doesn't surprise me. Sometimes my knee will get stuck and I have the presence of mind to hop when it happens. I could imagine bad shit happening if I forced it.Edward James Semetary Zone

Or, King could write a book and call it "Under The Edward James Dome"

Best I can do people. Take it or leave it.Amityville: Death DomeCome on, you can't expect a billionaire to afford improvements to a stadium that will never be used for football again after December.Maybe a mud pit. Then, if you manage to "bowl a strike" and knock any cheerleaders or security guards into it, they are forced to mud wrestle.Just to put things in a fantasy perspective for the sake of stats:

Tyler Eifert was facing the 32nd-ranked team when it came to surrendering points to the TE position, the Steelers. 

He was shut down.

Gary Barnidge was facing the #1 team vs the for points allowed, the Cardinals. He ate them alive.

The week before he faced the #1-ranked Rams who gave up the fewest points vs the TE. They entered this week as #5 after being "Barnidged"

The real stat isn't some sort of obscure improvement, but that he's indefensible.

The NFL media and statisticians don't really look at "defending the TE" stats, but fantasy players do and fantasy points are cool indicator of effectiveness. Until there's a better way of looking at it, it's the QB rating of quick and dirty stats.

The quick and dirty "fantasy points" stat tells you that Barnidge is literally matchup-proof. There is no team that can defend or stop him.

Frankly, he's the best TE in the NFL right now. I'm not saying he has the most point potential - Eifert and Gronk could easily eclipse him. But neither of them can block for shit. Barnidge is as good of a blocker as he is a receiver.

The Browns have a run game that isn't. Meaning, they now have three RBs in a rotation who are lucky to combine for **forty fucking yards** on the ground **AS A GROUP**.

But damn if they don't catch and run all over the place. It's not just the Joe Thomas effect of having great blocking.

It's Gary Barnidge.

His most valuable contribution is that he's such a dangerous receiver and awesome blocker that teams cannot solve him. Duke Johnson running for 40 after the catch? Shit, better put a man on him. Whoops? said man isn't on Barnidge anymore? Josh rolls out and finds Barnidge.

Barnidge is one of the best offensive players in the NFL this year, period, at any position because of his overall impact.Same goes for TJ Hilton or any other "deep threat" guy like that. 

But don't you dare say anything bad. 

I remember when Hilton burned the Seahawks and everyone was all "SEAHAWKS SUCK" and "TJ HILTON RULES" yet for the billion replays we saw, no one understood he had a free release the entire day with no one anywhere near him.

I'm sorry, you give me 10 yards and full steam and I could get by Sherman or Revis standing still.That's the other side of being a great route runner, which is technique and chess.

His physical technique is hard to defend and he knows what way to engage the man in front of him to get past him.

If you lean left, he can divert you left. If you come at him, he can absorb you. It doesn't matter.

No one ever wins the one on one battle with him.

Being a great route runner is 90% decided off the snap. He is flawless. GOAT.&gt; Ability to create 

I always compare route running with a swingman/guard in basketball.

You have to be able to create your own shot from anywhere on the floor, shoot from the arc or drive the lane in traffic.

Some guys are dependent upon ball movement to spread the floor to get space to shoot. Other guys can bait the defender and shoot over them or get past them. Or even multiple defenders.

You ever wonder why there's bench snipers who shoot threes vs a guy who is like Curry it's that Curry can create his own shot at any time and is good enough to nail it while a say...Kyle Korver is better with ball movement. He can knock down open threes all day, but only Steph can get himself open consistently. Kyle can't. I don't think Kyle is any worse than Steph at open looks, it's just that Kyle can't get himself open at-will.

That's the same with deep threat WRs. The Ted Ginns, DeSean Jacksons and TJ Hiltons of the world are the Kyle Korvers of football. They can't create, but if the scheme creates openings for them, they're gone. Untouchable.

The Antonio Browns of the world are the guys who are like Steph Curry and can create anywhere on the field. They get open.Michael Bennett didn't tear ligaments in his neck.You can hear/feel ligaments tear.

If I ever feel ill and want to vomit it out, I think about the guy who tore ligaments in his back and neck trying to get me off of him when he was high on PCP and choking out his GF.He's probably done forever.

That's the problem with heavy helmets, they pull your head in ways it's not meant to go. 

Ligament repair/reconstruction is fraught with lifetime instability afterward. Add a heavy helmet which adds exaggeration to the motion of the joints?

He's done for good. He would be a fool to come back. They're probably going to have to fuse bones in his neck.

One of my kids was friends with the son of an ex-NFLer who had that surgery. It was the bone fusion that ended his career. He couldn't fully turn his neck. It was bizarre to watch him turn his body to talk to someone.* Underrated as a QB and largely forgotten

* Domestic abuser, also largely forgotten

http://www.nytimes.com/1996/02/23/sports/pro-football-jury-rapidly-acquits-moon-of-spousal-abuse-charges.html

The jury were idiots.I want the game to drastically change.I put the blame on the NFLPA for not having good post-career benefits.

The NFL should pay them a little more, but give zero benefits and be fully indemnified.

Then, the NFLPA should take something like 10% or more of the salary of each player and put it into savings and investments to pay for pensions, disability, insurance, etc.

The Ontario Teachers' Pension Plan:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ontario_Teachers%27_Pension_Plan

If the NFLPA were institutional investors, they could buy the entire league with $150bn.Maybe relative to...other receiving TEs?

He was no Jason Witten or Heath Miller. Not even close.You don't want a VD in your red zone.Maybe, I suppose the idea is improve blocking for the run game, but Davis is still a better receiver than a blocker.

Is he going to suddenly be a better blocker than he was this year (when he was in) so far?

Because the 49ers have the worst running attack in the NFL. He didn't help.

Everyone in this thread is like "oh he's such a great blocker"...relative to pass-catching TEs he was pretty good...once upon a time.Man, I am really excited about **CBS ALL-ACCESS** and that **CBS ALL-ACCESS** will have a Star Trek component. At $5.99/mo, **CBS ALL-ACCESS** is a very affordable way to keep abreast of your favourite CBS shows like the new Star Trek. Being able to watch on-demand is a great feature of **CBS ALL-ACCESS** that will make watching Star Trek fun for it's viewers. What better way to celebrate the 50th anniversary of a forward-thinking show like  ~~Rampart~~ I mean *Star Trek* than by "beaming down" the content via the **CBS ALL-ACCESS** platform!

**CBS ALL-ACCESS** **CBS ALL-ACCESS** **CBS ALL-ACCESS**

**CBS ALL-ACCESS**&gt; Top Edit Shameless Plug:

**CBS ALL-ACCESS**

Being serious now...I've been promoting the idea of a "Star Trek Universe" show for...a long time now and I hope someone finally saw it and did something with it.

The premise was two main things: one, would be to solicit excellent writers to create sci-fi stories that were compelling in the STU. Second would be to give actors who've always wanted to take part in the STU a chance to do so by focusing on great storytelling and guest appearances rather than a regular cast. Sort of like the Twilight Zone.

If it's gonna "introduce new characters", it sounds like it'll just be a new crew. But it could also mean that it introduces new characters on a weekly basis or a mini-arc. Or that it could return to the new characters from time to time. I loved the movies and his hand in them.

Besides, as long as they use great writers, you get the best of both worlds. Kurtzman brought a lot of excitement and emotion to the series, which could be very dry and technical at times. Or the emotion manufactured, a la "Troi episodes". 

He's very good at boiling down basic human struggles. I'd like to see ABC get "TGIF" going and maybe CBS could counter with "Geek Friday" or even "Geek Saturday" and do:

* 8pm: Star Trek

* 9pm: X-Files

* 10pm: ????

There is a market for this. Who stays at home on weekend nights? Star Trek's geek core audience. Families. There you have it.

Friday night doesn't need to be insane numbers, it just needs to reach the audience that advertisers have a hard time getting to because they're tech-savvy enough to use ad-blockers on the computers that have replaced their televisions. I want to back up what /u/BisFitty said:

&gt;you can't wrap your head around black Civil Rights or feminism

I'm a civil rights activist and a civil libertarian and I want nothing to do with your identity politics.

Allow me to "educate yourself" here:

http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/civil%20rights

&gt;the rights that every person should have **regardless** of his or her sex, race, or religion

Once you have introduced "fem" or "black", it's no longer civil rights. It's social justice.

Social justice is about redistributing rights within society based upon group labels. Civil rights is about respecting everyone's rights.

Social justice can take your civil rights away because you have a right or liberty some other group wants. Social justice is identity politics for the group, civil rights is specifically colour/race/etc-blind.

Civil rights seeks to elevate everyone, not redistribute everything.

You and I can both be able to want equality, but the difference is that I want to make you *more* equal and social justice seeks to make others less equal. "For my workspace, I'm gonna need 40 acres and a mule"That sounds CubanKeep going and we'll let you live in the ~~big house~~ */r/CenturyClub*The fact it's NASCAR is unintentionally hilarious.I kept thinking about the transplant couple. These Civil War reenactors are an odd bunch. They have "pride" about their geographical heritage and you can obviously guess what those two transplants thought "Oh we'll be able to express our Southern Pride, I'm so excited **HOLY SHIT HE'S DRESSED UP IN SLAVE ATTIRE, WE'VE MADE A TERRIBLE MISTAKE!"**Proof that even in retailing, Cascadia gets it. Nordstrom are the best. REI are awesome. I'll let you in on a little secret...the CBSA will absolutely hate you for it, but if you've lost your passport, you can still get back into Canada.

Just be prepared for it to take awhile and the immigration officer to stab you repeatedly with eye daggers. 

LPT: if you lose your travel documents, file a police report. It goes a long way to helping you get across the border.They're also so "LIVE FREE OR DIE" that they are the only state where adults don't have to wear seat belts.

They actually fight that.BREAKING NEWS: THE SECOND-MOST UNQUALIFIED FEMALE GOP CANDIDATE SAYS THE MARGINALLY MORE UNQUALIFIED FEMALE GOP CANDIDATE WOULD NOT MAKE A GOOD PRESIDENT

Pot, meet kettle.

It occurs to me that I can't name a single female US politician I respect that isn't a Democrat.You might want to calm the post-play theatrics, Cam. They could have easily injured you on that play and didn't.Oh look, Cam is talking shit for them roughing him up after he showed them up with his first down gesticulating on 4th and 1Incredible patience to wait for the waves to passIt was only a matter of timeLuck is shaken. He's not setting his feet. He's hopping all the time.What is this, the PGA Tour now?I can't believe Frank Gore didn't even chip the edge rusher before he...inexplicably ran his TE route?!?Thomas Davis read that the play was supposed to go to Bradshaw and held him up LOLPlanet ColtslineIf you're noticing Luck is being pressured on every play and being hit on every play, I'd like to ask what good Frank Gore is anymore.At some point the Colts need to just put Bradshaw in there and get some pass pro and different running looks"Pressure comes up the middle, Bradshaw picks it up"

If only the coaches had...the ability to see why he should be their every down back based upon results.I wonder the NFL can get a group discount on MCL surgeries this week. Maybe just line everybody up on the OR and go it production style.This is retarded. Why use Bradshaw on a 3rd and 3 power run when you have Frank Gore?

All season they've done this shit where they put their power back in on pass plays and their passing back in on short yardage!

I hate you so much, Pep.And use the diminutive RB compared to the fireplug Gore?

Oh, that's right. It's 3rd down. Bradshaw is the 3rd down back. That means that regardless of context or situation, Bradshaw must be the RB! 

As is tradition.Pep Hamilton has no influence on the defense, thankfully.Peps gonna PepWell if that NFL thing doesn't work out for ya Stewie, you've always got "hotel bar pianist" to fall back on."I love to see young people who can do different things with their fingers"

-GrudenGruden:

Loves RBs who can play piano

Hates QBs who can also runLooks like Cam was actually trying to pull it back in and throw but Stewart didn't want to let it go because of the prior fumble.Should have been a yellow flag and a red cardWell Oregon is the evolution or PorygonHe's trying to contrast himself with Pep Hamilton.Damn that kid's as big as LukeSeattle's whole "you can't flag us on every play" thingI wished I could challenge Gruden commentsYou must be a football godVery nice PA there.The rain really took that one.

Gotta throw hard dude.I don't love Gruden and he says some weird fucking shit all the time."Dying duck you quack so sweet"There's enough shit to go around for everyone there.There's a guy in my fantasy league named Taco CorpWhat's stupid is that the play they called for Gore would have been perfect for BradshawHarper is trying to squeeze Gore into submission.Colts 8-1 run confirmedThat whole series was inverse.

You want to call two plays where the LB leaks out towards the edges, get Bradshaw with edge speed.

But it's 3rd and 1 with a stacked line?

No, take Gore out. The guy who excels at running straight ahead into contact. Put Bradshaw in there and have him wait for a hole to develop while the Panthers know that and call a run blitz from the strong side edge.

I hate you so much Pep.OH MY FUCKING GOD. THE GROUND IS SHIT. STOP HAVING THE RBs RUN HORIZONTALLY AND WAIT FOR BLOCKS TO DEVELOP WHEN THE BLOCKERS HAVE NO FOOTING.What does it mean?Well Jobs *was* a big proponent of IBM's Power PC series of chips, it's just that Intel was cheaper over the long-term.How many touchdowns for you to be my wide receiver?No-brainerNot when they get dumbed down by network executivesCam is learning...evolving.This is more like "The Duel At 10 Paces Where The Rain Made Everything Slippery And We Shot Ourselves"He Roethlisberger'd that throw to Ginn there.Riverboat Ron is the best nickname ever because it means he can get away with all kinds of shit and people just go "Riverboat Ron gonna Riverboat Ron" and shrug and that's it.Riverbank Ron?GG Pep Hamilton

Sees that Gore's YPC is only 2.8 for the game and calls draw plays rather than...score points for the team.Yeah but the Falcons are always cheating, piping in exterior rain.That was really nice coverage. Great move at the end to swat the ball.All Spanish commentators are overly excited.

Spanish families don't have hyperactive children in them, they send them off to commentator schools at an early age as an outlet for their gifts.Beer-urn Ver-nurBradshaw overpowering Kuechly?

I'll credit that to the wet ground.That lane for Gore was open before the ball was even snapped."Bradshaw and Gore, you can't find..."

&lt;thinks about how he's probably gone too far with his intended superlative&gt;

"Competitive...yeah, competitive guys. Man, these guys are the best. They compete like a pair of champions, I tell you Mike. If there was a competitive competition, these guys would be competitors in it."Harrison got beaten so badly there

EDIT: LOL Harrison actually pushed him right into Gore.

"Here, let me help!"Despite the missed block, you know why that series worked?

Bradshaw, a passing-type back got a draw play on a passing-type of playcall/formation.

3rd and 1?

Again, do you bring in Gore whose strength and bulk would get you a first down just by him falling forward?

No. You use Bradshaw.

You will switch out RBs on every play which is beyond annoying and disallows any rhythm, but you won't do it when it counts.

I hate you so much Pep.ESPN MNF has jumped the shark. They're comparing Mike Shula to Don Shula in a positive light, in a totally serious wayI almost think the producers are trolling Gruden.

"Hey, let's see if we can make him say exaggerated shit about Mike Shula. Quick, put up an infographic that says Mike is as good as his father."Oikos yogourt has lots of calcium for strong bones, plus protein for muscular bones!Somebody get the Mexican broadcast crew to get the pinata down. We need this shit done right, pronto.Freeman is a stud.It's Tolbert Time!It's a shame because the balls are so wet right now.If there were ever a time where Gore needed to be in there, now is that time.There were 3 options underneath for the 1st down that were open

EDIT: the purpose of that play is to make all of the coverage peel off and follow the guy streaking downfield to open it up WHICH IT DID and they never intended to even look at anyone else but TYNobody really does it better than Ted Ginn when it comes to returning punts (on the sudden change defense)^^^PepThe harder it gets, the more they like it unless you pull out too earlyHoly shit, why is Greg Olsen on the sideline there?

LIES, GRUDEN! 

LIES!RE-JECTEDI also think he's hurt. He's probably feeling it in his ribs every time he throws.That wasn't PI, that was a great flop/sellAll this proves is that the rain is the most effective defense vs Andrew LuckMoncrief had beaten Norman. He couldn't decide if he wanted Andre or Moncrief and got confused threw between them."Fucking blank!"

Such a lady.They're trying to get into FG range and the Panthers know it."STAPLES CENTER IS A FUN PLACE TO WATCH BASKETBALL"

Thinks for a moment

"WHEN THE CLIPPERS ARE HERE. BECAUSE THE LAKERS ARE DEPRESSING."

EDIT: dismiss this comment if you aren't watching Prime Ticket LADeAndre is like "I'm not touching that Blake it's all you. Go shoot FTs."Memphis are great guys, going easy on the Warriors and letting them win by 50 so they don't get a real tune-up and forget what a challenge is."Mom, Dad that's gross."

"Shut up. You were conceived in that seat."His heels rise and lower like it's bullet time"All that means is that they cannot Chris Webber"Yeah this is ridiculous. 

Gaming seems pretty dark. You have Activision buying King and all of these games going to microtransactions, MS and Sony DGAF about you.

Nintendo treats you alright, except their console is DOA. 

You can PC game, but Steam will nuke you from orbit if you piss them off and the "ownership" model of games is debatable. 

They should be treating you better, but they know you can't go elsewhere. Taco Johns are what you need after you Taco BellIf all goes well, I doubt he'll be on the team by 430 ET tomorrowYou need an air horn, a ninja suit and an unobstructed path out of your house to the front of it for when shit goes down.It's like you pulled the pin on the ProRevenge grenade and held it up to the people you were trying to get back without letting go.Yeah, I hate it when a woman has a bunch of rings to take off before she gives you a handy dandy&gt; My dad is from near Erie, Pennsylvania so he grew up a Browns fan. 

I'm gonna save this quote for the next time Browns/Bengals fans ask how there can be Steelers fans in Ohio.

Erie is Steeler country, despite it being Bills country. 

I always love driving through Erie from NY because I can get Steeler shit so easily.Glennon available for a mid-round pick after 1pm ET confirmedApparently not. I've been told by many people in the media that there is simply no film or tape of a lot of older games. 

Dude, I can remember in the 1990s going to Clippers games that weren't televised *at all*. Anywhere. We'd actually pick games because they wouldn't be on TV. And they weren't the only team. Sportscenter and the like was bizarre because they would either just give a score with no highlights or get a little tape from the house video used on the Jumbotron.

Sports in general - there's a lot of tape missing. And then there's tape they had which got re-used. 

I once asked Deacon Jones why they don't just go back and count all of his sacks from the old games and he said he already thought of it and no one had any tapes. Didn't exist. He said team employees and journalists would give him a count, but the NFL wouldn't accept it. 

It's just lost history.The best RB in the NFL is Devonta Freeman

The best QB in the NFL is Andy Dalton

The best TE in the NFL is Gary Barnidge

The best WR in the NFL is Deandre Hopkins

The best CB in the NFL is Josh Norman

The Broncos finally got their passing game going and still managed to be undefeated

Andrew Luck is statistically one of the worst QBs in the NFL

I mean...how long should I go here?He's incredible. It's like Gronkowski, except with blocking.I use Google. I'm a researcher.

I've even been paid to find shit for people.

I'm a paid researcher.

I'm a professional.

I'm a professional, paid researcher.Because the average fat guy isn't Chris Christie.


You gotta understand something: these people are fat narcissists. They have nothing to do with fat women, other than being fat. They don't speak for fat women. They don't represent fat women. Most women, fat or not aren't narcissists. 

Narcissists will say or do anything to get power and playing the victim card is always at the top of their deck. Fat discrimination just happens to be convenient as it's a sensitive subject filled with a lot of misunderstandings and misinformation. Narcissists like to gaslight, use circular reasoning and unverifiable claims. Obesity is a muddy issue to most people who don't want to confront a narcissist anyway, so they get to use it as a cudgel to beat people with.We did that and covered them with bubble wrap. It worked. Looks odd...but it works.And another piece of engineering to go wrong.My apologies to everyone. I won't bore you with excuses, I just didn't get it done and I should have done better. Rankings will be done next week. My streak starts anew then.&gt; I was told to get a doctors note to prove that I get a period.

I'd be tempted to bring them a bloody tampon in a fucking ziploc bag to prove it.

Around the developed world, healthcare costs are sky high and doctors are a finite resource. Asking people for medical notes in most instances is selfish and stupid.If you quit and decide not to sue, please publicly shame them.What took you so long&gt; I was disappointed when I saw all of our opponents lose game after game.

It's like my exes. They bring a good game and then are wrecked for future opponents.Now it's interesting because we can see who is "way out there" (as one of the analysis posts in these threads each week) but it doesn't differentiate between people who are just out of touch vs people who are early to a trend. I think it's a product of the NFL's lack of parity.

The list ends up with bubbles I draw around the teams when it's done to get an idea of tiers. Before it seemed like at least the top 16 teams were arguably in relative tiers, but now it's not even half of that and there's about 24 teams you have to decide which is "less worse" and are bad enough on any given week to negate any sort of differentiation you might have had in drawing circles around big groups.

Most fans of the imperfect teams know they're so bad that they aren't as passionate about arguing their terribleness. People seem more interested in arguing for perceived sleights. When everyone is universally bad, people aren't lacking respect they feel they deserve. They feel they deserve what they get. 

Until we can get people to passionately argue about who is truly the worst and make it personal, I think this year is a going to be a bit of a dud in general. Plus, we just now finally had a Packers/Broncos game where two of the top bubble teams finally squared off.As a Mets and Steelers fan, Sunday was horrible. It's part of the reason I didn't get my rankings in. I didn't want to write the blurb. Then shit happened etc.

At least we still have the (inexplicable) Devils.The Nats are gonna be back, reloaded.

We got an intentional walk on them with Matt Williams at the helm. They dropped a lot of winnable games. 

I expect them to be back and be angry. I'll be delighted if we are to them what the Royals are to us. It happens. But they are a great team. It won't be so easy next year.I love big, floppy, greasy NYC slices as much as I like a crispy, chewy, tomato-y slice with 1/2" of cheese baked under it.

Hate my indecisiveness. &gt; who do it for money

And yet I find the "fantasy experts" who are being paid to be the worst of all. You can crowdsource much better information from /r/fantasyfootball if you read what people have to say because they will give you all of the arguments.

I can only speak for myself, but I have no paycheque or editor. If I say something controversial, I'm not trying to drum up page clicks by being crazy. I don't have a reputation to worry about which causes me to not take risks and say potentially unpopular things.

I think you *can* trust a group of 32 volunteers because a single person only brings certain perspectives and can easily miss other arguments due to bias.

We're supposed to be bias-free and having 32 people bring different perspectives ensures it to a redundantly ridiculous amount. I think you could probably get the same ranking outcomes with 8-10 people, TBPH.I was thinking you were going to say to torque down the others to make this one looser, but you decided to go full sadist and I support your choice.&gt; I found it disturbing that, according to the article, 30% of self-identified liberals

They aren't really liberals.

Case in point:

Someone yesterday said "black civil rights"

"Black civil rights" isn't a thing. The entire point of civil rights is to remove "black" from the equation. There is no race, creed, colour, religion, etc. 

They were using "black civil rights" to describe social justice.

Social justice is the polar opposite of civil rights, yet I find myself on a regular basis having to point that fact out. There are ignoramuses out there who believe that social justice is civil rights. 

Civil rights specifically enumerates that it is completely blind. It relies on civil liberties to get things done.

Social justice specifically enumerates groups, such as blacks, women, men, white Christians, etc. It requires civil liberties to be abridged for the good of the group.

There's an entire population of self-styled liberals out there who actually aren't liberals at all. What they don't see is that arguments for MRAs and their goals follow the same formula as social justice. The only difference is their bias and the variables. If you support civil rights, the MRAs and SJWs don't have power. The social justice group are empowering MRAs as well because they go "me too" when they are able to make the same arguments about being a maligned gender. Christians do it with religious persecution.

Identity politics are the sphere of conservatives who want to conserve their specific desires. Identity politics are not liberal. Social justice is identity politics. These people are not liberals.

EDIT: MRAs and SJWs, since I will manage to piss everyone off, why don't you pick up a dictionary before engaging in butthurt downvotes. "I don't like it" isn't a reason to downvote. Being wrong is. I am simply telling you the literal definition. It's right. Don't blame the messenger because you're biased.IIRC the fucking ham was made from turkey at one point.I would comment here far more often if I wasn't constantly left speechless; this instance is no exceptionShe's like Norman Rockwell if Norman Rockwell loved himself as much as he loved Americana. I can't give it a 10 because it needed about 15 minutes more to develop Kate and her motivations. After the extraction, any reasonable person would have capitulated to Alejandro and done whatever he said. Her intransigence isn't well-explained and smoking and drinking only tell me she's bothered - it says nothing about her personal morality and convictions.

I don't think it could decide if it was about her or not. You said she's a prop. Was that the intent?

As the only person to resist from Silvio on up, she should have been the focus of what happens if you stand up. Everyone gave in but her. And she's a prop?

I hope there's a Director's Cut that fleshes her out some more. Emily Blunt isn't a good enough actress to make a gourmet meal out of the morsels and leftovers they tossed at her.Well guess what?

The colonials have got it covered.

And which colonials?

The *French* ones!

http://www.fifthtown.ca/artisan_cheese/editorial/ontarios_cheese_innovation_score/

Well, at least it's still in the Commonwealth.Lumpy cheddar fondue?

You could make croutons with the grease?

Look, what else are the Swiss supposed to do with all of their caves? Hide from the Germans in them?I think now they'll remember how to use him.

Last night was enough. It was infuriating. You can guarantee that when the situation called for Gore, Bradshaw was in there. When the situation called for Bradshaw, Gore was in there.

They never forgot about Gore. They just forgot what he is, which is a between the tackles bruiser who has no business being in there on passing downs and ought to be in there in every short yardage situation and 1st down.Nothing will change if they don't get personnel groupings right. 

His biggest sin not knowing what formations to use.This is tough for me to say...well not this part. This part is easy.

I detest Jim Irsay and wish your team nothing but misery and failure.

This GIF sums it up for me as I'm not without honour:

http://gfycat.com/FreshBlackAchillestang

It's fucking ridiculous for you guys to be gimped like that. You've played with one hand tied behind your back. And the next guilty party that needs to go is that worm, Grigson. That's difficult to say. Because as long as he's there, you're screwed. You'll be scary good if you get an actually competent GM who isn't an egotistical prick.

I want you guys to lose fair and square. &gt; wasn't the main problem the offensive line and pass protection more than anything?

WHY YES, YES IT WAS.

And what was Pep's solution to that?

"Let's be all tricky and shit. Let's put in Frank Gore in passing plays! Never mind that he's an ageing downhill runner with suspect pass blocking skills! The best way to utilise him is not establishing a ground and pound game, but having him stand there looking lost on every passing down! Yeah!

And let's get Ahmad Bradshaw, one of the pass blocking backs in the NFL! He can surely help protect Andrew Luck! But we're not gonna do that. We're going to use him to establish the power running game. Is he good at that? Of course not! But if you ran a power run game with Gore, the opponent would guess that! Pep Hamilton is all about trickery. So it's time to have a power run game with the pass blocking/catching specialist! No one would ever guess!"

Except that every team guessed that and were never fooled.

You can't blame the O-line for not blocking when you have the wrong people/wrong play called. If you wanna pass, put a back in who can deal with the blitzer that got free. Don't have Frank Gore standing out there in the flat looking at the game clock and John Candy. Apparently he's too old to turn around and go "Yo Andy I'm open" or some shit.

I am just some random asshole on a couch and I have been ranting about this since Week 1. When a random asshole on a couch figures it out before you do, you're not doing the right thing...PEP.No, the pattern is that they want to dominate people with absolute control.

This is about power, not comfort.That reminds me of the old joke about the Polish Sex Manual:

In

Out

Repeat if necessary Ticklerape: soon to be a thingI don't know what's more annoying, that you didn't source your post or that you somehow felt the need to sign it.I was gonna say "I'll never ask for anything on the side the same way again"&gt;Prashant Raj

I googled him.

He looks like you'd expect.I will say this every time I see it: if people don't know the difference between *policy* and **law**, they are tools.

I can say that it's my *policy* to punch anyone in the nose who looks at me crooked, but the **law** says it's assault and is illegal.

When are people going to close this "policy" loophole?UK makes no sense. If you are forced to repeat a year, it's as if the year you failed doesn't count.That's why you don't make a 32yo situational power back the centrepiece of your offense, **RYAN**.Because it's how propaganda works.

I used to be friends with this guy Bill Werndl who was a sports talk rumour conduit. The kind of shit he said on the air got people up in arms. What he told me off-air was even more ridiculous.

These teams use reporters and the like to leak the info they want out there. It's NFL PsyOps. 

It's no different than showing run and throwing. Or showing pass and running. If you tell the truth every time, when you get interviewed/quoted, any sort of silence is seen as confirmation.

If you just say whatever all the time, it's like deciphering hand signals - what's real? What isn't?

Considering how much the Colts have thrown with Gore in there or run with their worthless RBs, I tend to approach this with caution.That's why I think you're gonna see some throws over the middle to the TEs, Andre and Moncrief.So a typical 2015 Gore outing.It's like deja vu all over againI'm a hold on Bryant if given the choice. He doesn't have the same reps/chemistry with Ben as he does the backups. If there's one guy who's likely to get open on the Colts it's Moncrief because he runs short routes and makes moves on them.You should rub that on our asses, too because that miss really chapped our hidesPersonal wealth is relative and defined in many ways.

It can be money, family, happiness, peace of mind - many things.

A dollar to you is meaningless while a dollar to someone in Thailand isn't.

You've elevated happiness to the pedestal of being a millionaire. 

Right now you're in debt with a negative cashflow.

Life is like a building that elevates you to the sky. You need a solid foundation and then to build incrementally, brick by brick. You want simple happiness, but happiness is only simple once you've mastered it's complexity due to repetition. That's why life throws challenges at us: we learn to absorb them, be immune, parry them or redirect them back from whence they came.

You need to practise self-defence and learn how to save a dollar. You are too focused on the big goal of being a kickass millionaire and not the steps you must take to get there. No one has explained to you that every dollar you save adds to your wealth in the same way that taking the time to enjoy the little things in life and take stock of your small personal victories is key to building yourself up, brick by brick.

If you focus on your setbacks and not overcoming them, you can't move on. If you're going to let go regardless, do you let go of your existence or your bullshit holding you down?

Whether or not you realise it, you've made the admission that you lack fundamental life skills. Of course you don't want to live life any longer if you're no good at it. People quit hard things all the time. But they don't get good at hard things without a little coaching, guidance and proper repetition.

Why don't you give yourself a chance to simplify and take pleasure in the little things before you call it quits? Stop and smell the roses. Think about what that means on several levels. You cannot conquer the physiology of your brain without a workout. You have to train it to deal with the parts that you don't control and don't make sense.The only way I can change your view is to point out that some people are more prone to reason and logic while others are prone to superstition, intuition, etc.

For people who are reasonable, peer pressure, bullying, etc won't do much to change their minds, only their outward appearance of conformity. 

For people who aren't rational? Well, they change their minds all the time. That's why they're always following the newest gluten-free vaccine alternative or whatever. Reason and logic are a skill. That's why you need to use analogies with people like that, so they can be lead to reasonable thinking. You can't just give them the facts because they will default to confirmation bias and selectively use the facts that suit their argument/preconceived notion/feeling.

I think what you're asking is if it's ok to give up on irrational people and I think your viewpoint is flawed because rational thinking is like playing guitar or sewing - it's an acquired talent. Even if you think you are genetically "rational" or whatever, you still had to learn how to reason over time. It simply meant you were interested in it.

Take "gifted" children for an example. These are kids who are just more interested in certain goals so their drive makes things easier for them. I don't think kids are gifted. I think they have different determination motivations. Just because you were gifted with introspective thought, you still had to take time to live and become reasonable through time and repetition. 

I don't believe that irrational people are simply predestined to be that way and it seems like you're saying they're a basket case. If anything, rational repetition taught to an intuitive person gives them the best of both worlds, which makes them potentially *superior* since intuition and following your feelings isn't a skill, but a desire and runs contrary to the forgings of the logical mind.Of all the Halloween pics I've seen so far (and it's a lot), this is far and away the best one.Thank god there's no more of theseI got about 30% through and got bored from the lack of contrition.We're going to emancipate you...from your jobInitial Jim Bob Cooter report:

* Amazed that immigration let him into the country

* He smartly moved Calvin to the (weaker) left side of the Chiefs and had him on Sean Smith

* He put both Bell and Riddick in at the same time and Riddick was playing WR against the Chiefs stronger side DBsInteresting the Chiefs have decided to come out throwing...and then West gets stopped for a loss.

They must know something we don't.I think they've found an exploit here with KelceTD-saving tackle by Tulloch. West took off like a bullet.YesThe only person more fooled than the Lions on that play was the FOX cameramanI love Levy looking back. It's because he thinks he was being held (debatable), but in my mind he's yelling "WHY DID EVERYONE BUT ME GO THE WRONG WAY?" in real-time.Apparently I'm glad we're not getting Chevy Equinox commercials here in CanadaOne of those great mysteries just happened:

* Did Abdullah decide to take that out of the end zone of his own volition?

* Did the team tell him to return the ball no matter what and try to make a play?

Either way, someone is desperate.dat (lack of) blocking doeAbdullah on Abdullah violenceSo far Jim Bob Cooter has lined up his RB as a WR twice and thrown to them.

I don't know if that's his own personal wrinkle or an indictment on the state of the WR corps and it's quality/depth.What about Jersey?Kelce was wide open and he's worked so far. Bad playcall.Dear Charcandrick West,

When your QB is facing pressure, doing the tango with the LB isn't your job. It's to find some open space so he can dump the ball off to you.

EDIT: on the replay, that was the worst "route" ever, CharcandrickBecause we're worse

-Sincerely, fucking duhHey Jim Bob Cooter, y'all got any of that offensive line coaching?It's a shame because the Chiefs are much better on paper.Yeah at the very beginning. Little flag route. Got knocked down.James Iforgothowtospellit pulled up as to not get a penalty and Smith took advantage.

They'll make him pay for that.TAKE NOTES, BARRYI always think Travis Lewis is Levy and then I remember he's hurt.GO CHIEFSKelce woulda caught thatKelce didn't even break contain until Smith had thrown the ball.

Anyway, TD ALEX "WHEELS" SMITHOh shit, now Smith is gonna think he's a good CBWow, he's lucky he used his big hand instead of the little oneHe could/should have checked down to Abdullah but Abdullah wasn't lookingBODY SLAMAs of today, you have evolved.

We dub thee:

Charcandrichard WestI just saw a commercial for Balmain X H&amp;M and thought it was a joke.

Google tells me: not a joke.I didn't know anything about futbol when I chose Everton and I doubt I'd change now.Sam Rosen has no idea what he's talking about, but John Lynch is doing a great job cleaning up his mess. Rosen seems to think the Lions can do all of these things, but they aren't making pre-snap reads and adjustments at all and the backs/receivers aren't working as the hot read.

You have guys meandering around and/or not looking back to see if Stafford needs to throw early.

Considering how bad the line has played, I think I'd run with my head on a swivel. But even if you didn't know that, the receivers need to see the play breaking down in real-time and they aren't.

Whatever Cooter has done right, he's completely failed here. This is fundamental stuff and they are completely lost. I don't know if that's something you can adjust at halftime. That's just complete lack of preparation.I don't know if it's Stafford selling "this is my fault" or how people will see it at home or in the stands, but this hasn't been solely his fault or even majorly his fault.

It looks like it's his fault because he's not ripping people to shreds. Maybe he should. It's not really his style, but if they're not gonna help him and instead get him killed/intercepted, when is enough enough?Coaching staffCaldwell needs to go to the NCAA and never come backVery convenient camera angleThere's this Bose commercial in Canada where these two teens are about to kiss and I swear the girl looks like that Pattycake porn actress/whatever she is.I dunno why they think it's brave, you're getting speared regardless."Blocking up front"

Hey Lions offense, are you paying attention to the demonstration?Yeah but that's a perpetual thingI'm excited for today because we're gonna see if Diggs can really take advantage or not. Don't you follow international news?

UKIP doesn't want any more loser migrants.Sam Rosen...I didn't realise how awful he was until today.COME ON DETROIT.

SALVAGE THIS GAME.

BLOCK FOR STAFFORD. GIVE HIM TIME.Illegal man downfield, Sam.Showerthought (literally at halftime)

Calvin Johnson is proof the Lions have quit on Caldwell.

This is a dude who can be full stop with triple coverage and come down a 14' high pass.

Now he can't even catch a ball in stride in single coverage with his man beaten.

He isn't *that* hurt. He didn't forget how to play.Crowd shot of British Lions fans contemplating their fandom choiceTabarnak, Duvernay-TardifThe flag hit the ground before the ball did.Pepperidge Farm remembersCome on, that's just cruel to give them False hope while Caldwell still existsWoo SqueezeSeriously some Russian oligarch should just buy AdidasEverybody loves Swamp ThingI'm bored nowBoth have plenty of disgusting brown water.The problem is no permanent solution at QB.

Manziel should have been cut a long time ago. 

You can't move on when you're still living with your drunken ex.So you're saying they are going to upgrade two more times?If the Bengals were a dance, they'd be this:

http://imgur.com/gallery/jsm0x2cI don't think you should trade with the Browns anymoreYeah, get it done. Just like Trent Richardson.

* You got fleeced by Michael Lombardi

* Grigson is a disaster

Actually, I'm thinking the Browns probably called you guys first.&gt; Is Farmer going to be in charge of trading their 2 best players?

Good question, isn't he suspended?

OH SNAP~~They would never trade with us.~~

These Browns are so hopeless, they probably would.No, I don't think Joe Thomas' nutritional regimen meets Chip's criteria.You know you're bad if a Chiefs WR gets a TD off youYeah so far that's a wasted pick. Well, if you insist but we would have offered draft pick compensation.

We giving or receiving? Can everyone just kneel down so I can take a power nap before the 1pm games?I don't think it's realistic because they don't have anyone to be an interim coach. In that case they should have benched them with 12 minutes remaining in the 1st quarter.Wasn't there a kickstarter to buy the Lions from the Fords?

Because I'd chip in a couple of bucks if it meant watchable football in the future.For some reason I imagined a giant sphincter with a big "KC" on it.I'm with you. I can't recall having the volume for a Sam Rosen-called game in a long time, at least not a single game where I didn't have the distraction of multiple games on other TVs.

He's terrible. He's been making play by play calls and analysis that's outright incorrect.Lance "GARBAGE KING" MooreInteresting coincidence because the Lions are playing like Mr BeanNo that's just Lion stoolThat TD was so fucking hot, Lance Moore was ON FIREBy a squad?

Firing squad?

Or just burned at the stake?

Really, I'm cool with either option.Yeah let's get Megatron all taped up so he can continue to injure himself in a game that's long decidedWhere's the horse collarOnly if it results in Caldwell's firing.

He's never going to SB without a ticketYeah but that show is terrible, almost as bad as her stand up routineSo British people...The face of dementiaI'm calculating a 25 minute power nap.

Come on Lions. Completions in the middle of the field.I don't think it's safe for you to lose too much weight too fast, which is also a health issue.

2 lbs per week is considered medically responsible. I would rather pay the extra money. It's not worth it to have loose skin because you lost weight too quickly.

And are you even eating a wholesome diet? You're going to lose fat and muscle. You don't want that. You need more than a veggie diet.

While I think you should lose the weight, do it under medical supervision. That way you can get a note from your doctor and maybe help yourself with the office politics.

Finally, use MyFitnessPal to track your nutrition so you KNOW if you're doing the right thing or not.That's really not the news we wanted to hear, but expected to hear.

Just preparing for confirmation of the worst.This is honestly the worst tackling I have ever seen by the Jets

EDIT: I mean all dayEric Decker. You might try covering him.Actually, the brutal truth is they're saying you're worthless except for being a conveniently wet hole side booty call.

Hitting Old Country Buffet on the way to the Walmart scooty puff isn't an active, fit guy's idea of a night out.

If you want to talk about misogyny, why would you even want the kind of man who thinks nothing more of you except a fuck hole to be used and discarded? Because he's hot? Are we going to argue that feminism is the right be vacuous and shallow?

Get real.&gt;Maybe my body size will change, and maybe it won't.

What will never change is your self-entitled delusions and ego.He was roundhouse kicking handicapped children at the Special Olympics up the road in his own personal "Tour Of Oppression"&gt; is this a famous radio station?

Indeed. One of the most famous radio stations in the USA and one of the few blowtorches on the continent. Guys like Dr Demento and Phil Hendrie grew out of their KFI roots.

It's a fantastic station. This Ragen bit is far funnier than anything Dr Demento or Phil Hendrie ever did.I prefer KNX 1070You work with a bunch of dumb fucks. I can't believe it took them this long to figure it out.I'll paraphrase what I said in the last thread:

&gt;You're fired, BisFitty

"I should tell my lawyer that you're *emancipating* me from my job?"&gt; I would have gotten to get the reaction of the couple that brought fucking Confederate officer uniforms!

At first I thought the conference call was to fire you.

Now I think it's to beg you not to sue them into oblivion and/or name them publicly. I love it!

Dan Bailey FGs are like crack for me!You should insist that the party wasn't cancelled, but surrendered to the North.General Tao TarkinLots of drops for BrandonYou steer the wheel 200' before the turnThese comments are now cancer 

Help me Obi-Mods, you're our only hopeNo Jalen gets it. The NBA gets reddit. I wouldn't be surprised if Silver himself was like "everybody reddit" because that's just how he rolls. The main reason why I'd go luxury over your "budget" cars are the safety features. Older economy cars usually don't have side airbags. Luxury cars usually do. Some econoboxes don't even have 4 wheel discs with ABS. How fitting, Colon on Colon violenceI agree. We were lucky to be there. We deserved it, but not like they did. The way they ate our bullpen up is on a level we don't touch.LPT: where there's smoke, there's fire

Or, in the case of the internet, where there's an army of enablers, there's a narcissist, addict or both.It's not the loss. I expected to lose. I picked you guys.

It's losing Bell. Out of the frying pan, into the fire. Get Ben, lose Bell.

It's cool. You can have the first two matchups this year. We'll just take the third \ud83d\ude08Yup. I remember people swarming to get the deals off the table and cleaning them out.Lego is never more than 30% off during BF. Usually the deals are slim. Target will do 20% off.

Lego will likely follow the same guidelines. Personally I think it's going to be brutal for them.

There are tons of TTLs this season, Lego has the most expensive one and the least discount on it. Skylanders and Infinity will be under $40, so half off. Dimensions has a higher SRP and will have a lesser discount. Dimensions will likely cost on sale what Skylanders costs at full SRP.

Where it won't work is if Dimensions has supply issues and goes full Amiibo and people flip shit Cabbage Patch Tickle Me Furby style and buy them up. Today Show etc will have to convince soccer moms that little Billy won't get one and his childhood will be ruined and lead to an adulthood of nonstop parental resentment if they don't get Dimensions.

IMO, Lego is gonna get smashed on this. Consumers won't look in video games for Lego, old gifters won't get it and the cost is way too high. Plus, Skylanders has their racing game, Infinity will tie in to Star Wars in theatres (and is a cheap upgrade for prior owners) while Amiibo will finally be attainable. Then factor in that Guitar Hero will need to be slashed in price and Rock Band will probably see a sale...

And we have Lego with their intransigence when it comes to price and value. They are outsiders here. I'm frankly appalled at the Dimensions prices. The expansion sets should be $0.10/brick + $2 or so for the DLC. It's up to 6 times that. Lego collectors are going to have to think long and hard about the price per brick.That's why they have that lever underneath, dude.And Rock Band 4

You need an adapter for old hardware. Sony stuff just works.I have a bunch of leagues where I got Bell, Lacy and Charles (auction).

This has been my most challenging year ever.Dude I saw Dr Yocum and Dr Fronek for my labrum and they both guessed the severity of the tear before even looking at my MRI. They could tell by watching me move the joint.Enter keyword "TORN" and we'll double your initial deposit up to $200!Today was a bad day as both a Mets and Steelers fan. Sucks if you're a Jets fan as well.

At least the Devils are hot lately. They're a few points out of first.

I think we all knew all along these Royals were not gonna go away. I'm ready to let this season go.They do?

What's wrong with people?

It's a dragon movie. About dragons. Dragon apocalypse. What did they expect, On Golden Pond? You would maybe have one shot to make a change, so if we're going to make a change we should do it right and go to the UN and argue for a 24 hour time clock that is universal worldwide.

Days would change at Greenwich Mean Time and when you have a system like this everybody would just set their clocks based upon whatever time the sun rises and whatever time the sun goes down - it would be the exact same time everywhere on the planet.

People would get up and be active during the day based upon when they were facing the sun which is the most natural for humans anyway.I find that whenever I use myopic the way OP did, people misunderstand and/or downvote it because they only have a myopic, narrow usage of the word: the medical condition.

Downvote me, myopians. Maybe the photographer is CujoIf you like Justice Porn, you like King.I guess the other half was the population.I tried to upvote your ABTF paragraph on mobileThis Draw Something is relevant:

http://i.imgur.com/9044eM6.jpgI almost picked up my laptop to post "kidney injury" during that game and when Marvin Jones got hit.The Broncos were playing their best football of the season last night and it wouldn't be enough to beat the Patriots except maybe 1-2 times out of 10.

I'd lay 4-1 odds minimum to get you to take the Broncos.Don't let your own fandom confuse you. You had a shitty gameplan and poor execution. You let the Broncos dictate to you and push the Packers around rather than do that to them.

The Patriots have way better coaching and preparation than you do. The Pats would put the Broncos on the defencive and they would crumble.Didn't you see last night when they trotted out the "22nd ranked" stat about Rodgers?Doesn't surprise me. Sometimes my knee will get stuck and I have the presence of mind to hop when it happens. I could imagine bad shit happening if I forced it.Edward James Semetary Zone

Or, King could write a book and call it "Under The Edward James Dome"

Best I can do people. Take it or leave it.Amityville: Death DomeCome on, you can't expect a billionaire to afford improvements to a stadium that will never be used for football again after December.Maybe a mud pit. Then, if you manage to "bowl a strike" and knock any cheerleaders or security guards into it, they are forced to mud wrestle.Just to put things in a fantasy perspective for the sake of stats:

Tyler Eifert was facing the 32nd-ranked team when it came to surrendering points to the TE position, the Steelers. 

He was shut down.

Gary Barnidge was facing the #1 team vs the for points allowed, the Cardinals. He ate them alive.

The week before he faced the #1-ranked Rams who gave up the fewest points vs the TE. They entered this week as #5 after being "Barnidged"

The real stat isn't some sort of obscure improvement, but that he's indefensible.

The NFL media and statisticians don't really look at "defending the TE" stats, but fantasy players do and fantasy points are cool indicator of effectiveness. Until there's a better way of looking at it, it's the QB rating of quick and dirty stats.

The quick and dirty "fantasy points" stat tells you that Barnidge is literally matchup-proof. There is no team that can defend or stop him.

Frankly, he's the best TE in the NFL right now. I'm not saying he has the most point potential - Eifert and Gronk could easily eclipse him. But neither of them can block for shit. Barnidge is as good of a blocker as he is a receiver.

The Browns have a run game that isn't. Meaning, they now have three RBs in a rotation who are lucky to combine for **forty fucking yards** on the ground **AS A GROUP**.

But damn if they don't catch and run all over the place. It's not just the Joe Thomas effect of having great blocking.

It's Gary Barnidge.

His most valuable contribution is that he's such a dangerous receiver and awesome blocker that teams cannot solve him. Duke Johnson running for 40 after the catch? Shit, better put a man on him. Whoops? said man isn't on Barnidge anymore? Josh rolls out and finds Barnidge.

Barnidge is one of the best offensive players in the NFL this year, period, at any position because of his overall impact.Same goes for TJ Hilton or any other "deep threat" guy like that. 

But don't you dare say anything bad. 

I remember when Hilton burned the Seahawks and everyone was all "SEAHAWKS SUCK" and "TJ HILTON RULES" yet for the billion replays we saw, no one understood he had a free release the entire day with no one anywhere near him.

I'm sorry, you give me 10 yards and full steam and I could get by Sherman or Revis standing still.That's the other side of being a great route runner, which is technique and chess.

His physical technique is hard to defend and he knows what way to engage the man in front of him to get past him.

If you lean left, he can divert you left. If you come at him, he can absorb you. It doesn't matter.

No one ever wins the one on one battle with him.

Being a great route runner is 90% decided off the snap. He is flawless. GOAT.&gt; Ability to create 

I always compare route running with a swingman/guard in basketball.

You have to be able to create your own shot from anywhere on the floor, shoot from the arc or drive the lane in traffic.

Some guys are dependent upon ball movement to spread the floor to get space to shoot. Other guys can bait the defender and shoot over them or get past them. Or even multiple defenders.

You ever wonder why there's bench snipers who shoot threes vs a guy who is like Curry it's that Curry can create his own shot at any time and is good enough to nail it while a say...Kyle Korver is better with ball movement. He can knock down open threes all day, but only Steph can get himself open consistently. Kyle can't. I don't think Kyle is any worse than Steph at open looks, it's just that Kyle can't get himself open at-will.

That's the same with deep threat WRs. The Ted Ginns, DeSean Jacksons and TJ Hiltons of the world are the Kyle Korvers of football. They can't create, but if the scheme creates openings for them, they're gone. Untouchable.

The Antonio Browns of the world are the guys who are like Steph Curry and can create anywhere on the field. They get open.Michael Bennett didn't tear ligaments in his neck.You can hear/feel ligaments tear.

If I ever feel ill and want to vomit it out, I think about the guy who tore ligaments in his back and neck trying to get me off of him when he was high on PCP and choking out his GF.He's probably done forever.

That's the problem with heavy helmets, they pull your head in ways it's not meant to go. 

Ligament repair/reconstruction is fraught with lifetime instability afterward. Add a heavy helmet which adds exaggeration to the motion of the joints?

He's done for good. He would be a fool to come back. They're probably going to have to fuse bones in his neck.

One of my kids was friends with the son of an ex-NFLer who had that surgery. It was the bone fusion that ended his career. He couldn't fully turn his neck. It was bizarre to watch him turn his body to talk to someone.* Underrated as a QB and largely forgotten

* Domestic abuser, also largely forgotten

http://www.nytimes.com/1996/02/23/sports/pro-football-jury-rapidly-acquits-moon-of-spousal-abuse-charges.html

The jury were idiots.I want the game to drastically change.I put the blame on the NFLPA for not having good post-career benefits.

The NFL should pay them a little more, but give zero benefits and be fully indemnified.

Then, the NFLPA should take something like 10% or more of the salary of each player and put it into savings and investments to pay for pensions, disability, insurance, etc.

The Ontario Teachers' Pension Plan:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ontario_Teachers%27_Pension_Plan

If the NFLPA were institutional investors, they could buy the entire league with $150bn.Maybe relative to...other receiving TEs?

He was no Jason Witten or Heath Miller. Not even close.You don't want a VD in your red zone.Maybe, I suppose the idea is improve blocking for the run game, but Davis is still a better receiver than a blocker.

Is he going to suddenly be a better blocker than he was this year (when he was in) so far?

Because the 49ers have the worst running attack in the NFL. He didn't help.

Everyone in this thread is like "oh he's such a great blocker"...relative to pass-catching TEs he was pretty good...once upon a time.Man, I am really excited about **CBS ALL-ACCESS** and that **CBS ALL-ACCESS** will have a Star Trek component. At $5.99/mo, **CBS ALL-ACCESS** is a very affordable way to keep abreast of your favourite CBS shows like the new Star Trek. Being able to watch on-demand is a great feature of **CBS ALL-ACCESS** that will make watching Star Trek fun for it's viewers. What better way to celebrate the 50th anniversary of a forward-thinking show like  ~~Rampart~~ I mean *Star Trek* than by "beaming down" the content via the **CBS ALL-ACCESS** platform!

**CBS ALL-ACCESS** **CBS ALL-ACCESS** **CBS ALL-ACCESS**

**CBS ALL-ACCESS**&gt; Top Edit Shameless Plug:

**CBS ALL-ACCESS**

Being serious now...I've been promoting the idea of a "Star Trek Universe" show for...a long time now and I hope someone finally saw it and did something with it.

The premise was two main things: one, would be to solicit excellent writers to create sci-fi stories that were compelling in the STU. Second would be to give actors who've always wanted to take part in the STU a chance to do so by focusing on great storytelling and guest appearances rather than a regular cast. Sort of like the Twilight Zone.

If it's gonna "introduce new characters", it sounds like it'll just be a new crew. But it could also mean that it introduces new characters on a weekly basis or a mini-arc. Or that it could return to the new characters from time to time. I loved the movies and his hand in them.

Besides, as long as they use great writers, you get the best of both worlds. Kurtzman brought a lot of excitement and emotion to the series, which could be very dry and technical at times. Or the emotion manufactured, a la "Troi episodes". 

He's very good at boiling down basic human struggles. I'd like to see ABC get "TGIF" going and maybe CBS could counter with "Geek Friday" or even "Geek Saturday" and do:

* 8pm: Star Trek

* 9pm: X-Files

* 10pm: ????

There is a market for this. Who stays at home on weekend nights? Star Trek's geek core audience. Families. There you have it.

Friday night doesn't need to be insane numbers, it just needs to reach the audience that advertisers have a hard time getting to because they're tech-savvy enough to use ad-blockers on the computers that have replaced their televisions. I want to back up what /u/BisFitty said:

&gt;you can't wrap your head around black Civil Rights or feminism

I'm a civil rights activist and a civil libertarian and I want nothing to do with your identity politics.

Allow me to "educate yourself" here:

http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/civil%20rights

&gt;the rights that every person should have **regardless** of his or her sex, race, or religion

Once you have introduced "fem" or "black", it's no longer civil rights. It's social justice.

Social justice is about redistributing rights within society based upon group labels. Civil rights is about respecting everyone's rights.

Social justice can take your civil rights away because you have a right or liberty some other group wants. Social justice is identity politics for the group, civil rights is specifically colour/race/etc-blind.

Civil rights seeks to elevate everyone, not redistribute everything.

You and I can both be able to want equality, but the difference is that I want to make you *more* equal and social justice seeks to make others less equal. "For my workspace, I'm gonna need 40 acres and a mule"That sounds CubanKeep going and we'll let you live in the ~~big house~~ */r/CenturyClub*The fact it's NASCAR is unintentionally hilarious.I kept thinking about the transplant couple. These Civil War reenactors are an odd bunch. They have "pride" about their geographical heritage and you can obviously guess what those two transplants thought "Oh we'll be able to express our Southern Pride, I'm so excited **HOLY SHIT HE'S DRESSED UP IN SLAVE ATTIRE, WE'VE MADE A TERRIBLE MISTAKE!"**Proof that even in retailing, Cascadia gets it. Nordstrom are the best. REI are awesome. I'll let you in on a little secret...the CBSA will absolutely hate you for it, but if you've lost your passport, you can still get back into Canada.

Just be prepared for it to take awhile and the immigration officer to stab you repeatedly with eye daggers. 

LPT: if you lose your travel documents, file a police report. It goes a long way to helping you get across the border.They're also so "LIVE FREE OR DIE" that they are the only state where adults don't have to wear seat belts.

They actually fight that.BREAKING NEWS: THE SECOND-MOST UNQUALIFIED FEMALE GOP CANDIDATE SAYS THE MARGINALLY MORE UNQUALIFIED FEMALE GOP CANDIDATE WOULD NOT MAKE A GOOD PRESIDENT

Pot, meet kettle.

It occurs to me that I can't name a single female US politician I respect that isn't a Democrat.You might want to calm the post-play theatrics, Cam. They could have easily injured you on that play and didn't.Oh look, Cam is talking shit for them roughing him up after he showed them up with his first down gesticulating on 4th and 1Incredible patience to wait for the waves to passIt was only a matter of timeLuck is shaken. He's not setting his feet. He's hopping all the time.What is this, the PGA Tour now?I can't believe Frank Gore didn't even chip the edge rusher before he...inexplicably ran his TE route?!?Thomas Davis read that the play was supposed to go to Bradshaw and held him up LOLPlanet ColtslineIf you're noticing Luck is being pressured on every play and being hit on every play, I'd like to ask what good Frank Gore is anymore.At some point the Colts need to just put Bradshaw in there and get some pass pro and different running looks"Pressure comes up the middle, Bradshaw picks it up"

If only the coaches had...the ability to see why he should be their every down back based upon results.I wonder the NFL can get a group discount on MCL surgeries this week. Maybe just line everybody up on the OR and go it production style.This is retarded. Why use Bradshaw on a 3rd and 3 power run when you have Frank Gore?

All season they've done this shit where they put their power back in on pass plays and their passing back in on short yardage!

I hate you so much, Pep.And use the diminutive RB compared to the fireplug Gore?

Oh, that's right. It's 3rd down. Bradshaw is the 3rd down back. That means that regardless of context or situation, Bradshaw must be the RB! 

As is tradition.Pep Hamilton has no influence on the defense, thankfully.Peps gonna PepWell if that NFL thing doesn't work out for ya Stewie, you've always got "hotel bar pianist" to fall back on."I love to see young people who can do different things with their fingers"

-GrudenGruden:

Loves RBs who can play piano

Hates QBs who can also runLooks like Cam was actually trying to pull it back in and throw but Stewart didn't want to let it go because of the prior fumble.Should have been a yellow flag and a red cardWell Oregon is the evolution or PorygonHe's trying to contrast himself with Pep Hamilton.Damn that kid's as big as LukeSeattle's whole "you can't flag us on every play" thingI wished I could challenge Gruden commentsYou must be a football godVery nice PA there.The rain really took that one.

Gotta throw hard dude.I don't love Gruden and he says some weird fucking shit all the time."Dying duck you quack so sweet"There's enough shit to go around for everyone there.There's a guy in my fantasy league named Taco CorpWhat's stupid is that the play they called for Gore would have been perfect for BradshawHarper is trying to squeeze Gore into submission.Colts 8-1 run confirmedThat whole series was inverse.

You want to call two plays where the LB leaks out towards the edges, get Bradshaw with edge speed.

But it's 3rd and 1 with a stacked line?

No, take Gore out. The guy who excels at running straight ahead into contact. Put Bradshaw in there and have him wait for a hole to develop while the Panthers know that and call a run blitz from the strong side edge.

I hate you so much Pep.OH MY FUCKING GOD. THE GROUND IS SHIT. STOP HAVING THE RBs RUN HORIZONTALLY AND WAIT FOR BLOCKS TO DEVELOP WHEN THE BLOCKERS HAVE NO FOOTING.What does it mean?Well Jobs *was* a big proponent of IBM's Power PC series of chips, it's just that Intel was cheaper over the long-term.How many touchdowns for you to be my wide receiver?No-brainerNot when they get dumbed down by network executivesCam is learning...evolving.This is more like "The Duel At 10 Paces Where The Rain Made Everything Slippery And We Shot Ourselves"He Roethlisberger'd that throw to Ginn there.Riverboat Ron is the best nickname ever because it means he can get away with all kinds of shit and people just go "Riverboat Ron gonna Riverboat Ron" and shrug and that's it.Riverbank Ron?GG Pep Hamilton

Sees that Gore's YPC is only 2.8 for the game and calls draw plays rather than...score points for the team.Yeah but the Falcons are always cheating, piping in exterior rain.That was really nice coverage. Great move at the end to swat the ball.All Spanish commentators are overly excited.

Spanish families don't have hyperactive children in them, they send them off to commentator schools at an early age as an outlet for their gifts.Beer-urn Ver-nurBradshaw overpowering Kuechly?

I'll credit that to the wet ground.That lane for Gore was open before the ball was even snapped."Bradshaw and Gore, you can't find..."

&lt;thinks about how he's probably gone too far with his intended superlative&gt;

"Competitive...yeah, competitive guys. Man, these guys are the best. They compete like a pair of champions, I tell you Mike. If there was a competitive competition, these guys would be competitors in it."Harrison got beaten so badly there

EDIT: LOL Harrison actually pushed him right into Gore.

"Here, let me help!"Despite the missed block, you know why that series worked?

Bradshaw, a passing-type back got a draw play on a passing-type of playcall/formation.

3rd and 1?

Again, do you bring in Gore whose strength and bulk would get you a first down just by him falling forward?

No. You use Bradshaw.

You will switch out RBs on every play which is beyond annoying and disallows any rhythm, but you won't do it when it counts.

I hate you so much Pep.ESPN MNF has jumped the shark. They're comparing Mike Shula to Don Shula in a positive light, in a totally serious wayI almost think the producers are trolling Gruden.

"Hey, let's see if we can make him say exaggerated shit about Mike Shula. Quick, put up an infographic that says Mike is as good as his father."Oikos yogourt has lots of calcium for strong bones, plus protein for muscular bones!Somebody get the Mexican broadcast crew to get the pinata down. We need this shit done right, pronto.Freeman is a stud.It's Tolbert Time!It's a shame because the balls are so wet right now.If there were ever a time where Gore needed to be in there, now is that time.There were 3 options underneath for the 1st down that were open

EDIT: the purpose of that play is to make all of the coverage peel off and follow the guy streaking downfield to open it up WHICH IT DID and they never intended to even look at anyone else but TYNobody really does it better than Ted Ginn when it comes to returning punts (on the sudden change defense)^^^PepThe harder it gets, the more they like it unless you pull out too earlyHoly shit, why is Greg Olsen on the sideline there?

LIES, GRUDEN! 

LIES!RE-JECTEDI also think he's hurt. He's probably feeling it in his ribs every time he throws.That wasn't PI, that was a great flop/sellAll this proves is that the rain is the most effective defense vs Andrew LuckMoncrief had beaten Norman. He couldn't decide if he wanted Andre or Moncrief and got confused threw between them."Fucking blank!"

Such a lady.They're trying to get into FG range and the Panthers know it."STAPLES CENTER IS A FUN PLACE TO WATCH BASKETBALL"

Thinks for a moment

"WHEN THE CLIPPERS ARE HERE. BECAUSE THE LAKERS ARE DEPRESSING."

EDIT: dismiss this comment if you aren't watching Prime Ticket LADeAndre is like "I'm not touching that Blake it's all you. Go shoot FTs."Memphis are great guys, going easy on the Warriors and letting them win by 50 so they don't get a real tune-up and forget what a challenge is."Mom, Dad that's gross."

"Shut up. You were conceived in that seat."His heels rise and lower like it's bullet time"All that means is that they cannot Chris Webber"Yeah this is ridiculous. 

Gaming seems pretty dark. You have Activision buying King and all of these games going to microtransactions, MS and Sony DGAF about you.

Nintendo treats you alright, except their console is DOA. 

You can PC game, but Steam will nuke you from orbit if you piss them off and the "ownership" model of games is debatable. 

They should be treating you better, but they know you can't go elsewhere. Taco Johns are what you need after you Taco BellIf all goes well, I doubt he'll be on the team by 430 ET tomorrowYou need an air horn, a ninja suit and an unobstructed path out of your house to the front of it for when shit goes down.It's like you pulled the pin on the ProRevenge grenade and held it up to the people you were trying to get back without letting go.Yeah, I hate it when a woman has a bunch of rings to take off before she gives you a handy dandy&gt; My dad is from near Erie, Pennsylvania so he grew up a Browns fan. 

I'm gonna save this quote for the next time Browns/Bengals fans ask how there can be Steelers fans in Ohio.

Erie is Steeler country, despite it being Bills country. 

I always love driving through Erie from NY because I can get Steeler shit so easily.Glennon available for a mid-round pick after 1pm ET confirmedApparently not. I've been told by many people in the media that there is simply no film or tape of a lot of older games. 

Dude, I can remember in the 1990s going to Clippers games that weren't televised *at all*. Anywhere. We'd actually pick games because they wouldn't be on TV. And they weren't the only team. Sportscenter and the like was bizarre because they would either just give a score with no highlights or get a little tape from the house video used on the Jumbotron.

Sports in general - there's a lot of tape missing. And then there's tape they had which got re-used. 

I once asked Deacon Jones why they don't just go back and count all of his sacks from the old games and he said he already thought of it and no one had any tapes. Didn't exist. He said team employees and journalists would give him a count, but the NFL wouldn't accept it. 

It's just lost history.The best RB in the NFL is Devonta Freeman

The best QB in the NFL is Andy Dalton

The best TE in the NFL is Gary Barnidge

The best WR in the NFL is Deandre Hopkins

The best CB in the NFL is Josh Norman

The Broncos finally got their passing game going and still managed to be undefeated

Andrew Luck is statistically one of the worst QBs in the NFL

I mean...how long should I go here?He's incredible. It's like Gronkowski, except with blocking.I use Google. I'm a researcher.

I've even been paid to find shit for people.

I'm a paid researcher.

I'm a professional.

I'm a professional, paid researcher.Because the average fat guy isn't Chris Christie.


You gotta understand something: these people are fat narcissists. They have nothing to do with fat women, other than being fat. They don't speak for fat women. They don't represent fat women. Most women, fat or not aren't narcissists. 

Narcissists will say or do anything to get power and playing the victim card is always at the top of their deck. Fat discrimination just happens to be convenient as it's a sensitive subject filled with a lot of misunderstandings and misinformation. Narcissists like to gaslight, use circular reasoning and unverifiable claims. Obesity is a muddy issue to most people who don't want to confront a narcissist anyway, so they get to use it as a cudgel to beat people with.We did that and covered them with bubble wrap. It worked. Looks odd...but it works.And another piece of engineering to go wrong.My apologies to everyone. I won't bore you with excuses, I just didn't get it done and I should have done better. Rankings will be done next week. My streak starts anew then.&gt; I was told to get a doctors note to prove that I get a period.

I'd be tempted to bring them a bloody tampon in a fucking ziploc bag to prove it.

Around the developed world, healthcare costs are sky high and doctors are a finite resource. Asking people for medical notes in most instances is selfish and stupid.If you quit and decide not to sue, please publicly shame them.What took you so long&gt; I was disappointed when I saw all of our opponents lose game after game.

It's like my exes. They bring a good game and then are wrecked for future opponents.Now it's interesting because we can see who is "way out there" (as one of the analysis posts in these threads each week) but it doesn't differentiate between people who are just out of touch vs people who are early to a trend. I think it's a product of the NFL's lack of parity.

The list ends up with bubbles I draw around the teams when it's done to get an idea of tiers. Before it seemed like at least the top 16 teams were arguably in relative tiers, but now it's not even half of that and there's about 24 teams you have to decide which is "less worse" and are bad enough on any given week to negate any sort of differentiation you might have had in drawing circles around big groups.

Most fans of the imperfect teams know they're so bad that they aren't as passionate about arguing their terribleness. People seem more interested in arguing for perceived sleights. When everyone is universally bad, people aren't lacking respect they feel they deserve. They feel they deserve what they get. 

Until we can get people to passionately argue about who is truly the worst and make it personal, I think this year is a going to be a bit of a dud in general. Plus, we just now finally had a Packers/Broncos game where two of the top bubble teams finally squared off.As a Mets and Steelers fan, Sunday was horrible. It's part of the reason I didn't get my rankings in. I didn't want to write the blurb. Then shit happened etc.

At least we still have the (inexplicable) Devils.The Nats are gonna be back, reloaded.

We got an intentional walk on them with Matt Williams at the helm. They dropped a lot of winnable games. 

I expect them to be back and be angry. I'll be delighted if we are to them what the Royals are to us. It happens. But they are a great team. It won't be so easy next year.I love big, floppy, greasy NYC slices as much as I like a crispy, chewy, tomato-y slice with 1/2" of cheese baked under it.

Hate my indecisiveness. &gt; who do it for money

And yet I find the "fantasy experts" who are being paid to be the worst of all. You can crowdsource much better information from /r/fantasyfootball if you read what people have to say because they will give you all of the arguments.

I can only speak for myself, but I have no paycheque or editor. If I say something controversial, I'm not trying to drum up page clicks by being crazy. I don't have a reputation to worry about which causes me to not take risks and say potentially unpopular things.

I think you *can* trust a group of 32 volunteers because a single person only brings certain perspectives and can easily miss other arguments due to bias.

We're supposed to be bias-free and having 32 people bring different perspectives ensures it to a redundantly ridiculous amount. I think you could probably get the same ranking outcomes with 8-10 people, TBPH.I was thinking you were going to say to torque down the others to make this one looser, but you decided to go full sadist and I support your choice.&gt; I found it disturbing that, according to the article, 30% of self-identified liberals

They aren't really liberals.

Case in point:

Someone yesterday said "black civil rights"

"Black civil rights" isn't a thing. The entire point of civil rights is to remove "black" from the equation. There is no race, creed, colour, religion, etc. 

They were using "black civil rights" to describe social justice.

Social justice is the polar opposite of civil rights, yet I find myself on a regular basis having to point that fact out. There are ignoramuses out there who believe that social justice is civil rights. 

Civil rights specifically enumerates that it is completely blind. It relies on civil liberties to get things done.

Social justice specifically enumerates groups, such as blacks, women, men, white Christians, etc. It requires civil liberties to be abridged for the good of the group.

There's an entire population of self-styled liberals out there who actually aren't liberals at all. What they don't see is that arguments for MRAs and their goals follow the same formula as social justice. The only difference is their bias and the variables. If you support civil rights, the MRAs and SJWs don't have power. The social justice group are empowering MRAs as well because they go "me too" when they are able to make the same arguments about being a maligned gender. Christians do it with religious persecution.

Identity politics are the sphere of conservatives who want to conserve their specific desires. Identity politics are not liberal. Social justice is identity politics. These people are not liberals.

EDIT: MRAs and SJWs, since I will manage to piss everyone off, why don't you pick up a dictionary before engaging in butthurt downvotes. "I don't like it" isn't a reason to downvote. Being wrong is. I am simply telling you the literal definition. It's right. Don't blame the messenger because you're biased.IIRC the fucking ham was made from turkey at one point.I would comment here far more often if I wasn't constantly left speechless; this instance is no exceptionShe's like Norman Rockwell if Norman Rockwell loved himself as much as he loved Americana. I can't give it a 10 because it needed about 15 minutes more to develop Kate and her motivations. After the extraction, any reasonable person would have capitulated to Alejandro and done whatever he said. Her intransigence isn't well-explained and smoking and drinking only tell me she's bothered - it says nothing about her personal morality and convictions.

I don't think it could decide if it was about her or not. You said she's a prop. Was that the intent?

As the only person to resist from Silvio on up, she should have been the focus of what happens if you stand up. Everyone gave in but her. And she's a prop?

I hope there's a Director's Cut that fleshes her out some more. Emily Blunt isn't a good enough actress to make a gourmet meal out of the morsels and leftovers they tossed at her.Well guess what?

The colonials have got it covered.

And which colonials?

The *French* ones!

http://www.fifthtown.ca/artisan_cheese/editorial/ontarios_cheese_innovation_score/

Well, at least it's still in the Commonwealth.Lumpy cheddar fondue?

You could make croutons with the grease?

Look, what else are the Swiss supposed to do with all of their caves? Hide from the Germans in them?I think now they'll remember how to use him.

Last night was enough. It was infuriating. You can guarantee that when the situation called for Gore, Bradshaw was in there. When the situation called for Bradshaw, Gore was in there.

They never forgot about Gore. They just forgot what he is, which is a between the tackles bruiser who has no business being in there on passing downs and ought to be in there in every short yardage situation and 1st down.Nothing will change if they don't get personnel groupings right. 

His biggest sin not knowing what formations to use.This is tough for me to say...well not this part. This part is easy.

I detest Jim Irsay and wish your team nothing but misery and failure.

This GIF sums it up for me as I'm not without honour:

http://gfycat.com/FreshBlackAchillestang

It's fucking ridiculous for you guys to be gimped like that. You've played with one hand tied behind your back. And the next guilty party that needs to go is that worm, Grigson. That's difficult to say. Because as long as he's there, you're screwed. You'll be scary good if you get an actually competent GM who isn't an egotistical prick.

I want you guys to lose fair and square. &gt; wasn't the main problem the offensive line and pass protection more than anything?

WHY YES, YES IT WAS.

And what was Pep's solution to that?

"Let's be all tricky and shit. Let's put in Frank Gore in passing plays! Never mind that he's an ageing downhill runner with suspect pass blocking skills! The best way to utilise him is not establishing a ground and pound game, but having him stand there looking lost on every passing down! Yeah!

And let's get Ahmad Bradshaw, one of the pass blocking backs in the NFL! He can surely help protect Andrew Luck! But we're not gonna do that. We're going to use him to establish the power running game. Is he good at that? Of course not! But if you ran a power run game with Gore, the opponent would guess that! Pep Hamilton is all about trickery. So it's time to have a power run game with the pass blocking/catching specialist! No one would ever guess!"

Except that every team guessed that and were never fooled.

You can't blame the O-line for not blocking when you have the wrong people/wrong play called. If you wanna pass, put a back in who can deal with the blitzer that got free. Don't have Frank Gore standing out there in the flat looking at the game clock and John Candy. Apparently he's too old to turn around and go "Yo Andy I'm open" or some shit.

I am just some random asshole on a couch and I have been ranting about this since Week 1. When a random asshole on a couch figures it out before you do, you're not doing the right thing...PEP.No, the pattern is that they want to dominate people with absolute control.

This is about power, not comfort.That reminds me of the old joke about the Polish Sex Manual:

In

Out

Repeat if necessary Ticklerape: soon to be a thingI don't know what's more annoying, that you didn't source your post or that you somehow felt the need to sign it.I was gonna say "I'll never ask for anything on the side the same way again"I'm glad to see someone finally do this (because I have no interest in doing it), but you're missing something huge, which is the average of the player and the average of the position.

Your scoring categories are arbitrary.

The way I do it is like...take WR for an example.

If the average starting WR gets 120-140 points in a season, I look at the average of the average. So let's say 8 PPG is the average and what you can expect.

Then I look at the average of the player. Say an elite WR is worth 170-180 points per season. They'd average about 11 PPG, way more than 8 PPG.

What you're missing is the value relative to the average. Who cares if some guy comes out of nowhere to have a big game? That doesn't tell us anything. What we want to know is:

* How many times the player performs within 20% of their average (2-3 points)

* How many times the player performs above the average of the position (which we've established at 8 points)

* What percentage of games are at each average.

For WR, the threshold is 60%. A top tier WR will get within their average about 60% of the time. Anything else above that (like Brandon Marshall this year) is gravy. 

When you look at a WR who has high points and average, but a lower performance rate (like 50% or less) then you have a Vincent Jackson-type who is dangerous.

I can understand scoring them...like adding up your assessed points, but the scale is too low. And it still tells you nothing about if they're a good wager or not.

When I start a guy, I ask myself what my odds are that he will perform to his average and if his average is good. Then I modify the odds based upon the points allowed by the team he's facing and then some other factors that are not something I'll explain right now.

Your roster is a series of bets. The average PPG is the payout and the percentage of games they perform are the odds. Except that the *Americans* they kill are *Mexican*-Americans, which sadly no one gives a shit about because of the "Mexican" part of it.

If it was blonde, white college girls?

Yeah, they'd be all over it.

In reality, dual citizens of Mexico and the USA or US citizens of Hispanic descent are the same as native Mexicans in the eyes of most people. And that's just an unpleasant fact.Are you one of those people with the viewpoint that autism should NOT be cured?

&gt;They treat autism as if it's a disease that needs to be cured.

Or are you saying they view it as a *disease*.

Please clarify whether or not you think children should suffer, stuck in their own heads in CONSTANT FUCKING DISTRESS or be relieved of that.They've fucking decimated the rainforest.

I can't believe OP missed their biggest sin.

Grazing land. They need it. Guess where they get it?I think it served it's purpose, I don't think she has any interest in even marginally faking it, let alone doubling down on what she claimed to have done and actually doing it.&gt;Fail at a 5K? Go for a marathon. Fail at a marathon? Go for a half-IRONMAN. Fail at a half-IRONMAN? Go for a full IRONMAN. One can only imagine what she plans to do in 2017.

Remember when she missed her flight a few weeks ago?

Failed at flying?

I think she's gonna ask for money to go to the ISS.

"First fatstronaut" or some shit.

You heard it here first.Honestly, I don't care about anyone's health more than they do.

I just care about the truth. Because fatlogic is lies and bullshit.

If you are told the truth and choose to be an ignoramus it means no one has to care what you say because...you're an ignoramus. No one that matters cares what the willfully ignorant thinks. 

If you are told the truth and choose to accept it and something about it? 

Welcome to /r/fatlogicNot only that, but the sounds are just as "80s Design" as the cover.

Such an excellent record. It really has nothing from any other time period. No mention of their country roots in the 70's, for an example.No, what's crazy is them working jobs and not seeing the paper at all, but instead having their debts exist in a faceless system along with their money which are both simply numbers.I can eat yogourt and look at this stuff because of /r/poppingWe can call his dad "Creepshow"With Andre, it really depends how deep your league is. As a general rule of thumb, the only bench guys you want are True Centers because they don't normally get tons of minutes anyway. 

With a swingman, you want a guy who gets regular minutes. Nothing kills your league faster than your bench guy being schemed out of the game.

Gordon is a guy you have to be patient with. If you're H2H, he should be dropped. You can't wait for him "do what the experts say" and finally be used. If it's straight roto? Stash him.

Anyway, I kind of like Rodney Hood because he could easily get more minutes. He's producing with limited usage. If you view stats per minute as efficiency, he's pretty damn efficient. 

Is the Rodney Hood in your hand worth the Aaron Gordon in the Bush?It's strange, we've got an Aaron Gordon followed by an Evan Fournier question.

I can't tell the other dude to wait on Gordon and then tell you to go get Fournier. Something's gotta give.

I just don't like the situation. If you're fine with a rent to own? Go for it. I'm not convinced Evan is the guy left standing. I've passed on him in all of my leagues.Yeah, your ADP on Lee is to the point where it's ok to have reached and missed. 

The arrow is kinda pointing up on Dwight because he's not relegated to "YOU ARE A CENTER. YOU COME OFF THE BENCH WITH A BURST OF SHOT BLOCKING ENERGY AND SIT DOWN" - they're actually moving him around. I only play Yahoo, but I expect him to be FC rather than PF pretty soon. 

What that ought to tell you is that if he's being used at the 5 as well as the 4, it means they're finding lineups to use him.

Boston is pretty fucky this year. I actually passed on Lee because I didn't trust it and went against the conventional wisdom and went for Sullinger, who I fully expected to drop. The problem is that despite them making every possible move to get rid of the dude, he's responded and is hustling, so...I dunno. Why sabotage him by giving his minutes to Lee?

It's just a mess. That whole situation is bad. I don't feel comfortable with Sullinger, despite him producing. Lee? I think I'd have already cut him loose.Because the Civic is also a pretty badass car.

I'm surprised how many parts cross over. They like to probe you in the pooper for drugs.Yeah Subaru promised us diesel...Yeah this is old.

As time goes on...and I'll say it again, fatlogic is fat narcissism.

Thinking your organs will fail if you eat 1200 calories isn't fatlogic, it's stupid. It's narcissism if you refuse to learn because you're an ignoramus.

I don't think the people here struggling with weight are suffering from fatlogic. I don't think the people here struggling with weight are fat narcissists.This is the kind of shit that Toronto "progressives" up here in Canada don't get.

There are people who claim to be liberal and believe in a "live and let live" system where you'd have the Islamic or Jewish "justice" system on the side as a form of multicultural appeasement.

Yet they fail to understand what happens when you allow this shit to supersede the laws of the government.

These are the same people who support women wearing a niqab at their citizenship ceremony or doing official government business.You'd be surprised at how civil I can be to people who are demonstrably incorrect.As is tradition?Especially because from what I can there's nothing to support that the Ada Initiative is some sort of nefarious conspiracy to bring rape charges against unwitting male programmers, but an endeavour to make communication in tech less "old boys club" and more normal.

I even read the links in the top post here and I can't connect those dots.No shit. That's why Blair Walsh is a HUGE pickup in fantasy this week.No it's that we're surprised that you are successful enough to afford this vehicle while lacking the basic education to differentiate between "there", "they're" and "their"

(You used the wrong one and then wooshed on the joke pointing it out)Yup. You're better off...I was gonna say to ease the power up, but there's no easing of anything with that car.Yeah but the other two cars aren't worth crying over. Lambo insurance will get them taken care of.Apparently not if this amateur just crashed one in downtown traffic.Bob is the best
&gt;God damn east-of-the-Cascadesers....

This is one of those things where both parties would ultimately be happier with a split.

Up here in Northern NY, we have nothing to do with NYC. It might as well be another country.

King County metro would be a lot happier without rural WA telling them what to do and vice-versa. Up here, I don't know why the island of Manhattan isn't it's own state.

Taxes are bad in WA. 

In Vermont or Massachusetts? I would support taxation by the Democrats here. Government is well-run and you get good value for your dollar.

California, Oregon and Washington?

Not the same Democrats, not the same taxes and how government is run. There's a reason conservatives are so radical on the west coast vs the east coast. Government in the NE works, save Maine (Republican) and NY (corrupt).

It's competent. West coast government is incompetent. I understand why conservatives want to starve government because to them it's like taking drugs away from an addict.

There's no comparison as to how NH is run as a state vs WA. It doesn't matter if it's conservative NH or liberal MA, government works regardless of politics. Government in the WC isn't good for much except pot and gay marriage. It's that the cultural, financial and digital divide is so great that your priorities have nothing to do with theirs.

I don't think you understand the resentment the rest of the state has for Seattleites. The condescending arrogance is on display in this thread by people who've never lived in rural WA, being chastised by "city folk" for being "not as smart as we are in Seattle".

As a long-time Whatcom country resident, I assure that despite us being fairly progressive, we want you to not come here and if you are here we want you to leave.Because it's fucking corrupt.

It's hypocrisy. The problem as he presents it is that by starving government, he will force it to go lean and root out corruption and incompetence.

He is the poster child for corrupt incompetence! It's sickening.Sales tax is the worst way to make money.

Be like NH and make all of your money from property taxes. That allows a measure of local control to communities outside of Seattle who feel alienation due to your money and power. NH has no income or sales tax and is run 100x better than Washington.A bengal tiger wearing a helmet with tiger stripes is like the Titans having a helmet with flowing curly locks of hair on it.Bad news buddy, Pittsburgh is gonna 2014 NFC South their way in.

Also you have a Samsung phone because it won't spell Pittsburgh. Yeah but Kobe was the best person to take those shots.

All he's doing now is taking food out of ~~Swaggy P's~~ *I mean Nicholas'* mouth.&gt; I had a fro in 97 and now I'm balding. I hate genetics.

That could be read as you hating your fro, your balding or both.Shit, we should have had them talk to DumBuss.I'm ejecting now because there won't be a better comment as I read down.

Unlike Kobe, I know when to leave at the peak.Surprised this wasn't higher up. They can score. They just need to play some D. 3 of 4 were food-related and #4 was food waste related.

Found...nevermind.There's no time for circuit parties if you're at home watching TV?Come for the baked goods and sandwiches, stay for the blatant homophobiaYou lost me when it got all social justice-y there towards the end.

The argument goes from facts to insipid oppression olympics. He won the moment you deviated from the facts and engaged in an oppression pissing contest.It's True, though.

Fatlogic mantras are just ignorant dogma.Why not just offer two options?

First is the "do it my way" package and the other is the "emotional support" package. One of them you guarantee because you are responsible for it and the other one they are responsible for.

"We can go by your beliefs, but you are responsible for your results. You tell me what you want to do and I will coach you to do it. It's like asking a classically trained music teacher to show you how to play Justin Bieber on your piano. I will teach you Bieber songs, but understand you aren't learning to be Beethoven. If you want results, here is a contract you sign between you and I to do it my way and what we know supersedes what we believe. I don't care either way. I'm here to make you feel good. If emotional support makes you feel good, I'll make you the best Bieber pianist ever. If you want to be Beethoven, we can do that as well. I will give you your money back if you fail doing it my way."

These are people who think they have no choice in life.

So give them one.&gt;because he sent nudes

Was there penis/scrotum/anus visible?Manziel seems to have little relative chemistry with Barney, but considerable chemistry with Benji.

&gt;He will continue to be a top five to ten TE.

There's a big dropoff after Gronk/Barny/Eifert to the Olsen/Kelce tier.I've been carrying 3 TEs in ESPN in most of my leagues and starting some combination of Gronk/Eifert/Barnidge all year.THIS SHIT IS BLOWING MY MINDThat final move by Westbrook pretty much encapsulates what happened here tonight for his teamReally?

Damn.I actually walked to the store during the 1st and was all "damn" and came back at halftime and Jack was all "going into the half with a lead' and I was WTF?

I'm still WTF.

It's not the win, it's 2nd. WTF?!?It's only fair considering the decades of fucking the team has done to it's fans.I seriously hope the Clippers don't win because Clips fans are gonna be complete shit to anyone who said anything at all.Yeah I think we're prematurely ejaculating hereNo dude you should root for the Clippers. DeAndre Jordan is like practically almost a MaverickOh god Prime Ticket easily.

You'll get to watch commercials for food you actually want to eat.And apparently GSW is already up by 60A low-budget telenovela in English on a UHF channel no one is aware of?

EDIT: it occurs to me that could be Sacto or LA KingsAgreed. Considering how universally admired and well-liked Clippers fans are, I find it impossible that there aren't waves of upvoted pro-Clippers comments.

There must be some sort of hacking going on.^^^Jamie ^^^Lee ^^^Curtis ^^^might ^^^eat ^^^them ^^^both ^^^since ^^^they're ^^^filled ^^^with ^^^ActiviaMaybe Derek Fisher could "guest coach" the WarriorsStephenson vs Barnes

The NBA fan's hatefest.Can't give that many open looks deep to the WarriorsI use them to transport gold to Europe and silks from China1 foul on Blake, ~~1~~ *2* on Steph

Interesting already

EDIT: let's see him play D now with 2KLAY IS NOW KOBE BRYANT, CAREER IS OVER HE IS TOO OLDHey it's *NBA WEDNESDAY*Whenever I see those shots of Doc sitting on the bench with his head down I ask myself "Why is Lebron coaching the Clippers?"There's zero energy on the floor or in the stands with Steph outOver under on "lead change" being said tonightJust Steph vibrating the earwax out on the bench...Ah, Free State Project.

Welcome to New Hampshire.What about Dray?Sometimes 20 over can be considered endangerment or reckless driving.This is why I'm here.

All of the bizarre crap that ends up on /r/undelete we endure.

The needle in the haystack.

Great work.

We need more of this stuff.No, Yorba Linda!I'm just real excited to enter the 4th quarter up 28-14 and then piss it away to lose 31-28 after throwing a pair of INTs when we could have run out the clock or some other creative bullshit way to lose to a team we should otherwise wreck.&gt; What makes you confident you will win?

Nothing. These are always trap games for us. 

&gt; Does the absence of Bell and our great run D, mean you will be pass heavy?

Are you asking if Woodson gets a volume pick? Because I like the betting odds on Woodson ganking one and taking it the distance. And don't worry, we'll probably be up 21-7 in the 3rd and in a position to win when it happens and you'll get it and have it breathe new life into your team.

&gt; What makes you most nervous about our match up?

That we find a way to lose games against teams we should beat.

&gt; Do you mostly attribute Ben's performance last week to rust or lack of health?

Health. Ben's problem even before we got him was mechanics - he sailed the ball high because of his sidearm motion. He's worked on it, but he's prone to still having it happen and when he's not able to plant and throw, they get away from him and sail a bit, as happened last week. 

He's the kind of QB who I think could be successful if he didn't practice at all. At this point, he knows what he's doing. Physically, can he do it? That's the question.Interesting to you, traumatic to us.I do fear their running game because they've got playmakers with speed and the ability to get around the weak side edge.

Jarvis is molasses slow, slow to react and doesn't get turned around quickly enough. 

It makes me ill to close my eyes and imagine them running on us.Yeah I was honestly more worried about the Marvin Jones hit because I didn't want him to get a lacerated spleen or something like that.

He got absolutely fucking plastered.

The knee? You knew what it was when it was done. He'll get it fixed and come back. 

I didn't care for that hit on Jones. You can't celebrate that and be pissed about the knee which they didn't celebrate.

Everyone needs to calm their collective nut.They'll find out when they get fired as a patientShame is only bad for the health of narcissists.

For normal people, shame is an incredibly powerful tool for correcting behaviour because "feeling bad about what you've done" is the genesis of change.You should print this out and show it to your therapist and ask her/him in her/his professional opinion if this is wrong or not.Maybe once she gets it out of her system, she can have a civil conversation.I dunno about her, but a lot of these people seem to have unbalanced intellects. Plenty of IQ, severe deficiency of street smarts/emotional intelligence.Maybe we could make it a moderated series. We submit the questions to you, you select them and she agrees to answer a certain amount and the person whose question is chosen gets to reply.

Because pretty much everyone would overwhelm her as she'd be radically outnumbered.I'm cool with angry answers as long as she gets into the fray.That's fine, but inalienable rights should supersede the tyranny of the majority. I wouldn't be happy if social democracy led to say...massive deportations of migrant workers "just because".

If you had strong civil rights and civil liberties laws, you don't really need social democracy to say "it's ok for homosexuals to marry" Because it never should have been up for a vote to begin with. Government has no business in the private affairs of people other than to enshrine, enumerate and strengthen civil rights and civil liberties.

Maybe we do need social democracy at this point, but it's an indictment of society's failure to focus on our rights. It should never come to the point of society having to vote on shit that's a no-brainer, especially when malevolent people can use the process as a cudgel.They like their chili two waysIf Cleveland is the asshole, the brown lake makes sense now.Still nowhere near as cringeworthy as "life hacking""FREE BABY! INCLUDES BMW TO TRANSPORT IT."It's a complete crapshoot. An XL is sometimes a US small or a US XL.

Some items like bandage dresses arrive unfinished and need tailoring.

Many items have fabric that is totally transparent.

Some items are the same as you'd get at stores here. Literally.Well Joe Flacco is a purple bird...Give an inch, take a mile?

Never negotiate with unreasonable people.I can't wait to preorder Depression Quest II: Lithium Edition

 Your character has green urine camo.Manziel is just unwatchable. He robbed us the Eifert/Barnidge TE Showdown 2015 Part IFree movement is reciprocal. When you have some of the most restrictive and punitive immigration policies in the world, expect everyone to respond in kind.Bringing AUD or GBP would be you living like a king. &gt;The study results appear in Thursday\u2019s edition of the Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report.

People, we've come to the point where we need a weekly report.

WTG FAs!You were being credited for more knowledge than you actually had.

Not the most graceful landing, dude. This isn't uncommon knowledge. In this sub, you should probably know this beforehand.Weeks?

Maybe for you. She didn't earn that beach body by not giving it a real candy bar workout.Freeman is huge now.

What about ~~Dre~~ *Dri*?No you should watch him play. He's legitimately an inside runner now.I dunno if he can do them anymore or not. San Diego waited all year and nothing...No shit.

AMA request right now: someone who can explain why they have to qualify their conversations with the fact that they have a boyfriendI think both sides are right and here's why:

To set the table, there's two analogies I've heard that make a lot of sense here. One is old thing about "mastery" - the book about needing 10,000 hours doing something to be world-class at it. 

The other was something I heard about NASCAR that really stuck with me. A driver was being interviewed and said "I can teach you to drive 200. I can teach you to drive 200 right away. After about 2 hours, I can teach you to drive 210. After a lifetime I can teach you to drive 220."

With 220 being the speed that professional race drivers go. 

The thing about mastery (and use the math of 200 to 210 to 220) is that it takes time. Humans are pretty awesome because we can teach them to be competent in most anything in a short period of time. But it takes about 1000 hours to be really good at something where it's automatic and that's a very Japanese thing with humility and repetition.

From the martial arts perspective, after 1000 hours you're ready to unlearn everything you know and learn it again because you've spend enough time to be humbled by your lack of mastery. The black belt. Where the journey actually begins. So you have the next step, which is doing things as a master, but without thinking. That's where the next 9000 hours come in. That's where you get from 210mph to 220. That's the life's journey.

On one hand, I think he's right. You can make decent sushi with very little study. But if you are going to be world-class? That's going to take time. 

Do the math. 3 years + 8 years, so 11 years. Assuming an 8-hour work day, that would be about 32,000 hours of making sushi. That would get you in the 1% of mastery. Although you'd be there in probably 3 or 4 total. Thus, there is some overkill. Probably after a few years it's not really improvement as much as it's doing a good job consistently.

Ultimately I think he's wrong in that it takes way longer than he thinks to be a proper sushi chef. Conversely, he's right because it should realistically take about a third of what a master claims a student should do before they are ready. 

And it's sort of funny if you think about it in martial arts terms, because it usually takes about 3-4 years to reach shodan, but then the climb goes very slowly. The same is likely applicable to sushi chefs. You're not gonna be able to open your own reputable dojo until at least 3^^rd dan, but more like 5^^th dan. And that's 10-20 years of dedication.

Perhaps the system exists not to simply exploit, but to make sure you don't have dojos being run by shodan.&gt; gonna be less mormans

Less mormaids, too.None. There is no dark horse.

It's either be one of the usual teams or one that's deserving. 

There won't be a team to come out of the middle of nowhere.

The NFL is so tilted towards QB play right now that parity is dead. There aren't enough elite QBs to go around and the only teams who will make the SB are ones who possess an elite QB.

A dark horse team coming out of the middle of nowhere would be one without anything at QB. It's also why I think the Jets will lose in the first round. I think they can get there with Fitzpatrick, but when you have playoff football, you need a QB who can get it done. Think about Dalton and Luck recently. Guys who aren't at that level. And they aren't even dark horse teams. Maybe Bridgewater has a higher ceiling, but we already know what Fitzpatrick is. And the Vikings aren't even a dark horse. Lots of people picked them.

Unfortunately for fans of teams lacking a top-tier QB, about the worst you'll see is a Joe Flacco (who ain't half bad) coupled with an amazing roster.I was able to read it. Perhaps Chrome Canary is magic.The NFL doesn't GAF, they only pay lip service to this shit. Goodell doesn't care that Ray Rice beats women, he cares that Ray Rice beating women causes him to deal with shit at work. The NFL doesn't care about breast cancer. The NFL cares about selling pink shit to women.

Hey, remember before the NFL did the whole "pink" thing they used to sell pink jerseys and no one cared? Then they got in with "the cure" and now sales to women are off the charts. That makes them money. They make money from slacktivism. 

They won't pull this from Houston because it won't affect their bottom line and it won't create more work for Goodell.One likes Chicken Parm sandwiches, the other likes Donald Trump.

If Donald Trump opened a Chicken Parm sandwich shop, they would merge into Peyom Branning and be the greatest sports hero known to man.I've thought for awhile that Marvin would get kicked upstairs.

The dilemma is this:

* Mike Brown is very cheap and has the smallest staff in the NFL by a longshot and won't give out token titles for no reason

* Mike Brown is extremely loyal to Marvin Lewis (and vice-versa) and views his players and employees as family and takes a personal interest in them (to an almost irrational degree), making it less likely he fires them.

I disagree. Schottenheimer's playoff record is well-deserved. He didn't know how to close out games and he wasn't particularly revolutionary in any way.

He's one of the nicest guys ever to be in the NFL, but don't confuse that with competence. Humans are prone to romanticising people who are affable, but he was a terrible coach.

A "best coach" is one that would at least be capable of winning a big game, but just got beaten. He was never prepared to win playoff games and it was obvious. There's a certain instinct or way to do things when crunch time happens. You see that kind of greatness with Tom Brady. You know what it is when you see it and you know what it isn't when you see a regular-season stud fail.

Watching Martyball it was always obvious that he had 48 pieces of the 50 piece puzzle. In the playoffs you need all 50 pieces.Like Schottenheimer, another "nice guy" coach whose reputation is inflated by his likability. 3rd nice-guy coach in a row. Yet again, one of the nicest men to ever be associated with the league and was unable to close. Notice a pattern yet?

Guess we better get George Allen mentioned since he's #4 on the "nice guy coach who didn't win it all" list.Ok, Detroit fan - Scotty Bowman.Since we're giving smartass answers, I guess it would be Paul Brown and George Halas.I do. 

IDGAF about his personality. Frankly I think he's a stupid piece of shit human being.

I was saying in a different thread that we have a parity problem because we have a critical shortage of quality QBs. I'm all for the NFL having a bunch more great QBs. He has the qualities for greatness, but he's not ready for the NFL right now.

If he could improve, his success would help the NFL in general. How many of you really want to see the Patriots and Packers or some variation of that again this year?Your lightning bolt isn't just you being a homer, it's shorted out the logic circuits in your brain.I don't think that's fatlogic, it's just habits. You have no good habits and only bad ones.

Another thing to remember about fatlogic is that it's espoused by lazy people who don't know the meaning of hard work.

Think about Ragen quitting all of her projects. That's fatlogic. Fatlogic is a mental impairment. It makes you think you can be instantly successful at anything the first time you do it with no prep, practise or anything else. And people who do that simply quit when they fail because they unrealistically expect to succeed and don't know how to handle failure, nor do they have the habits to weather the challenge.

Think about alcoholics. It's a lifelong thing for them. Many of them fail several times before they handle their addiction. They do programs to learn steps and habits to deal with things.

You've basically told us that you have no habits, no motivation and unrealistic expectations. This is a life problem. You are failing at other things as well because this is your approach. If you change your life habits, losing weight is just one of many branches on the strong root of your tree. As the trunk gets bigger, the branches become stronger. You don't need good diet habits, you need good life habits. People fail at dieting because they have poor impulse control, lack of consistent motivation/goal-setting and no repetitive habits to fall back on. Never mind the lack of a proper support network. You can succeed with 2 of 3, but not 0 of 3.

Your problem is that no one ever taught you how to be successful. It's like no one teaching you piano and then you're telling us you want to perform as a concert pianist...today. Right now.

You have to learn how to set goals and habits to achieve them. Life works in 3 stages, short, medium and long term goals.

Short term goals are things you do every day and take stock in your success.

* I got up on time

* I ate a proper breakfast

* I got out the door early

Etc.

Then, after a month you see that you've established a pattern. This consistency allows your life to be automatic so you can focus your energy on bigger and better tasks, like medium-term goals.

* I will go a year without going over my calorie goal ever

* I will exercise every day for 365 days

Etc

Only then can you set a long term goal, which is to lose 50lbs.

Because if you build up to it, you will do it. If you just pull shit out of your ass like Ragen, you end up mediocre, good at nothing and unable to sustain anything. The difference between you and her is that she is willfully ignorant and doesn't want to put in the work. You want to put in the work, it's just no one has taught you how.

Don't focus your energy on diet habits. Focus it on life habits and I promise you the dieting and a bunch of other shit you could improve and don't think about will follow. You will be able knock all of these things down with broad strokes all at once.

As time goes on, fatlogic is just a symptom of a bigger issue. Don't treat the symptom, EVER. Always treat the root cause. You need to be a better you.You've just given me more reason not to watch Empire.

I didn't know she was in it.

She cannot act.Narcissism is about power over others

Humility is about power over yourself

It's interesting because I just posted a comment about self-improvement as a way to weight control. Your post here really underlines the mentality behind fatlogic, which is that self-control and self-improvement are offencive to FAs.

They are so uneducated that they cannot differentiate between a desire to have power over other people and a desire to have power over your own failings.One of my favourite quotes is "when the student is ready, the teacher will appear"

Don't beat yourself up for not calling the cops earlier.

You called them when you were ready.

It's sort of like The Architect or Morpheus in The Matrix. They both had a view of things with a certain predestination where they happen as they were supposed to, at least for the most part.

Life is kinda like that. Don't beat yourself up. Your mom doesn't need any extra help.She misses oral.

Advise her to grow her own beard and no one will feel any itching, scratching or tickling.I give wrong advice all the time. I assure it's nothing personal either way. 

I try to make reasonable assessments, but in the end fantasy is still betting. If it were 100% guaranteed, it wouldn't be fun. It'd be sure betting.

If a sure bet goes wrong, shouldn't you be angry at the person you're betting on?Move to Quebec and collect welfare. Everyone else does it.

Get on your feet and go from there. Baby steps.

Also, choose a rural area so your rent is under $300/mo.People are stupidI have. 

How Tom Landry was treated?

The White House?

Nate Newton?

That's what I did. 1TB drives are $58 This is insane. I can't wait to see Black Friday.

Do I need another XBOX One...I'd say you should complain, but they'll SWAT your house and give your credit card details to a gang.

Stupid Newegg customer service.It's too bad his SUV didn't transform and then go into space to destroy an asteroid.Cake and pie is like beef and chicken.

It's a combo that seems plausible until you eat it.

But there's a bridge animal: pigs. Bacon cheeseburgers? Yum. Chicken cordon bleu with black forest ham? Awesome.

I think you're on to something. You need a bacon bridge.No it wasn't. It was 8. I heard the instant traffic update on your radio. San Diego is practically psychic.He's right. You guard the outside of the lane. Shit goes bad, go onto the shoulder. Same as if someone merged into you.

Upvote for him, downvote for you. Let the battle commence!1-800-CC-RIDER

Pretty sure he had to take it to get his endorsement unless he challenged the exam instead.Cruz really hurt me fantasy-wise. 

I drafted him.

I held him.

I dropped him when it looked bad during the season

I picked him back up again after that.

I dropped him again.

If I had just not bothered with him, I could have used that roster space on literally anything.

Now imagine how the actual NFL team with him must feel.Frank Gore is way more disappointing if you ask me. The lack of a run game has ruined you guys. It's not all his fault - Pep was a fucking idiot and Frank's usage (or lack thereof)...I'm trying hard to avoid a tangential rant, but if you give this fucking guy a snap count, don't waste your Frank Gore ammo by shooting bullets on pass plays.

If Frank Gore has 10-15 rushes in his old, broken down body, put him in there to run the fucking ball right down the gut of the defense! Have him pound some dude in the chest and knock his wind out! It's Frank Gore! That's what god built Frank Gore to do. He wasn't made to pass block or leak out to the edge and wait for passes. He was made to bring it directly into the heart of defenses. 

Johnson is a nice complimentary WR and he's been that. I have no problem with him. He'd be better if there was an established run game.

Gore is marginally less Trent Richardson. I'm hoping your fanbase gets to the point where they can be honest and stop making excuses for Gore and then move on and point the crosshairs at your GM. Again, I'm gonna disagree with an AFC South fan about his own team.

Lee was never the linchpin to making your offense roll. He was just a guy - one of many.

It's Joeckel and to a lesser extent Beadles.

I can go either way. You have all of these damned INTs because you're forcing passes. No QB fumbles, though. Bortles knows he's in trouble and throws picks instead of eating it and fumbling. 20 yard net effective punts.

Anyway, Joeckel is supposed to be great. He's...not even good. That's disappointing.

We know Beadles is bad, but he's possibly more disappointing because he isn't even playing NFL-level football. He is by far the worst O-lineman in the NFL this year. He is singlehandedly killing your team, but so is Joeckel. Bortles blind side is a disaster.Yeah, I had taken him in my all-IDP defensive league this year because I expected him to be...he's not even a shadow of his former self. 

I'm betting this is his last year as a Patriot. He's gonna be on this list soon if he isn't careful:

http://www.businessinsider.com/worst-athlete-performance-collapses-ever-2010-8?op=1If it's $45 there it'll be less elsewhere.

Maybe with more figure sales.

Gamestop has a really unhealthy relationship with TTL figures. I think it scares them, even though it's one of the few things that will save them from digital marketplaces. Here in Clinton County, independence is having a Gadsden Flag on your porch and getting welfare.

/actually UpstateThe only migration I've minded is:

- Californication of the suburbs south of PDX (because of poor planning)

- Malcontents moving to Seattle after WTO and making it stressful and confrontational rather than laid back and harmonious

- Real estate speculation from China in the GVRD

- Torontonians moving to Vancouver

Everything that's happened before and after has helped the mosaic.

All of these are issues that could have been dealt with or should. Most of that can be solved by making sure the aforementioned people are made to feel unwelcome.I will say it until I'm blue in the face: I would have rather had CJ Mosley. He should have been our James Farrior IICobb would be the best WR3/gadget guy ever if he'd just accept that's what he is. Look at what Edelman has done with that role. 

Losing Jordy really hurt Cobb. 

Jones at the X, Nelson at the Z and Cobb moving around would be indefensible. Cobb is disappointing because he lacks the humility to say "I am a slot WR and I am gonna be the best slot WR there ever was."

He reminds me of Kordell Stewart - a guy that could have had a much better career if he didn't force his team to do something they shouldn't have done with them. 

Conversely, I find myself loving Taiwan Jones more and more. He does what he's asked to do.Which truly does look like a dumpster fire

/r/justfuckmyshitup

"Just gimme dat dumpster fire look, fam"The demon that possessed Al "Skeletor" Davis has left it's dead host and moved on to the next vessel decrepit enough to not resist it, Jerry Jones.Except he reportedly paid millions of dollars.

That's not nothing. It's probably the best she could have hoped to happen.A race to the bottom is still a competitionDoesn't it amaze you that some fanbases put up with/enable shit like this?

Mara would have done it because fans would have been pissed. I listen to WFAN up here in Canada. Everyone calling in is pissed at JPP. They all want him gone for something. I think the problem is that he hasn't shown any sort of remorse. 

You can say that it's because he legally can't/shouldn't admit to anything, but there is a non-incriminating way of taking responsibility, such as donating half of your cheques for the season to a womens' shelter or something. 

He's just a dumb dick.I want to rant against a lot of the people here in /r/fatlogic

You don't have fatlogic if you admit there's something wrong happening and you want to change it. You just have some bad information and/or bad habits.

Don't associate yourself with the likes of a Ragen.

You're nothing like her. You are self-aware and want to be better.Hold me I'm scared?

/got 'nuthin

/m'deityNo, but Frost Giants do."Skinny women look like little boys! You're gross! You like boys!"

Woman gets all buff.

"She looks like a man, that's gross!"

Okay...

"I love manly men who are buff!"

WHAT DO YOU PEOPLE EVEN WANT ANYMORE?!? SERIOUSLY!No shit. 

I want a woman who I can treat as a normal person, no higher or lower than I am.

Inequality happens in relationships, but it shouldn't be the goal to have it.I love the whole "everyone wants to fuck me", yet these same people complain they're dehumanised because no one ever looks at them.

Do you know why I don't even remotely look at obese women? Because I read comments like these and I don't like to feel creepy. If it's that obvious to you that every male wants to fuck you then I'm not gonna look at you. I'm not your admirer. Why should they be allowed to say we're creepy for acknowledging their existence in a non-sexual way by sexualising it?http://www.omgfacts.com/throwback/9547/UC-Berkeley-awarded-a-Bachelor-s-Degree-in-Magic-in-1970&gt; I've actually yet to see anyone rather on social media or real life that says "you can't wear that"

Yeah, but we're all *thinking* that and these people are legitimately psychic because they know it.

And before you say "no, smacksaw", let me remind you that Ragen herself participates in psychic rape battles.At the time a lot of people thought the WC was a gimmick...because they were butthurt. 

It's not like he and many other 49ers didn't have "system" levied upon them by people. They absolutely did. A lot!

It was always painful for me because while I detested (and still do) the 49ers, I have always respected the hell out of what they've accomplished.

This sort of bullshit is designed to diminish those accomplishments. You cannot take ANYTHING away from what they've done.The problem with the PS4 is that it gets full.

Mine is disassembled right now figuring out why the fucking Nyko Data Bank isn't working.

Meanwhile, my XB1 has a 5TB drive attached externally and is working fine.

What kills you is all of the PS+ stuff as well. That shit fills you up quick.

While I prefer my PS4, I cannot recommend it to anyone until they allow external hard drives to be attached. It's the better console in every way except that.

I dunno what you're talking about. I was at Shoppers today and the 500GB Halo MCC was $349.

That's fucking $260 US with the exchange.

$260 dude.

These people are paying $90 more to get a bunch of shit they may or may not want. That extra $90 is only a good deal if it's things you were buying anyway.My Steam library says it most definitely is cheaper.It gets better:

https://twitter.com/laurenevemay/status/660632463899774977/photo/1Please, HMX.

Enough with the Pearl Jam.

Can't we flesh out some of the non-Pearl Jam artists before we start doing every single obscure thing from Pearl Jam?

I certainly would enjoy some more St Vincent. Mike McCready loves her. He even interviewed her a few weeks ago. See! She's practically Pearl Jam. So why don't you go ahead and give us more of *her* music and pretend it has something to do with Pearl Jam so that you can satisfy your irrational boner for all things Pearl Jam.Yeah, maybe so. I found it interesting that that one person mentioned the "long-term normalisation" goal, whereas a long-term victim is a person that burns up relationships and grows tiresome quickly.

Also, in case she didn't know, fat is already the new normal. It's been that way for a long time. So is greed, sloth, gluttony and any number of other unethical, immoral or otherwise disgusting behaviours.

Want to call reddit disgusting? Takes one to know one.HAES to me is always Todd Akin. Whenever I hear "the wisdom of the body" shit, it always brings me back to his idiotic comment:

&gt;Well you know, people always want to try to make that as one of those things, well how do you, how do you slice this particularly tough sort of ethical question. First of all, from what I understand from doctors, that's really rare. If it's a legitimate rape, the female body has ways to try to shut that whole thing down. But let's assume that maybe that didn't work or something. I think there should be some punishment, but the punishment ought to be on the rapist and not attacking the child.

"If it's legitimate overeating, the body has a way to shut that down and spontaneously abort your candy orally."You know how it's always the anti-gay preacher or politician who is caught having sex with a man or a boy?

It's because people with no interest in that shit don't think about it.

I would like to know why this person is so concerned about the sex lives of children. Those cops are either high as shit or have been crying.No, Hilton is a trap. He's Vincent Jackson without the knowledge "after the fact"

Hilton can't get open unless he's seeing zone and/or gets a free release. He cannot beat a physical DB. This is reflected in his output.

Hilton is averaging 9.5 PPG this year. Over 8 games, he has:

* Exceeded it twice (13 and 27 points)

* Been within 20% of his average twice (8,8 and 9 points)

* Been below his average and below what even a "WAR" type of WR would do (1, 4 and 6 points)

In 8 games, only 25% of them have been above average and of those two games, only one was a truly spectacular performance. He's been average in 38% of his games. Overall he's been at his average PPG or above it in 63% of games and failed in 38% of them (rounding).

You have greater odds of him being below average than you do of him being above average. You have the same odds of him being below average as you do of him being average.

I would love to play against Hilton every week. It means my opponent has a very risky play. We know who he is. Take last year for an example. He had 6 games with a TD, 10 without. He had 6 games with over 100 yards, 10 without. Of those games, 4 of those 6 games had both the 100+ yard game and the TD, meaning he was complete overkill on those weeks. Or, in 38% of games he was above average. He's at 25% this year. That's a downward trend.

Last year he had 9 games with 10 points or higher, which was 57%. Compared to this year, he's a little more consistent and far less explosive. He's below the 11 PPG he had last year.

What evidence do you have that he's going to turn it around when he had a far better situation last year and was statistically indistinguishable from this year? He's never been a guy with a solid floor. If you go back to 2013, his 2014 season seems like an anomaly and his 2015 season seems like the proper regression.

Look, I've given you info both ways. Stat-wise there's no trend to show he should be better. You have a gut feeling? Ok, cool. Quantify it. What have you seen that you like about him?

I also explained right off the bat why he does and doesn't succeed as a receiver. He's primarily a deep threat who feasts on soft coverage. His stats and huge games only serve to prove that point.

H2H fantasy football is a series of weekly wagers. He is about the lowest floor and highest ceiling you can find and I am more than happy to take my chances against him on any given week. If he hits the jackpot and pays off for you, fantasy gods bless you. I got suckerpunched. I'm willing to let that happen to me. I'm not willing to be the person depending on it to perpetrate on others.At a minimum you should lock rosters for teams not in the playoffs.

Unless you set your rules differently, even the 8th place team has a playoff. The 10th or 12th place team isn't eliminated yet and they are fighting to be 6th in the consolation bracket.

However, if they are mathematically eliminated from *all* playoff brackets, I would lock their teams unless there are rules in the charter like the last place team has to buy beer or something. Interesting, I chose to drop Big Ben despite liking him a lot this week.

Palmer is very interesting because he will be playing for the top seed throughout the playoffs. Both Brees and Roethlisberger will be fighting to make them or maybe not make them at all.

It's the halfway point. You need to make moves for December. As I just said in a different post, if you are above .500 right now, you need to start planning for December as if you're a playoff team. In ESPN, you need a defense who is going to coast in weeks 14-17 and in Yahoo/CBS/NFL weeks 14-16. 

Arizona are a huge risk here on out. Even against poor teams they haven't fared well, ie the past two weeks. There's another juicy 49ers matchup to come, but the rest of their schedule ranges from iffy to brutal.

I have dropped Carolina this week, but I love them ROS. They have three risky plays vs ATL (home and away) and @NO. The rest of them have very good odds and Carolina have been consistent. Although you will face ATL twice in your fantasy playoffs and they will both need those games, Carolina are able to get at Ryan.

I love Seattle ROS and I love them in the playoffs. If you have Seattle DST for 14-16, you are in a good place. Take them. 

The one defense that should be picked up this week to start now and kept for later is Philly. Dallas are a great matchup and ROS their only bad matchup is Arizona and NE, but NE happen before your playoffs. The Eagles are a solid bet to get you there from here and then win it for you when you're there.Big Love is gonna die. Sooner than later.Luckily James Spader has amazing chemistry with everyone and can carry any scene.Unless you're in a library, you should be speaking directly into your phone to write texts. I just wrote this comment to you by speaking.I say you he dedI always thought Janeway reflected 90's aspirational values for women. That as a woman she had to work twice as hard and do anything and everything to be considered as good as any man.

I frankly didn't like that because I always felt patronised by it. If it's the future, she's already fully equal to men. They tried too hard to make her strong and left her instead as inhumanly unsympathetic. Her mission was to be a caricature of a misunderstanding of what a strong woman should be. I think she ended up a parody. I don't think there's any mission stuff. In fact, the final episode was them trying to finally humanise her in a desperate, last ditch attempt.

Once you acknowledge the naked politics of it, you see that nothing she does makes sense because they didn't write her to acknowledge a person with motivations, but an icon of ideals.I still contend that this SRS takeover is by far the funniest shit to ever happen and the ongoing joke is brilliant.The Devils weren't supposed to do shit, either. After 4 horrible games, the team is on fire and currently holds a WC spot.

I can't get my hopes up again.Man he really hates children and animals.

Psychopath?Probably won't list them until right before BF. They don't show the three pot Toastmaster slow cooker from Page 1, either.As long as you're not in Gasp\u00e9 or Lac St Jean you are golden.Michelle BachmannMcFadden MCL sprain confirmedIn related news: water wetHe might have a good playoff run due to his opponents, but you have to read between the lines.

His snap count is what it is because of his age. You're saying that an ageing RB is going to be at his best when players like him are breaking down and often at their worst. 

You can't simply say "great matchups" without acknowledging the grind, especially on his 32yo body. 

He's on pace for 240 attempts this year, which would be his lowest total since 2011/lowest total as a starter or not injured.

He might see an uptick in carries because he'll have the same amount of snaps, but better usage (not being wasted on pass plays), but to predict that will be in the fantasy playoffs? 

You really think they're gonna burn him up and burn him out in the weeks leading up to January? That sounds likely? Or do they preserve him for the playoffs? Which sounds more reasonable?

Gore benefits because the wasted snaps where it was simply a passing down becomes run plays, something he should have had all along. That said, let's examine his "volume" games:

He's averaging 4.3 yards per carry. We will split it into two categories: games where he had less than 4.3 and games where he had more than 4.3 YPC.

Number of attempts in games under 4.3 YPC: 8, 15, 17, 22

Number of attempts in games over 4.3 YPC: 14, 22, 13, 9

He's a complete crapshoot. Volume hasn't shown he's effective and volume is the main factor in his usage from this point forward. In 3 of 4 games he was super-effective on limited carries, while he was less effective as his volume went up. If you want to eliminate the outliers and just look at his average, between 9-14 carries is where he's most effective.

If you actually watched his games, his YPC is a fraud because he's not grinding out 4.3 every time he touches the ball. He's getting stuffed, stuffed, stuffed, big gainer. When guys are ineffective like that, they tend to get pulled.

Gore is one of the most volatile situations there is and usage isn't going to make it better if he's only getting 3.2 YPC and is being burned out.

So...I disagree with you. Strongly.It's simply to slow down the pass rush.

From an NFL perspective, I love it when Gore is getting gang tackled for a gain of 2 yards. It means he's physically wearing down the defensive front and he's forcing the defense to not play the pass every down.

From a fantasy perspective, he's cancer.&gt; Luck has always played better in a spread-em-out and use quick passing and dump offs (high percentage throws). 

Which is why they got Bradshaw

&gt;But the colts are not built for power running. 

That is the most fundamental thing any team should be able to do.

Are you forgetting Blount?

&gt;The pats are doing it right. Only using power running against better defenses. 

They aren't built for a power running game. In fact, the main differentiator is blocking TEs. The Pats have two of the worst starting blocking TEs in the NFL. Gronk doesn't even try on every play. Fleener and Allen aren't much better at blocking, but they are."We're down by 17 with 6 minutes left to play. Let's establish a ball control run game and use the clock."So?

That's a meaningless statistic in his case. You have clearly not watched the Colts because you have failed the eye test.

He's not getting between 4.0 and 4.6 yards every time he carries the ball. In 8 games, his YPC goes:

* 3.12

* 3.18

* 3.80

* 3.88

* 4.45

* 4.78

* 6.00

* 6.14

That is completely inconsistent. Half of his games are well below his average and the other half are way above. You're saying that he is getting 4.4 (it's 4.3 BTW) every time touches the ball and it's wrong. His poor YPC is a major contributing factor to the Colts' inconsistency. They suck because he isn't anywhere near his average. 

http://www.diffen.com/difference/Mean_vs_Median

He has tons of carries of -1, 0 and 1 yards, then a bunch for 7 or 9 yards this year. You are advocating the wrong metric.I've been holding Bradshaw for some time because I expect him to take more and more of Gore's vacuum as time goes on.

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/201510180clt.htm#snap_counts

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/201510250clt.htm#snap_counts

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/201511020car.htm#snap_counts

In the 3 games since Bradshaw has been back, snap count percentage:

* NE@IND - Gore 46% Bradshaw 23%

* NO@IND - Gore 49% Bradshaw 46%

* IND@CAR - Gore 65% Bradshaw 33%

The Colts don't want to use Gore 65% of the time. That will wear him down. 23% was Bradshaw's first week back, 46% off the bat is encouraging 33% is not bad. 

The way I see it, there's a good 50% or so of the snaps to be had for Bradshaw there and he's yet to fill the vacuum left by age necessitating Gore be on a snap count.

The only downside is that Bradshaw's YPC is shitty because the Colts suck at running the ball in general. Bradshaw has a higher career YPC and all things being equal, I would expect him to have similar effectiveness to Gore with Gore (rightfully) getting more TDs and Bradshaw more receptions.This is the much better question to ask.**Conclusion**

Fuck, he's not playing the Colts again

Really, nice work. Thanks for the effort.

Most people using him are forced to do so. Given the RBs I've lost, I am at peace with the fact that he's yet another NFL RB who can't get hard yards and then breaks one for a big gainer. He won't help his team much with that and is likely to get removed situationally because he isn't going to establish a ground game given his poor performance as a power rusher.

He's a boom/bust pick at RB and shouldn't be used over a WR in your FLEX. I'm out of RBs in some leagues. He's my RB1/RB2 and will either be huge or do very little. 5-15 point range.It's like the movie trope:

"You want it in the head or the chest?"

Either way, you're dead.

"You want fuck a giant muscle mound or a gelatinous blob?"CTRL+F "raw"

You are not alone. That's how I found your comment.You don't want morale to get any worse:

http://www.cnsnews.com/news/article/brittany-m-hughes/dhs-ranked-worst-place-work-federal-government

I know a lot of people who work for DHS. The best thing to combat everything you named would be making it a good place to work so that you could attract decent people. 

Putting cameras on bad cops simply means that bad cops have cameras. The good officers there are vastly outnumbered and totally demoralised. Not a vast majority, but a significant minority.When he's not playing TE, he's playing the patsy.In a related note, I think the Chargers have been as dishonest with the city as the city has been with the Chargers (which is a lot) - but the question only addresses the team.

I don't think the Chargers have negotiated once in good faith since the 1990's.I think it's that they have to expose their methodology in detail.

I think they won't because it's probably a proprietary trade secret. Think of it like a Jeopardy answer: if it's descriptive enough, you can guess the question.

If they expose their methodology, you see the "lie of omission" which would expose their concerns. What they tested for. Why they did it.

Think about if someone did this to big tobacco or big oil 50 years ago. It would have shown they knew all along that smoking caused cancer and burning fossil fuels was a major contributor towards climate change.

By challenging them he wins. They either have to show what they're doing and put their concerns on the table or he can cast aspersions where the silence is deafening. Plus, based upon a reaction (or lack thereof) by Monsanto, each accusation he levels at them will confirm or deny his theories. He's using the scientific method to solve a psychological mystery.You are insipid, stop living your life through your child.

My daughter was the same way. I never taught her to like that crap either, but she does. We watched all sorts of anime, for an example. But she treasures Sailor Moon.

Turns out, my son liked it as well. It didn't make him gay or her weak. Amazingly you can like a diversity of women. I thought feminism was about accepting all choices.People who can't accept others are always quick to blame society and it's standards. Yet they also don't like bullying because people shouldn't be coerced into conformity, yet these people are the biggest bullies there are.Additionally, she's gonna ruin this kid if she can't embrace the choice to be a girly-girl. This kid will learn the mother is to be resented and rebelled against.

If she wasn't selfish, she might notice that's how the world works.I'd like a feminist to answer how it's possible to conform and not culturally appropriate, seeing as their definition makes them overlap so.I was about to say...I've always dreamt of a similar build as a way to access surf spots that are otherwise difficult to get at and camp nearby.

Although my idea was an F-650 or F-750 with a custom fiberglass/carbon shell. I was more interested in weight management and aerodynamics and a diesel tuned for MPGs.I actually take hotel shuttles in cities where I intend to use transit. I flat out tell the driver I'm not staying at the hotel and give them a fiver.

Usually it's the best tip they get all day. If they press the issue, I just say I'm going to meet someone/eat at the bar/restaurant (because I am). Not that I've been interrogated, more like light curiosity in a "then why are you going to the hotel" sort of thing.

Doesn't really work with Courtyard, etc though.That's why you pick a rental company who are slightly off-site.The defect in thinking is that their moral outrage is all wrong.

They are more offended by the concept of someone cheating the system than they are someone suffering. They rationalise it by saying that the person suffering somehow brought it upon themselves, which in turn assuages their guilt.

Of course these are the first people to blame hardship on "the will of God", which leads me to point out that if God is making someone suffer, how did this person become deserving of suffering or bring it upon themselves?

That's hypocrisy. I have no time for that sort of anti-thinking.As I just said to someone else, they get samples and freebies from pharmaceutical reps.

Source: ex-MIL and ex-FIL are both pharmacists, I also did contracts for pharmaceutical companies. Their salespeople drive around with tons of drugs to give out. I always likened them to drug dealers. They don't even have medical/pharmaceutical degrees. Yeah, I always LMAO when I'm driving in NH and see these digital billboards that say "Whatever hospital clinic #1 wait time and #2 wait time" and it's like 2 minutes and 5 minutes.

Then I go back to Quebec and people show up at 4am for a 7am opening, wait in the snow (even though they're sick) and all of the appointments for the day are taken within the first 5 minutes of opening.

Buying tickets for U2's Zooropa tour at Ticketmaster was less heartbreaking and lasted longer.He will never win the nomination. The party apparatus will never allow it. Ever.Also the Colts.

Not only that their offense is bad, but that they legitimately have a run defense. Nobody saw that coming. Minimalist techno soundtrack. It's awesome how the music got intense when things were happening.Exactly.

That's why the solution is a dress code and taking more forms of payment.

Wait, what?Which is in turn funny as Quebec are protecting this taxi industry for tax revenue...which people don't declare?It's not gray at all, it's an issue of competing precedents and certain laws superseding other laws, including federal ones.

I assume this will end up with d\u00e9tente due to the Notwithstanding Clause as Qu\u00e9bec will do the ROC a solid, fight this all the way to the supreme Court (of Canada), get it ruled legal for everyone...and then use the Notwithstanding Clause to ignore the ruling and have all of their actions thrown out or contested, blocking up our crowded court system until...Yeah.

Government works! It's the Qu\u00e9bec way!While I disagree, the proper way for Quebec to screw Uber is to make insurance illegal for it.Except with ninja turtles and air hogs.

Should be kinky.I don't think it's comparable at all.

Beckham was/is matchup-proof and it was clear to anyone with two eyes and a modicum of objectivity how NFL-ready he was.

Diggs is a very raw WR who is benefitting by the necessity of volume on his team. When you watch Diggs, there are times when he is never as open as Beckham was. Diggs is also a different player in the sense that Beckham is more like an Antonio Brown, Julio Jones or Calvin Johnson where he can go and get it and do magic whereas Diggs is more like an Antonio Brown or Julio Jones where you just get it in his hands and take a chance he makes magic.

I mention Antonio and Julio because neither of them are there.Not only that, but the article said "migrants" - not all migrants are refugees, but all refugees are migrants.

The question is if these people are refugees or economic migrants.Mexicans are a bad example. 

I'm from San Diego. It used to be Mexican. Everything there is Spanish. The culture is heavily Spanish and is a mix of Spanish and American culture, as well as California culture.

They aren't coming to some sort of foreign culture and despite the intransigence of a select few who refuse to learn English due to a misguided sense of historical entitlement, Mexican migrants are very keen to join the melting pot. 

I know, because I speak Spanglish. Mexican-Americans *like* being Americans. They see themselves as Americans. They are full participants in American society. They aren't excluding people or xenophobic in any way. They have no cultural or religious rules about exclusion or xenophobia, either. The reason we have such an amazing hybrid culture in California speaks to the truth of the melting pot and American Dream. You have two cultures who want to find the best. I mean, why else is there Mexican food, Spanish-inspired art and architecture, etc everywhere?

Just a terrible analogy dude.The only 2nd choice game actually worth retail is Halo 5 and if it's already in Madden territory, I expect it to be super cheap in the near future.

This is actually a terrible deal. I wouldn't buy Madden for $25 off, no strings attached. You're far better off making them price match Target.

The only way it works is if you desperately want Halo 5 and Fallout. It's $71 for both after GCU and discounts.Yup. I've hit 50 mpg in my Rio5 and my Civic. Nothing is more stressful than some asshole who pulls out right in front of you and makes you accelerate again and then is stop and go on the brake and gas.

It can be really stressful.Yeah whenever I see tire ads and there's a $28 tire, I always think "no one owns a Geo anymore. They all died."Same with Eddie Lacy.

No matter what the matchup is, he's matchup proof against it.I'll just say what I wanted to say live as it happened, which was that you don't put your elbow out during a hook slide when the QB is giving up.

Even if the QB wasn't going to give up, you still don't lead with your elbow.

Intent to injure is the only explanation. Today with Frank Gore is truly a testament to the stupidity of Pep Hamilton.

His firing was validated before Gore even scored.I'm waiting for the infographic that shows pass distribution (it's good) so I can say "FUCK PEP HAMILTON" some more.

I don't have it fully out of my system yet.TIL teeth can bleedI like Tony Jerod-Eddie because he has three first names. It seems like we're on a first name basis.Shaun Draughn? More like Shawn Worker AMIRITE?After seeing his arms, we should call him Salisbury Steak

This is all gravy from here on out for him career-wise

I'll stop now The O-line looks much more confident being allowed to do fundamental, straightforward power run blocking.So yeah...Dan Quinn...that thing about the clock.

Yup.You could tell that was a slip screen TD to Freeman before Ryan even dropped back.I'll level with you: I still don't know the difference between Cameron Jordan and Jordan CameronThe Freeman drone't has ended.Sporting challengeEmbarrassingSome people just want to watch their world burnKind of a shame because you're only gonna face that kind of defensive mistake once a game and they fell down.

Twice.You know why I like little guys as pass blockers?

That's why. 

Damn ankle biters.Maybe like a Red Cross logo or perhaps a picture of a hospital ship sinking?Yeah I don't feel like celebrating anything until I find out Ben is going to be just fine.I see Mike Zimmer took to drinking over the Bridgewater injuryBlaine Gabbert isn't confounding this defense, he's confounding humanity.You've got to speak to your intended audience in a language they understandWell that was nice of him to hold on to a ball&gt;In an article published last year on CampusReform.org, Abigail Alger, a manager at the Leadership Institute in Washington D.C., wrote that the subject is "part of a dangerous dumbing down of liberal education in which the pursuit of knowledge is replaced by frantic social programming and promotion of state programs." The discipline, Alger argued, doesn't encourage open debate, but instead "begins with the end in mind," and brands as a bigot anyone who disagrees.

http://i.imgur.com/Kt7EX4F.png

&gt;This may explain, at least in part, why there seem to be so few overweight and obese undergraduates enrolled in universities today. Recent studies have shown that body-consciousness can not only hurt academic performance in high school, but can also deter fat students from applying to college, and from receiving adequate help and attention from teachers and college advisers. The exact amount of attrition is impossible to pinpoint, but members of fat academia have noticed the scarcity of plus-size silhouettes on campus\u2014particularly in exclusive private schools, where Fat Studies is most likely to be funded and taught

Well, Ragen's found her excuse for when she's nailed down as exaggerating her credentials.

&gt;What fat activism needs now, it seems, are a few small waistlines.

YOU PC BRO?Those are terrible analogies. 

A better analogy would be "I had sex and used a condom" vs "I had sex and used a condom, but then threw it out and had sex 11 more times until I was bloody and raw."

One is responsible sex, the other leads to pregnancy and/or disease.

I don't fault people for getting pregnant or an STI, but they are accountable for their own risky behaviour if that's what actually led to their affliction.And if you put all of them in a prison environment with a strict 1800 calorie per day restriction (like prisons purposely do to prisoners to keep them weak and hungry) and make them engage in tons of physical activity, it's hard to be a fat prisoner unless you buy candy at the canteen.That was greedy, even for Calvin JohnsonI remember a time when Roddy would have caught thatField position?Yeah short stops suck Oh boy...famOk Colts you've let them back in. 

Power run Gore now.So basically a company that sells light bulbs have come up with a plan to get us to buy light bulbs from them1st and 10, let's pass!Nice run by Not Doug MartinBRING BACK SIMSThat's how I score in MaddenBreaking news....

.....

.....

^^^^nevermind

COMMERCIAL!No dude he's one of the nicest Joes there isThen it should have said SPRAINING NEWSHe doesn't score enough except from downtownI didn't have the volume on, did they say that Gabbert is ok then/what was the issue?

EDIT: thanks everyone, glad he's alrightBradshaw wanted that so bad. I knew it was to him and no Bronco even looked his way pre-snap.That was short, he was turned around before he made it.

Although I do love that playcall. That's one of my faves of all time. That's yinzer thinking.Man all that time I thought they were taking turns squeezing each others' nuts, they were actually shopping for electronics with Visa.Rage sackOf course he's a good DB.

He's named Cromartie.

That's why I named all of my children Cromartie. I want kids with NFL money to support me in my old age.I don't think anyone is gonna say this was a particularly attractive game today, but it's been interesting.Toler was like "YOU WON'T GET THE RECORD ON ME"Poor tackling. Just poor.Vintage Manning. Awesome look off.I disagree with the FG here.It's overGot great DBs covering your best players?

Ask Doyle to step up.Moncrief Charlie BrownThat Week 12 game vs MIN will probably be for the playoffs or notI've never liked Talib. Always proving what a piece of shit he is whenever he's given a chance.Both of them.Every investment is a risk.

Not only that, harassing peon Uber drivers isn't the key. You sign on with government? Lobby it like everyone else."Good plan. These seats are for losers. You can have it."It's also worth mentioning that it's similar to letting the Fox into the henhouse by allowing these reformed misogynists be your ally. Why would you let them get that close to you?They can believe that if they like, but time and again managed growth has prove superior to NIMBYism.

People choose better forms of transit through positive reinforcement, not negative. The working poor forced out to the suburbs don't have a choice but to drive. Between high living costs, daycare, etc, they can't bus it everywhere like a student.

Someone has to make your latte in Bellevue.Are there any QBs who are decent outside of Eli Manning and Ben Roethlisberger at digging themselves out of holes?

What's considered the best record based upon the frontrunner there? A .200 win pct?I suppose "catch and go" works if you have no range or accuracy down the field.Matt Cassel, I take back everything I ever said about you having a shit deep ballCan't have the big throw?

Fuck it, he'll run it.

Matt's doing everything tonight.That's called "robbing the statue"Good: that was a really long drive

Bad: no points to take away; Eagles have the hurry upIs there where it gets out of hand?Beasley. Might try to cover him.PHI DBs:

"HOLY SHIT, THE RECEIVER IS GOING SIDEWAYS!"

"WHAT IS THIS SORCERY?"

"HOLD ME, I'M SCARED!"That's how these Eagles roll.OP said down by 9 or more in the 2nd half, though.

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/play-index/comeback.cgi?player=BradTo00

That's the closest I could get is what you said, the 4th, but looking back to the half like OP said.

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/200202030nwe.htm

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/200211100chi.htm

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/200212290nwe.htm

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/200711040clt.htm

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/200712290nyg.htm

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/200909140nwe.htm

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/201209300buf.htm

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/201311240nwe.htm

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/boxscores/201312080nwe.htm

Brady has won some of those games, apparently Rodgers has won none. Whether he's won more than he lost, I don't know. I don't have stats for that without going year-by-year through all of his losses. You're my favourite karmawhore - gotta get that comment karma up to 6 figures. Such a terrible ratio, tsk tsk!The Eagles are like a team of Todd Gurleys: look bad in the 1st, questionable in the 2nd, strong in the 3rd and world-beaters in the 4th.He's known for his arm. That catch by Ertz would have been a miss if not for the DB touching it and his facemask holding it.Well I'm looking forward to more OTRyan Mathews gonna Ryan Mathews

Charger fans are like "yup"Hell of a time to learn how to hang on to the ball, dudeAs if we needed any more proof what a narcissistic psychopath he is.

It's truly a testament to the victim/enabler mentality that so many people can not see through him. Yet they're the same people who see shit that isn't there (like Kenyan births). 

We are so screwed. I fear we've reached the "ignoramus tipping point" where no amount of education will correct the course we're on. We are just collectively morons.Speaking of voices, Reese Witherspoon. I mean, you already hate her for her voice, plus the fact she's a terrible person/spoiled brat.

I can't even imagine the sort of villain she'd play. I could see her with the "hurmph" pouty face when Reddington gets over on her and then crying hysterically. 

She frightens me.He should "Captain Dennis" or something reflective - Red's former boss in the navy.Tim Roth as a weapon Red sets loose, but can't stop once he's in motion.Candice Bergen would make a great "member of the cabinet" or something. Snoop DoggLOL Dawson is owned in 35% of ESPN leagues.

If he were worth starting, he'd be at least 90% owned.

He's not 80.

He's not 70.

He's not even 50-50.

He's *35%*

**35**I dunno, he's a top shot blocker at the position. I'm having fun in fantasy this year. I drafted a team *I* wanted to enjoy watching so I paired him and Andre and CP3, DeAndre and Griffin. 

I just like Reggie and Andre. They're killing it.I had a similar model. I was just telling my wife about it. I remember the pillow speaker. I also had a Sony pillow speaker. Mine was slightly less fancy, but had the same dial and knob placement. Thin people. Fuck them and their pointy elbows, always puncturing people and shit.

YOU SHOULD BE ASHAMED OF YOURSELVES, SKINNY DEFLATORS OF AMERICA!&gt; "All the important parts are still the same."

That...quote...sounded like someone trying to get me to switch to off-brand beer.

"All beer is the same. This one just comes in a yellow can that says 'No Name Beer', but it's just like regular beer!"

Well that's great if I'm the kind of person who can't tell the difference between Shiner Bock and Shinola, but you're not gonna convince me your shit is the same.

Even if I had no experience with women, I would be sceptical of your claims, dear.Is there any more video of her riding the bike?

I think I could use it for self-hypnosis if I had about 15 seconds of the rhythmic swaying of her different parts.Two Words:

Gene

Steratorehttp://i.imgur.com/6gMuxut.jpg

By "honest mistake" he means it was honestly a mistake.I was more amused at the "do people become obesity doctors because they hate fat people"

No, I'm pretty sure you've got that backwards. If anything, it's an acquired hate from having to deal with IRL shit like your conversation. 

I wouldn't blame anyone who dealt with this on a consistent basis.

* Go to school for many years because you want to help

* Survive all of your gruelling training

* Accrue massive, crushing, frightening debt

* Spend money on expensive insurance so you won't be sued into oblivion

* Dedicate your life to helping people

* Apply your scientific education

And get told by some fucking ignoramus with no education and no legitimate credentials that you're wrong.

Honestly, I wouldn't begrudge them hating you, either. Just know that it was never their intention, just that you drove them to that point by being insufferable.

EDIT: Here's my sympathy. Like...my expertise. Computer shit. It would be like someone telling me I should load viruses on my computer to make it run better and that a computer bloated with viruses/spyware/malware was just as good as a computer with Windows Defender running properly. If you failed to accept me telling you that your stupid idea about loading hacked software was causing your computer to pop up porn ads, I would probably get pretty angry with you as well. Because you're stupid.You should name her "Stallone" (I think Sylvester is already taken)Well, I did laugh at the guy "agonising" over the notion that it'd be an ammo dump or not.

What a buffoon.

It seems to me that the community is way too small to support a $4m mosque. And that's a financial issue, wrapped in ambition. ???

And if I wanted to build something uncivilised directly next to you and didn't need to ask the community (government) for permission, you'd be just fine with that?

I could have a hog rendering/torture plant right next to you. 

Man, if only there were some sort of entity who could set up rules to enforce the will of the community that would stop me from having an environmental disaster and plainly offencive idea right next to you.&gt; I'm sick and fucking tired of the government telling me what I can and can't do.

So you're saying the anti-black right-wingers who showed up at Ferguson with their guns displayed ought to be supporting the black residents because "libertarianism"?

"Libertarianism for me, jail for you."Yeah, so maybe we can combine "more donations" along with all of the "Lost Generation" types with no jobs and possibly pay them to fight for our civil liberties?Back when Mitsubishi and Hyundai shared platforms, my friend had an Excel that he badged up with Mitsubishi Precis stuff.

It was the "Hyunishi Precel."

Somewhere on a phone I have to find pics of an Avalanche I saw in Texas that was done as an Escalade. I called that the "Chevrillac Escalanche."&gt; Social justice is the view that everyone deserves equal economic, political and social rights and opportunities.

No, that's civil liberties.

Social justice means that *identifiable groups* deserve those things and will go about redistributing them from others to get it.

I don't know if you're an SJW or not, but if you aren't, you're sure doing a hell of a job helping them out there. You just described civil rights. They win when this is clouded in the minds of people because of the False equivocation you've just given social justice.

Civil rights is simple. There's no groups or identity politics, just the basic guarantee of access and participation in civic life regardless of who you are.

Social justice cares who you are first and foremost. If you're in a "have not" group, you coalesce for the good of your group and in turn take from the "haves". It's a basic redistribution scheme. Yeah, that "Renee" person seems incapable of getting it.I'm a progressive and I don't believe in that shit. 

I just got done telling someone that social justice isn't civil rights and now you're describing something that is regressive and calling it progressive?

Regressives want to roll back civil rights and civil liberties and replace them with rigid hierarchies and use intersectionality as a way to connect their byzantine system. They want to create a bureaucracy so cumbersome that any sort of social free market would wither and die. That's regressive. It's exactly what social conservatives try to do.

Progressives align with civil libertarians and civil rights activists because they're ultimately neutral. You ought to be allowed to do what you want. That's how things advance and move forward. 

There's this movement with the Republican party where they've alienated all of the common sense moderates. You're doing the same thing. Only the fringe lunatic left subscribe to social justice politics and they're quite similar to the right as far as horseshoe theory goes. By lumping normal, moderate progressives such as myself in with them you are taking away our ability to differentiate ourselves from their insanity.

Unless you're a far-right social conservative, in which case "good job" and keep going. You'll win when you have a culture war between your minority and their minority in the moderate majority is left out of the conversation in the same way they've been driven out of the GOP.Yeah we had one of these the other day and already agreed FiremanMovember?He really opened things up for Shady and Karlos. He's such an all-around threat that he makes holes for runners by forcing teams to account for all parts of his game.

If you need a fantasy QB for the playoffs, this is probably the last week to grab him or Bortles. I'd take them over Wilson at the his point. They're both legit QBs.I've never had problems with Chrome.

I actually prefer Chrome and Google Maps with Apple devices.

Also I think you've had bad luck with your devices.

The only Samsung device I've had that was fine from the start is my S5, which still reminds me several times a day to seal the cover.

My S6 is strange. It locks when I unlock it because it times out. My wife's doesn't.

I went through multiple S3 and S4 units, sending them back for various issues. But not as many as I went through iPhones. It affects both manufacturers. I think you should have sent back buggy hardware and that you got a good iPhone. That's the difference now.It's much better at 1.5x speedYou have to understand something, which is elitism. You don't get it. You think she speaks to the masses. She doesn't. She speaks to the policymakers who speak to the masses.

Here, look at CNBC:

http://www.wsj.com/articles/cnbc-to-stop-using-nielsen-for-ratings-1420520556

Or Meet the Press, now that it's a regular show:

http://deadline.com/2015/09/chuck-todd-mtp-daily-debut-483k-viewers-ratings-1201555235/

These shows exist because they reach a certain audience, ie beltway insiders or CEOs/institutional investors/journalists/etc. 

NBC doesn't give a fuck if you, the average joe watches their financial or political shows. They're a way for people who make policy to move their chess pieces around the board. It's a way for the journalistic community to know what's going to be the next week's topic. Stuff like that.

Anita doesn't catch the attention of the UN because there's a massive groundswell of people wanting her there, it's because elitists in power want her there and they live in their own bubble of news and information.

7000 views is meaningless. What if it's 7000 people who are journalists, policy makers, game company CEOs, etc? Then that's potentially huge.

You are measuring the absolutely wrong metric. This is the failure of your entire movement because you think it's about the massive majority of regular people and you don't matter. Elitists don't care about the common man. Voting with your wallet, boycotts, etc doesn't matter. Do you think you change what the Koch brothers do? George Soros? Rupert Murdoch? Donald Trump?

All you can do is focus your energy on an alternative, like Bernie Sanders or Ron Paul supporters do. You don't matter. Nominate someone who does. This is like a joust and you have to nominate a champion and have failed to do it. This is an elitist problem and you all constantly propose a solution which doesn't have entry into that club. I can't stand coming to this subreddit and seeing so many people spinning their wheels. This is exactly what the people who influence decisions want you to do: sit around ranting like a bunch of whiners. The rules of the game have changed and you're all too emotional to realise it.&gt; On an unrelated side note, I'd like to see a competitor of Madden to make a base game that has depth and has all the game modes, solid gameplay, and instead of releasing a yearly game, they sell the rosters and patches for like $30-40 each season. 

No way.

The roster updates, artwork, etc should all be mod packs done by the community for free. 

Someone should simply make a good football game that's generic and then we could download real players, uniforms, etc and there ain't shit the NFL could do about it because it would be private, anonymous individuals generating the update files.It's just the NFL in general, but we need an Elizabeth Warren-type of senator in regards to sports, games, privacy etc that will go to Washington and cause trouble.

You find the person who wants to run and let's get them elected.The most insulting thing is that in Canada, they charge $10 extra for NHL over other EA games.That's also why EA Access works - they expect you to pay for a subscription service to take part in microtransactions.IIRC the exclusion was mobile and PC was defined as consoles.&gt;who is clicking downvote at this moment

Not at all. You've lived up to your name and made a great point.&gt;We are continuing to remove jokes, memes, image macros and Facebook e-card material. 

Once upon a time I made a fatlogic FB subreddit and then realised I'd have to moderate it and never did anything with it. I thought it would be a good idea, a la /r/OldPeopleFacebook or something. I think the problem is that the community would become more FPH than what makes /r/OldPeopleFacebook and /r/ForwardsFromGrandma funny.

Basically, I'm just saying that I agree with you and why you're banning this stuff. Although I do think there's a place for it, I don't know of a way for it to organically develop a culture without being overwhelmed by FPH. Those aforementioned subs work because they have a specific culture that's really funny and it's not hate so much as it's parody. 

It's just a shame because there's so much facebook gold out there and it would also be easier to say "go to /r/FatPeopleFacebook with that". 

Unfortunately it would just turn into stolen pictures from FB captioned with "KILL THIS LAND WHALE" or whatever if it wasn't heavily moderated. Which is the problem you face and one I wouldn't want to have. 

Give an inch, take a mile. It's impossible to have a laugh without people taking it too far. That was the biggest mistake with banning FPH because it ended up radicalising fat hate and spread it out everywhere. If FPH still existed, you could have a subreddit with image macros and stuff that wasn't FPH and say "that shit belongs in FPH"...you can't do it now because there's no FPH drain filter to catch all of it anymore.Different post:

A meta selfie thread would be interesting because people could show their state/progress rather than just talk about it. 

I think a lot of people out there don't believe the users here are fat and/or were formerly fat. I don't even think they believe there's a real person behind these usernames. It would go a long way to humanise this subreddit. The detractors get to dictate who we are as well since we don't prove it. If we truly believe we can help and people are willing to do it, why not offer the opportunity? It's not like it's mandatory. Maybe no one would do it. Who knows?GGGBennett

Falls down to be sportingI can't believe that kid let up.

It's Cutler, dude. No one has a stronger arm. You can't outrun his throw.Meat SlausonTIL Satan is more proactive at gender reassignment surgery than insurance companies./r/StoriesAboutKevin/God damn it Rolle, he's an old man. Go easy on him.So he's still weird.I like you too.

Let's roller disco."Michael Floyd said this would be his final season"

Self-fulfilling prophecy. 

Ask Steve Smith.Why would you even announce your final season? Do you want a Jeter-esque farewell tour?

Just play and then quit."That boy ain't right"Wow. That's truly a TIFU-level thing forever.

Speaking of acronyms, I have an LPT:

Anytime something is vague, like "miss", that's your cue as the DM to come up with a narrative or description. 

Based upon their roll and my roll and how far off it is, I would tell the player "you connect, but hit right in the armour plate doing no damage" or "as you thrust with your blade, you hit a hole in the mail and are able to draw blood. So and so flinches with pain &lt;rolls&gt; and is stunned. Do you wish to press further or do something else?"

Shit like that. That drive started at 6:47. An amazing use of the clock with no yards. It ended up negative yards.I've always viewed a record as a licence; I bought it, I own it.

All the tapes I had that broke or records that wore out and I bought the same music multiple times?

I got to the point where it was a waste to keep rebuying it.

Unless something significant has changed in the reissue, I'm not buying it.Anything that redlines to be safe on a freeway is small. 

Midsize would be 500cc at a minimum and even I hesitate to say that as even touring scooters have crept larger than that. I'm rewatching the 2nd half.

These penalties are absolutely incredible. 

They're even more unbelievable the next time around.Pernell McPhee sounds like a character from a Dickens or Harry Potter novelI love watching the Chargers because I have no idea who these guys are. No one does. Always a surprise. I'm not even sure McCoy knows their names.If Cutler didn't pause, that was a TD for Langford

EDIT: whatever, TD for Langford running. Same difference.One of the first posts in the GT was a Pats fan saying "trade Woodhead back to us for the playoffs"

If the Pats would offer several warm bodies with a pulse, I'd do it just to be able to field a team.I was thinking the same thing during the LAST injury when I was taking an injury break pissDagger"Sorry MB I know that was to you but I saw something and changed it"

-Cutler"Oh Lord Jesus, Please Screencap This Look For Riversface Amen"Cutler and Rivers, before were enemies, now are allies in their relentless quest to overcome bullshit.Yo San Diego peeps.

Wouldn't it be awesome if the Gruden Grinder was a stripper he found at Dirty Dan's or Cheetah's?There is an interesting "war" going on. You have egotistical narcissists who are attractive, know it, and post endless selfies, rubbing everyone else's noses in their beauty.

Then you have the children of helicopter parents who were told a bunch of hooey about this stuff and have an inflated sense of ego and are narcissists as well.

The problem I see here (amplified by the internet where you can post selfies or radical social engineering theory ad nauseum) is that this conversation gives narcissists way too much power over all of our lives.

See, pretty=power, which is super-great for the egotistical narcissist. Then you end up with people who were told they're perfect no matter what and have a big head, get sick of seeing pretty people lording over them and want to "empower" themselves, curtail free speech/expression etc and suppress all kinds of perceived injustices.

When the real injustice is that both parties are the same and have an unhealthy fixation on beauty. Worst of all is that they make it a public issue. Those of us who are well-adjusted don't give a fuck about either party.&gt; They want you to lie to yourself, like how they lie to themselves.

Just like how their parents have lied to them.

The lie is normal.Egotistical people who are obsessed with their own appearance don't understand self-deprecation, only adding value to themselves no matter what.RTFA

We're talking about aesthetics, things that are objectively quantifiable, such as "that building is crooked and looks off" and "your nose is lumpy and looks off".

Symmetry isn't a matter of opinion, it's a matter of geometry. So you're saying you got banned for being an ineffective and unpersuasive author?Yeah, but it's the ones that don't who end up on Instagram being complete assholes about how they look or on Tumblr trying to eradicate free speech/free oppression by "smashing the patriarchy" and "fuck your beauty standards" shit.

The rest of us are caught in-between the Instagram-Tumblr war.Barnes so hardLOLMATT I bet you cum too early tooShut up, Blake. No one punched you in the face. Not a foul /sI came in after the Bears and it's been pretty steady.Ok, he's been officially glossed Big Hero 6Maybe he could summoning God or lightning boltsCould you imagine Andre and Deandre twin towering it?

40 points, 40 boards, 12 blocks and 9/40 FT shootingHey guys, he was just going for the block.

He had 3 of them tonight you know.Let's not GSW this game away ClipsDUMBEST FUCKING FOUL EVERHair so thickOk that was laughable - you people saying "flop", get pissed at that.It's triggered by smogNo shit, it's not like any Clippers are fucking his wife and raising his kidsDO YOU LOVE FOUL SHOOTING?

ARE YOU NOT ENTERTAINED?You know I think CP3 fouled Barnes, I think he had the armI don't think that's how they wanted to get it inDoc's face says it allWhat a shitshowNBA=Sports Entertainment

IDGAF anymore. I just want to be entertained. Like WWE.Fuck these refs. Amazing. I am ROTFLShe needs to get a popular book to promote, like Linda Bacon.Well obviously reading, evaluating, writing and producing scholarly research wasn't part of her programme. I always thought House did an interesting take on the "neurosurgeons are the shit" thing by making House the True diagnostician and Foreman the neurologist.

The guy who knew the brain the most (Foreman) knew the least about how it worked, while House (the pathologist) knew everything about people. 

I suppose in the hierarchy of things, the neurosurgeon outranks the neurologist, but that really hurts Carson even more. Neurosurgery is an art and a skill, neurology is much more diagnostic in nature; the neurologist sends you to the neurosurgeon or orthopaedic surgeon. 

I liken it to an engineer vs a mechanic. Carson is a very talented brain mechanic, but he doesn't understand the holistic engineering of things. Well with the way MFP have fucked up the usability of the app and broken everything/made it play loud audio at 530, 544 and 602am/forced us to the stupid timeline all the time, it does take a few minutes now.I hope so. Of course they'll think we're bragging or whatever. I would understand if people didn't feel comfortable exposing themselves. The unpleasantness is part of the territory. Just more work for you (that I don't envy). It's like CoD for me. I don't prestige or anything. I just join my kids in playing after I finish the campaign. It's worth owning to play even if you're not going to be totally hardcore about it. I never really liked FPS, but it doesn't mean they aren't worth owning. 

I'm sure there's a "casual path" for XCX where you'll be able to just enjoy the story and visuals without having to take a neurotic level of completness to it. I'll take that over the religious fervor of the XB1. ???

Sesame oil is absolutely what you fry in because:

* It adds flavour

* It has a high tolerance for heat

I mean, OP is using olive oil FFS. Nothing has taste like olive oil!I'm in bizarro world.

First of all...I want to address your problem. Because it's bad one way or the other:

&gt;I put them in a hot pan that has some olive oil in it.

Olive oil 101: you never use it over anything but medium low heat. It's highly sensitive and becomes bitter.

Furthermore, you want to SEAR your gyoza. 

All of the advice you've gotten here is really strange. Gyoza could not be easier to cook.

Get a cast-iron skillet or a thick-bottomed pan that will retain heat.

Get it nice and hot.

Choose sesame (authentic) or peanut oil because of it's high smoke point.

Pour some of your oil into a bowl.

Dip each gyoza's flat side into the oil and then place on the skillet. I don't like to put oil directly on the skillet because I don't want to give it a chance to smoke or move around.

Let the gyoza cook for about a minute or two depending on how cold/frozen they are. They might be stuck. That's fine. Experience with your equipment will tell you when enough is enough.

Get a pan lid and put a few tablespoons of water in it, upside down. 

Put the pan lid with the water over your gyoza.

Let them cook for 4-6 minutes, adding small amounts of water if needed.

Remove with a sharp spatula.

Serve with 50/50 sesame oil/soy sauce for dipping, scallions optional

You never water them first. Ever. The maillard effect has to happen first. You need to crisp it first, then steam it to cook the middle.

Gyoza take 1-2 minutes to crisp and 4-6 to cook throughout. You don't need to turn them.

People also mentioned flour. That's wrong. I will give you the alternative.

When making batches of gyoza, storing them for freezing is key. There's a simple trick, which is flour, or better, corn starch.

You get a pyrex pan and dust it generously with corn starch or flour, then put your gyoza in there making sure they don't touch and stick them in the freezer. Once they've frozen, you will have a little bit of starch on them which makes them extra crispy. Same concept as like...General Tso chicken or Sweet and Sour pork. 

When you remove them from the frozen glass dish and put them into a big freezer bag, they won't stick together. You have to freeze them first. When you take them out, they'll have a nice dusting of starch on them when you cook them, though it's better to put some oil in the pan first.

I need to make a Youtube channel someday...https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fatal_Labyrinth

It's like Rogue, or is a Roguelike game because it's random and different each time you play it.

When it came out it was only $20, which was very cheap for a Genesis game. After I beat it I thought I'd never play it again, so when my friend played it, we noticed it was completely different the next time around and that it was randomly generating the levels and what the different items did.

If you've got an hour or two to kill, it's very fun. It's also kind of turn-based in a way, but not really. It plays a bit like Ys. What scares me is the "what's good for the geese is good for the gander" argument. Largely we've been able to keep far-right conservatives in check, but once these tactics prove useful, they'll be the next to start harassing people nonstop and demanding safe spaces for their religion.Oh fuck you Jeff you dumb piece of shit.

YOU ARE THE GOD DAMNED COACH OF THE RAMS AND THE GM OF THE RAMS.

You named every single thing of importance except the one thing that literally defined the Rams and changed the NFL?

RODNEY FUCKING HARRISON was the guy who gimped Trent Green.

TRENT GREEN, RAMS STARTING QB.

If it wasn't for Harrison wrecking Trent Green, there would have been no Kurt Warner who BEAT YOUR DUMB ASS IN THE SUPERBOWL. Are you butthurt or just ignorant?

Rodney Harrison had to leave the Chargers after that incident because of his rough play. They couldn't have him anymore because he was a marked man by the officials and the league. Only by separating them did he even get a second chance AFTER HE RUINED TRENT GREEN AND CHANGED THE COURSE OF RAMS FOOTBALL FOREVER.

He's such an idiot. Can he play man corner?I'll go out on a limb. 

I'll say he's not on a team. 

I think he'll break camp with a team and then get cut. You can't have too many alpha dogs because they end up fighting each other.

Any situation he'd go to is a lose-lose. If there's a team that needs a QB, no one is gonna stake their reputation on a guy that raw and get themselves fired. If it's one that already has a QB, that QB isn't going to appreciate a guy sitting behind him who really, really, really wants his job.

This guy has been to the SB. Any QB who hasn't been will feel a lot of pressure. Any QB who has isn't going to want anything but a competent backup rather than a raw kid they have to deal with.Controversial crazy pick?

Backing up Russell Wilson with the Seahawks.I don't think there's any way to stop the Vikings at this point. Even with Teddy out, he isn't/wasn't the difference-maker there. It's been the defense playing well and the offense not putting them in bad positions.Raiders would have to have more wins than Pittsburgh as they lose the tiebreaker. PIT is 5-4 with the head-to-head vs the 4-4 Raiders. 

http://www.sportsclubstats.com/NFL/AFC/AFCNorth/Pittsburgh.html

At 10 wins, Pittsburgh is 90% to make it. They'd need to go 5-2 the rest of the way. 

http://www.sportsclubstats.com/NFL/AFC/AFCWest/Oakland.html

Oakland would need to go 6-2 to get to 10 wins and they would lose the Steelers tiebreaker if both teams had 10 unless the Jets or some other AFC team stalled.In the AFC, the Jets are in control. They have a 72.9% chance of making the playoffs:

http://www.sportsclubstats.com/NFL/AFC/AFCEast/NYJets.html

Pittsburgh are next with 45.3%

http://www.sportsclubstats.com/NFL/AFC/AFCNorth/Pittsburgh.html

Every other team is less than 30%, including the Raiders who would lose a head-to-head tiebreaker with Pittsburgh.

In the NFC, it's the loser of the North between GB and MIN while the other team is Atlanta.

http://www.sportsclubstats.com/NFL/NFC/NFCNorth/Minnesota.html

http://www.sportsclubstats.com/NFL/NFC/NFCNorth/GreenBay.html

http://www.sportsclubstats.com/NFL/NFC/NFCSouth/Atlanta.html

Atlanta would need to hit a terrible skid from here on out. Seattle and St Louis aren't realistic. Their playoff chances are below 30% while Atlanta is over 70%. I'm really surprised how many people have overlooked Atlanta just for losing 2 games.Yeah Rivers should be the #1 vote-getter of all players this year. I think this year Manning doesn't get voted in and doesn't get invited/turns down the invite if he gets one.Maybe you can speak to the amount of medication in the water. Here in Quebec, we are incredibly medicated people. Even in small concentrations, medication is detectable in our water.That guy is a moron.

You know what gets me?

People drive by nail salons in every strip mall in the world. They walk past them in every shopping mall.

But do they go?

No! 

Instead, they'll get painful ingrown toenails and then get expensive and complicated surgery to fix them instead of doing proper maintenance. 

Same thing with calluses. It's not even something that's secret nail salon technology.

For $10 you can buy a callus shaver. You soak your hand or foot or whatever in warm water for a few minutes and shave, shave, shave! It's gone!

At a nail salon, for under $50 they will fix your toenails, cuticles and cut off all of your calluses.

Or...you can do what this guy did? And he took way too much, BTW.DISCLAIMER: I DON'T KNOW WHAT I'M TALKING ABOUT

http://www.chevrolet.com/black-friday-sale.html

It's just the Black Friday sale. It has nothing to do with Truecar. Your question was:

&gt;Is this 20% msrp cash back before trucar price?

The answer is "no"

You can do Truecar or you can just go in and get the no-hassle Chevrolet/GM Black Friday sale. Your choice. You have to take captive finance and you must take a 1LTA like this:

http://www.davidmauschevroletfl.com/VehicleDetails/new-2015-Chevrolet-Cruze-Sedan_1LT_%28Automatic%29-Sanford-FL/2572970223

The price is already in effect there. I also disagree with the parallels. 

There were some things from the OT that were correct and ought to have been revisited. Before I read the first book/saw the first film, I had no idea they'd go "midichlorians/Jesus" route. I thought Anakin would already have been a powerful force user, be older and already know the woman who would birth his twins.

I thought it would have been a story where he had to choose between his obsession with her and his obsession with his growing powers and being able to have neither lead to the resentment that put him on the path to the Dark Side. I also thought based upon what Obi Wan said that there was some sort of personal stake he had. Perhaps he was sent to kill the young man, but instead attempted to redeem him which led to the downfall of the Jedi Order because like a virus, he let the Dark Side in. 

I mean, I get where this writer is coming from, but he basically copied Ep IV. 

As a side note, I'm usually pretty good at guessing movie plots/ending during the film. I am often rarely surprised, especially pleasantly surprised. Probably seen too many films and tropes are formulaic. I admit I was absolutely surprised by Ep I. I had no idea.

I think my idea was really predictable and very typical, so there's a sort of "shame" in following the formula, but with good actors and the chance to get people involved, they could have appreciated the personal conflicts that led to the tragedies. See, I didn't care that it was predictable because we were already at a predestined story point with episodes 4-6 being in the can already.

The point was to tell the story we all had anticipated, but tell it in a way that was meaningful. 

I dunno. I gave up on fleshing out after I read the book. It was just too stupid to comprehend.

tl;dr - a predictable story should have been undertaken, but with a keen focus on the tragic conflicts between the characters that led them to both blame and sympathyThis guy is like Ragen's fucking hero. Seriously.

Dr Blair?

http://www.sph.sc.edu/Documents/cv_Blair.pdf

&gt;Honorary Degrees

&gt;Doctor Honoris Causa, Free University of Brussels, 1994

&gt;Doctor of Health Science, Lander University, 1996

&gt;Doctor of Health Science Honoris Causa, University of Bristol, 2002

He's Linda Bacon-esque. 

So he's a "doctor" of exercise science:

http://www.sph.sc.edu/facultystaffpages/profile.asp?id=333

Correct me if I'm wrong, but I thought the "P.E.D." in "Steven Blair, P.E.D." stands for "Physical Education Degree", not "doctorate"...as in it's like "Steven Blair, B.A." or something.

http://www.shapeup.org/about/sac/blair.html

&gt;Dr. Blair is the recipient of three honorary doctoral degrees \u2014 Doctor Honoris Causa degree from the Free University of Brussels, Belgium; Doctor of Health Science degree from Lander University, U.S.; and Doctor of Science Honoris Causa, University of Bristol, UK.

If I have this right, he is in *no way* a medical doctor, he's more of a "PE Teacher" and Coke found this guy to say "hey, we all need to exercise more"...and he went for it because that's what he does.

He apparently has a popular YouTube video where he talks about exercise over diet, but as far as I can tell, he has no expertise or education in diet to begin with. 

Maybe someone can clear this up. Because in my eyes, it looks like Coke gave a bunch of money to a burly P.E. teacher to say that Coke isn't the problem, lack of exercise is and he got (rightly) called out on his shit and the money for his little group got snatched out from underneath him. That this is the usual story of misrepresentation in the eye of the viewer who is either too ignorant to question/has a vested interest in not questioning what they're being told. Also, that someone actually beat down fatlogic, but the damage may already be done.I wished I'd have seen the original.

I'd have gone with "Hey, I saw you're hiring a second person! I'd like to be in on the interview process."I don't know of a single video game item that isn't excluded from that service. I've yet to see one.I guess the "exclusive preorder bonus" window has passed and now everyone will get the 30 songs free from here on out.When we were leaving Vancouver, we considered a lot of different places in Canada and Ottawa was one of them (along with Toronto), but what killed it for us was the auto insurance. We have multiple vehicles and drive a lot and it was ridiculous.

Enough so that we said "well, if we ever did live there, we'd live in Quebec"...the insurance is cheaper, better benefits if you have young kids (we do), better benefits for University-aged kids (we do)...all that jazz.

Which got me thinking.

You can own a business wherever you like. If you want to drive commercially, why not just get a PO Box in Gatineau, register and insure the vehicle commercially there and then be an Uber driver? Our insurance in Quebec is fine. It's quite reasonable. And IMO, commercial insurance/taxes are all part of doing business.

In fact, pulling speculative numbers out of my ass, I would bet that it's cheaper to commercially insure your vehicle in Quebec than to have personal insurance in Ontario. Your insurance is that ridiculous. As a side note, I don't understand how BC and Ontario can have such piss poor insurance administration, yet MB and SK can do socialised insurance well and Quebec can do private insurance hybrid well. And that's saying something because we can't do anything right in Quebec.&gt;If you want someone who knows the difference between self love and egotistical narcissism, I'm not your girl.Nutshell?

I think we're gonna need one of those dumpsters with the lids that flip open/close and are lockable (to keep the fatlogic in with the other garbage)LPT for Tess: Stop building additions on your foundation. It can't handle it.It's not the system that's the problem it's finding m2 memory  cards that's the problemMan she cuts them super thinYou should do your own Secret Eaters. Count his calories.Demand more JRPGs be translated into English and buy them.

Put your money where your mouth is, buy a Vita, PS3 and PS4 and support companies like Atlus and XSEED who are niche marketers bringing Japanese content out of the country.

Problem solved. It exists. Go get it and make sure these companies can make money. My PS3 backlog is a bunch of NiS, Atlus, etc software.I'll take "T-shirts that won't make much sense in 5 years for $200, Alex"

That shirt is is 2015.Skylanders are such crap compared to amiibo. Skylanders are like electronic Happy Meal toys and amiibo are like hand-painted PVC figurines from a collectibe shop. Some wack woman sent my wife messages like that the other day because my wife remarked her fucking ugly duckface wasn't pretty.

These people are out there and they're real.

I should post that shit. I thought it was more /r/cringepics thoughWhat kind of person is dumb enough to sue people for comparing their justice system to ISIS' justice system?

The kind of person who lets blackheads fester on their face?

All that money and he doesn't use a comedone extractor?

I never thought I'd find something in /r/worldnews worthy of x-posting in /r/popping, but that blackhead cluster is just epic.Maybe if GHL used amiibo people would buy it.

That game is garbage. I can't believe they put up kiosks that let you experience it's terribleness before buying.We got 4 of them and then something else for $10 and got $15 in Kohls Cash which of course can't be used on more amiibo =(I'm surprised your agency allows you to post public photos of yourself in uniform.

Canada is a different animal. Peace officers up here under 40 all have cool hair, beards and shit. Tell the old people to go police in the USA if they don't like your beard.They need to contract the franchise, have a dispersal draft, sell a new franchise and start over from scratch.

If the Browns culture were a nation, it would be a failed state.

The Cleveland Browns are Somalia and the NFL is the EU. There's no place for them.Aren't there other women sans the crazy who can do that?That's why I don't subscribe to the Browns subreddit.

They're always losing.It bothers me that "you need more women" to represent women.

Sorry, I can think of plenty of female politicians with views and actions that are anti-woman.

It's sad we no longer judge people on the content of their character or their voting record, but instead on sexism.I can't wait to see everyone's reaction when he doesn't.He doesn't actually respect women, he only pretends to so he can borrow their jeggings.They didn't before so these people aren't aware of the change. They do match themselves. No problem.

The only exception is store A has a red sticker clearance on an item. Store B won't match.Not if he's one of those Promise Keeper paedophiles.Oops?

Really?

I'd like to see some concrete consequences for her.

If I were the mom I would move the fuck away from her and the whole crazy state.I have two of those chargers, except they're Captain America shields. Really great little devices. 

If it were me, I'd let them know the mistake. The goal is to get your Marth. They may or may not want the pad back. Let your conscience make your karma.Self-awareness going into narcissism works about as well as stuffing an Atari cartridge into your iPad.

They just don't play together.Dear Aunt,

You're too self-absorbed to even understand what's going on here.

I guess what I'm really trying to say is that you're a fucking imbecile, we're all laughing at you and you have no power here.

Our gang is way more powerful than the few token people you can make feel shitty. Basically you're powerless and I suggest fucking right off so you don't get your little fee-fees hurt.&gt;Please seek professional help, life is to short to waste acting and behaving like how you are... 

Hey stalker. I also mean no offence when I say you will never change and you will feel this way forever.

People like you never change. Just know that. Know that we take great pleasure in the knowledge that your feelings of outrage, insult and things out of your control will possess you until you've alienated everyone and die lonely and spiteful while your victims will heal, move on, live and be genuinely loved.
You want the old "Dear fuckface" card, eh?

We can take a group photo of everyone flipping off their Facebook profile.Selling Cadillac isn't exciting. That it's coupled with Buick makes it even worse. Literally any marque would have been more exciting. Even Lincoln.West Kurdistan?I bet he wishes he could just disappear right now.

If only he had a way of doing that...Someone should put a PQ sticker on his truck.OP could have made the Seizure SaladHe's a dumbass. I can't believe he didn't see a doctor. Now he's gonna have loose skin...for when it returns?

The gum chewing told you all you needed to know.Chew gumFirst thing you should have checked are IP conflicts. I think another device on a power saving mode is taking your address.

Go into the router and lock every device out except your MAC. I bet you when you're the sole connection, it stays persistent.

There's a lot of credible advice here but it's poor troubleshooting. First thing you should be checking is IP leases. Apparently I'm "boring" and "normal" this year.

I've failed.&gt; That dude's ranking privileges need to be revoked.

Yissss....I've finally added Titans fan to the call for my removal!

The thing is, the Titans do have some aspects of football that I sort of like. I like DBs alright. I like the way Delanie Walker has been playing. Mariota seems like he's going to be an NFL QB. Casey is, IMO, the best interior lineman in the NFL...playing out of position?

I watch your games. Aside from the few blowouts, you guys were a bounce here or there from winning. The Titans are a tough team to play.

The other teams I had below you are just...free falling. The only team I had below you that was remotely competitive this week were the Browns and we don't need to say anything there do we? You guys were close. I really thought you had that. It was a competitive game, guys were trying and playing hard.

In order, I have below you: STL, MIA, SF, PHI, CLE, NO and DAL.

All of those teams are disastrous in their own way. I couldn't even decide who to make 32. Think of them as all being tied for 32nd and you're 31st. Better?&gt; Your team has gone from 32nd in week 7 to 13th in week 12 with a chance at the playoffs.

The system works!

They go on a streak, it's reflected.&gt; Tannehill is not the problem!

It's the defensive front. When I watch the Dolphins play, I think you guys should just play dime the entire time because it would give you the same amount of pressure while at least putting 8 guys out there to do something.The Falcons were tough, you're right. It's tough to reconcile "they are still eligible for the playoffs" against "they are just playing miserable football recently"

I wished I could have upvoted your comment on /u/MoreSpikesDang, you guys keep saying this and now I feel bad for having you back to back with the Giants above you.

Be honest for a moment: how much of that terribleness by the Giants was attributable to the Redskins? They looked like they didn't come to work the entire week before the game. 

It's scary how they can turn it on at any time, though.If he wasn't concussed and then removed himself, we were moving the ball at-will until then.When he got hit, there was 7:19 left to go and he was unstoppable until that point.

It was 32-27 at the time and he was moving the ball.

After the hit, he was just dumping the ball off; very tentative and then was missing those short throws. After that he knew he was done. If he wasn't concussed, I don't think we kick a short FG, I think we go ahead to score and go up 35-32.

I figure you guys respond, take the lead again and we finish with the ball and win on a 2pt conversion.

If he was healthy. 
Not that graduation rates in Quebec are perfect (they're not), the CEGEP system is the way to go.

If it were up to me, kids would finish school at 16 and then go to vocational or college-prep schools for 2+ years.

I don't think you need to fail kids, just get them where they need to be.

A lot of kids fail school because they have tough home lives - bad parents, supporting family through work, etc. Giving them a chance to get skills is better for them than making them well-rounded for a world they will likely not see without some autonomy of their own.

If you're not on a college track, school for a lot of kids is just a way to keep them occupied until they're 18. They deserve things they can really use. The fact they fail tells you all you need to know. It's not relevant to them. College track kids don't fail their AP courses because those are relative to their goals and a means to an end.I don't know if she's a genius, talking out of her ass or both.

On one hand I think the record is brilliant, on the other hand I find some of the stuff silly. The video for Flesh is just pure cringe, which makes me think the rest of the record is just low rent. Then again it seems very real and she just goes for it. She gets away with/pulls off a lot of shit that is ridiculous in other contexts, like the Flesh video. It almost worked. The songs do work.

I keep going back to Every Open Eye by CHVRCHES and thinking how they raised the bar for everyone else. If Art Angels had come out before Every Open Eye and St Vincent's eponymous record, it would have been the standard.

I do get why she went back and reworked the record. After seeing what some of her contemporaries have done recently, she needed to graft some 2016 onto her 2012 sound. Things move quickly. She made a lot of right choices, but ultimately it wasn't enough of a step for her.
What a dick. I took my daughter to get hers. Not my body, not my choice. 

You should ask him for the money to remove it and then spend it on family counselling. =DDon't show him this thread. With all of the blas\u00e9 responses you'll kill the mystique.

Actually, maybe *do* show him...Well it's like /r/eagles - you wouldn't be wrong to post pictures of a bird there...Russia are like a movie where you root for the bad guy.

Truly they are the great anti-hero nation.They aren't going to give up the only thing keeping them alive: the outrage of ignoramuses who voteWhile my favourite player was Barry Sanders, he wasn't even remotely close a complete RB.

That would be LT.

I seriously doubt we'll ever see another RB like that because the ones with his natural talent generally never take the time to master the little things/unsexy things.

It's like scoring in the NBA. No one wants to play defense. 

RBs are the same way. They don't want to grind and take punishment. That means they don't want to pass pro and they don't want to fight for hard yardage inside.

I remember in LT's first season he was already working hard to pick up pass pro skills and killed himself/ran out of gas from all of the physical play he had (with no camp). 

Jim Brown? No. The only player close to LT was Emmitt Smith and LT was a better version of Smith because he was the better all-around back. He's right.

They need to throw out the rulebook and start over.

One thing they need is a "strike zone" for players which is from one area of the body to another and make it way easier to adjudicate and for the fans to follow/understand.

I think that anything below the hips should be a penalty if it's touched with anything but hands and arms. That way you can still slap a foot, wrap up a tackle, etc. But you can't take out knees, upend guys or whatever. 

If you're wrapped, you can then touch them with your body.

Also, tacklers leaving their feet should be illegal.

Anyway, stuff like chop/cut blocks would automatically be illegal with this rule.

Football is like British lawmaking. It's just full of rule creep. It needs a simple constitution. It's such a no-brainer, I don't know why Brady is just bringing this up now.&gt; How the fuck would you tackle

That's literally what you would do. Form tackling, ie tackling form is not what happens. You need to wrap up on guys.

If lowering helmets were made illegal (for offense and defense) and helmet contact were a penalty, players would have to be more upright and you would see defenders be able to wrap guys up like a sleeve and as the roll up (down) on the tackle, their arms would end up wrapped around the legs.You. 

I always like you.It sounds like he expected people to work the shit out they could and guide them when they didn't know.

These guys know how to resolve conflicts, but if they're too stupid to differentiate between the blue and black bin, they need help.

Personally I see that sort of attention to detail as a test: if you don't take pride in the little things, you're a failure. I'd want to know that about my players and I would absolutely make them do detail-oriented things to know who my hard workers are.This reflects on the Bears, not Trestman because his players in Montreal loved him. Then again, they were mature adults who wanted to be coached and taught.

Think of it like hockey or Kobe Bryant: you need chemistry. If Kobe's gonna hog the ball, no one is gonna want to play with him. If you have a left winger who only wants to score and won't go back on defense or get in the corners along the boards, you can't put him on your PK line.

Kobe is fine if you have a Mark Jackson type of PG next to him that loves to feed the ball. If you put him next to a scorer like Westbrook? Pure misery.

You can have that scoring LW, but if you also have a scoring RW and a passing C, you have an issue where you aren't getting defense and two guys who are demanding the C give them the puck.

The Bears have had a terrible roster and still do. It's amazing they're doing well under Fox. It's a very incomplete team and it wouldn't surprise me if they had the lowest aggregate Wonderlic score in the NFL. 

You take a coach like Belichick who goes out and tries to get guys who are smart. The Cardinals try to get high motor guys. The Steelers favour speed.

What do the Bears want? Apparently anything with a pulse. If they were a guy, they'd be hard-up. 

You can have a fiery guy here and there, but if you have a ton of them, they have to go to recess rules on the playground and work it out. When they're in Mr Trestman's class, they need to work.

I like Briggs, but he's sort of proving my point. Briggs got a 15 on the Wonderlic.Right here I think Stan plays himself right out of the move.

"They would be a tenant"

What a fool. He overplayed his hand.

An inequitable deal means you have the same problem in the future with a team not making enough money. The inequality between the teams means one will always be inferior and they will be hat in hand at another city/NFL asking for a new stadium, city, etc.

This is the worst idea ever.

If he's not willing to offer full partnership to the other team there, he's creating the very problem the NFL is trying to avoid. They don't want to halfass it into LA.

The Chargers and Raiders will be partners (eww). That'll work.Then he should make the entire development a business, put half of it in escrow and allow the Chargers to pay it off as full, equal partners.When the artists sell soundboard quality AV recordings to concertgoers, this will go away.Damn. I want to play Drakkhen now.Gurley was probably averaging 3.13 YPC before that, save for the huge Barry Sanders play he'd make to raise it up.

http://www.ducksters.com/kidsmath/mean_median_mode_range.phpWell your solution wasn't to hit them, but to deal.

Sucks, but True.

I went to military boarding school. We had a boxing ring to settle disputes and there was fighting all the time. My friend got hazed to death.

All I saw was escalation.

I'm not gonna CYV. I'm just gonna say you're dead wrong. Literally.

Seen it, been there, done that, terrible idea. Wow, one of the 76% who still own him.&gt;redditor for 4 years

Checks outI never understood that. Before Yahoo, PIMs were like PFs in basketball or strikeouts for batters. Rewarding people for PIMs is crazy. It's like turnovers or goals allowed being a good thing.I drove from Lancaster to Bakersfield with two different cell phone providers/phones and had no coverage a lot of the way. This was in...2013. 

Tehachapi is like...truly nowhere.

However, I really love Lancaster. It's beautiful and you're close to LA if you need to be. I know Lancaster is just outside of Kern county, but the point I'm making is that southern Kern county is nestled at the foothills of Los Padres and you're right there by Lancaster if you need civilisation. 

Not that I'd ever live in California again, but I'd at least put So Kern Co on my list if I were forced to for some unknown reason.I've never been bored to the point of feeling ill.

I am so fucking sick of Tom Brady.

He's not boring. He's unsettling.Dude. Roger. Seriously. 

All of the rule additions, exceptions and clarifications you've made are terrible. Now fans have unrealistic expectations of catches.

When I was a kid, as long as it looked alright and there was a foot in bounds...dude, it was a catch.

I'm from a different era. I've seen these rules and clarifications happen over time. For the most part it was gentlemanly: if the guy came down with the ball, it was a catch.

Roger, remember when a guy could go up, get a ball and be pushed out of the end zone WITHOUT EVER TOUCHING DOWN IN BOUNDS and it was ruled a TD? We weren't unhappy with that. People weren't saying it ruined the integrity of the game.

YOU changed that rule. You idiots did it. The catch is so convoluted now that if you repeal all of your crap you've done to it, I'm not sure fans are going to be alright with it.

My solution is easy, and I didn't even come up with it because it's basically to just codify what it was when I was a kid:

If the person comes down with the ball and has 1 foot in bounds, it's a catch. The ball can move around, it can shift, it can be double clutched, I don't care. When the person is essentially down, if they're holding the ball, it's a catch. Even if it touches the ground during possession.

The only time it's not a catch is if it hits the ground first.

One foot down is ok. No football move needed. Ball can be shifting or juggling. In the end zone, as long as they were in-bounds when they went up it's a catch. Same with the sideline.

The best solution is to simplify. Throw out your entire NFL rulebook, simplify the rules and start over by writing down a simple rulebook that a young fan can understand and only takes a few pages.

EDIT: I hate to be "that guy", but football was way better when I was a kid. And we didn't have these rules. We all loved football. My kids don't. They don't get it. "That's stupid" is what they tell me when I try to explain things to them. They're right. But go the way of baseball. Lose the young people. Be my guest.~~Hoof~~ *Foot* ~~and~~ *in* mouth disease.You pick the one with the best ownership, of course.

Shit...I don't think you were wrong unless you predicted they would be the healthiest team in the NFL.

They probably would have competed for it if healthy.Yeah, but you got buried in downvotes if you said 4-12.

Ask me how I know.I really thought Seattle would take the next step with Grahamkowski there, but he turned into GrahamBowe.

That was unexpected. A versatile TE was exactly what Wilson needed. He moves the pocket and makes throws well after the play has broken down and Graham is impossible to cover, knows how to get open on busted plays and is a hell of a hot read.

They way they used Graham up until now was just stupid. He's a decoy to stretch the field? Really?

And another thing: Seattle's defense as well. The coaching has been bad since they didn't run it with Marshawn last year in the SB. 

Everything bad about Seattle has a rational explanation. On paper they are much better than they've played.&gt; I thought the lions would be around 10-6.

You forgot about Jim Caldwell?You know you suck when you're more evil than Dean Spanos or Mark Davis.&gt; My Nmom has a history of using the police to try to get to me. When I was a young adult she'd send them to "check on me" while away at college, etc.

Ah, memories.

It should be illegal to use the police for narcissistic purposes.&gt; Unfortunately, we have moved beyond the point where I care to fix things with my husband

Hmm.

Am I correct in inferring that it sounds like he's willing to fix things? 

&gt;I want to minimize the effects of this on him

Can you salvage the relationship?

&gt;but I see the importance of therapy in helping to manage my own behavior as it relates to my husband

If you're willing to try counselling, what happened to marriage counselling?

Just saying...easier to salvage what you still have, assuming the other party is willing to play ball. You haven't said what he did or why you can't forgive him. Some things are forgivable with time, distance and behavioural modification.

Good luck.This seems like the most convoluted piece of shit ever.

I hope this isn't where comic book movies jump the shark. F4nt4st!c 4 doesn't count because no one gave a fuck about that.

I seriously hope there's an actual script that makes sense here.On principle I am about 60% opposed to the current H1-B visa program with notable exceptions, but I'm willing to support it 100% if these are the kind of domestic candidates we've got.

You wouldn't have to put up with this shit in India or the Philippines and it would be making a real impact in the lives of underserved women to give one of them the job this SJW wants.Notable/interesting posts from the thread:

http://imgur.com/a/eZf3t

BONUS: [I'm protesting my doctor!](http://imgur.com/a/44JVC)Ugh.

I only came here for confirmation.

As I was watching it live, I heard someone on the TV remark "and something etc fortunate SWAT had a training exercise nearby"

My first thought was "great, the conspiracy nutters will say it's a False flag" and my second was "ok and where the fuck are they now because this is a disorganised mess?"

Which of course could go either way. They were purposely letting shit go down or the police are too incompetent to trust.

These people have ruined...everything.

And when the news showed the guy dead on the ground, my first thought was "and that's the one they'll blame for having a blood pack and being a crisis actor."

I can't even watch the news normally anymore.Needs a crescent moon, hammer/sickle and a pentagram, tooNice sharpie tribalYup. One of them shits on the regular, the other doesn't.I thought the cause was caloric over-intake.Han Solo dies.

He's too old to keep coming back.My guess is that they kill off Han and then have to turn to Luke.

Han will be the sacrificial impetus for the Luke quest and we'll see him revealed at the end, ambiguously. Good? Evil? The heroes won't know and that'll be the cliffhanger ending.

I'm guessing one character is straddling the line between good and evil and Han makes a sacrifice that shows them the way, hence the need for Luke.

I'm not expecting anything original here.I assume the unmasking of Batman was set up by Lex to confirm the answer for Superman, not Lex.I don't trust people, I trust facts.

"Don't blame the messenger" applies in the sense that you shouldn't credit the messenger, either.

It's also why I'm opposed to people having flair next to their names here because it says "I'm credible" instead of "these facts are credible."

I haven't looked at anything Berry has said in years and on the occasion I catch him on Mike &amp; Mike or something I wonder why he's working for ESPN and I'm not. If the only requirement is talking out of your ass and being wrong, I can do that with my eyes closed.

The problem with Berry is that he doesn't report any news or information you can't find elsewhere and his analysis isn't insightful. It's nonsensical. I'm 60% West, 40% Ware even without reading what you said just by watching them play.

There's not a lot of plays to look at, but there's enough to get a good idea who's a feature back by how they play the game and I think that person ended up being West simply by his style and what he's showed.

However, if you went by the tangibles, Tevin Coleman should be a feature back and one of the top backs in the NFL and Devonta Freeman should be more of a situational back like a Sproles. 

The thing about Ware is that he's got the ideal, prototypical RB body, but the speed of a lighter back. He's a special player. West is slight, not as strong as Ware and doesn't seem to be as "gamebreakingly explosive", either.

But he's more advanced in more facets of the game (like pre-snap reads) and experience counts for Reid.

Another thing is that Reid sort of embraced the smaller body type of Jamaal Charles. I think he likes what a lighter back can give him, or is at least enamored of it right now. West is more similar.

Anyway, going back to the 60-40, I figure that West will get a majority of the snaps and Ware will see usage later in the game and possibly on 3rd downs and goal-line series.

If I were gameplanning, I would use a lot of West and then bring in the bigger-bodied Ware to close the game out if I'm ahead and don't need to protect against the blitz.

I predict that West will get 75-80% of the snaps until the 4th, the Chiefs will be ahead with about 7-8 minutes left and they'll bring Ware in for a series and he'll have a back-breaking big TD to close it out against a worn down defense. 

If you think the Chiefs are going to win, you can start them both. If you think it's be close or a loss, I'd just go with West.If you own Ware and West you obviously keep them both.

But if you only own one, get Ware if you can or keep him if you have him.

I just don't want anyone to forget that West has a tweaked hamstring which is really iffy. These things only heal with time, not usage. Lack of usage heals them. One wrong plant, one bad hit, one bad stretch and it's Ware again.

Just think about Arian Foster in the past and how his hamstrings hamstrung his owners. Though the conundrum being that ASD and empathy generally don't intersect; some high function "Aspies" seem to get it, but...I don't need to tell you your business.With narcissists you have two choices: avoid conflict or overpower them.

You don't seem to be interested in the latter, so start the divorce process from the situation and live in the now. Narcissists keep power over people like you by not paying you money and forcing you to relive past traumas. You won't get paid. I guarantee it. This woman wants power over you. Keeping your money does that.

If it were me? I'd sue her ass in small claims court. Narcissists believe they are the most powerful being in the universe, but open court is like a landmine field there. Judges don't fall for their shit because they are the ultimate power and don't like competition.

I'd put her in her place and let her know you're toxic to her narcissism so she knows not to fuck with you ever again. Narcissists are lazy cowards.I was shopping retail and I swear the store was fucking trolling us by playing every version of Frosty The Snowman ever made consecutively.

After the 4th one I said to my wife "You have to be fucking kidding me" and she goes "what" and I say "this is the 4th time they've played this song" and she says "I don't hear them anymore."

Lucky.http://www.bbc.com/future/story/20120719-awoken-from-a-2d-worldKeep changing the subject?

Gaslighting works.

"Well, people should call the cops."

No, you dickface. You said they should fight. I'd pay real money to have a moderated debate with clear ground rules and a team of fact-checkers allowed for each side.

If she's right, the chance to humiliate us in a live debate would silence her critics once and for all.Diggs? More like Grabbs, amirite?I just detest sideways runs on short yardage 3rd downs.Wow, I can't believe he ran the punt back for a TDIf I have the subreddit theme on, I can only downvote the Game Thread. If I turn it off, I can upvote it.

Anyone else having that issue?Thursday Night Battle Of The Backup RBsMegatron is starting to look quick and able to make cuts.

He must be healthy.The terminology change wasn't huge.

Things like "slant" became "slant bob" or "dive" became "dive bob"

NBDNFL Football on CBS - Rated RI hope the Lions make the playoffs so that Jim Bob Cooter can meet Cleatus the football robot.NO KID, DON'T TAKE THE BASKETBALL FROM THE LIONSVictoria's Secret should have an ad saying not to give sexy lingerie to women you aren't involved with.

I don't wanna see any extra drama.

Thanks, Fruit of the Loom for watching out for us.I like Ansah with the shoulder chop there.Someone replaced our regular Packers with Folgers crystals, but I *can* tell the difference.

I want my old Packers back.Hoodie-lessThe thing about Janis is that he should have the first and last play of every game.Dude, $240 is not a good deal for a brake service.Man, I'm really enjoying this premium duel of Starks vs Abdullah.

Screw Aaron Rodgers, Calvin Johnson, Eddie Lacy, etc.

I want to see the *real* stars!Now here's the real test: 3rd and short

Do you run sideways?Oh man the Packers had no idea and the Lions knew itOn the closeup, Stafford was calling for the ball so hard he could have gotten a False start penalty on himselfWhat is Lacy even doing? Holy shit, move with enthusiasm. Make yourself difficult to cover!Any special features enabled on Wii U?

EDIT:

https://www.reddit.com/r/wiiu/comments/3vd0qa/legend_of_kay_is_on_sale_for_20_at_amazoncom/I think back to the "Rodgers is one of the QBs who throws the least to his TEs" statistic.

If Richard is the guy saving your bacon, you know you're getting flexible.If Levy were here, there'd be no Richard receptions there.

Then the Packers would really be boned.Oh FFS Mason come onCALDWELL WITH EMOTION

END TIMES CONFIRMEDYou know times are desperate when you're speaking wistfully about Bryan Bulagahttp://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16822178627

It's in-stock at Newegg right now.Two things I would note about these:

* The health of your society is reflected by predatory lending; if people had sufficient income, high interest lending becomes irrelevant

* These companies are filling a need. If not them, then organised crime/loan sharks. Making them illegal will only drive people to obtain money illegally. Payday lenders should be obsolete.Defend civil rights and civil liberties.

Take the "these people" out of the equation.

Everyone should have freedom of speech and expression and no one's rights should trump another person's right because of some nebulous group identity.GB - all they do is recover loose balls

heh...when you beat the defender so bad that you push him back into your path to the QBThen the coaches' decision is stupid.

He needs snaps to get a rhythm.Serious tackleWow that was VERY fortunate not to be PIoh shit can't end on a defensive penaltyRodgers MVPYou knew as soon as he was on the 5 that he was gonna get position. Everyone except the Lions saw that coming.Yes it was. You can't do that. The rule doesn't leave room for accidental intent.No, the refs won't allow that shit to happen anymore after what happened then. They call it - period. They're looking for it and they got it right.I can tell you - as of right now, Seagate external drives have a connector from SATA to USB3, WD do not.

If you see a picture of the current cases, it's got the actual drive inside. They've yet to change cases and/or re-engineer it.

I own a few Seagate Expansion/Backup drives as well as the WD ones and I've torn them all down. You can also look at Youtube teardowns if you don't believe me.Correct. It's $80 at B&amp;H right now, but not everyone wants to tear down the drive.

I had an Expansion that I bought and repurposed fail on me and...the case didn't snap back together. It's got these brackets like this 

[

If they break, you're boned. They're real easy to break because the tension from where it snaps in is 50/50 to snap the bracket or release the tab. What'll happen is that you'll break the first 1-2 and the rest will unhook.

I've got an Expansion sitting next to me right now that I got for $39 at Staples and I guarantee you that even with practice, I'm gonna break this one as well.

EDIT: I probably should have mentioned the external ones, although I thought the reasoning was somewhat obvious.It wouldn't piss me off at all if they came out with a better console.

I was happy to move up to each console they've released, starting with going from ColecoVision to NES. 

If they have a new console that has novel, unique features I can't get on a PC or elsewhere, let's have at it. 

If Wii U is a failure, let's support Nintendo in it's next success. The company will fail if all they've got is Wii U. They need a bigger share of the market.You're making a mistake.

Read the article.

Nintendo is just putting different breadcrumbs out there, inviting us to connect all of the dots.

Your AC amiibo *will* be useful for something and I bet you that the more they've been used, the more consoles they've been on/places travelled etc, the more swag you're gonna get.

They haven't even begun to network everything together. 

The only "outrage" for AC is that it probably should have been a cheaper game. I mean...I bought it. I'm allowed to complain, but only so much. I did pay Nintendo MSRP for it...&gt; That said the main reason it won't be is they're almost certainly going to switch to x86 architecture leaving out the possibility of backwards compatibility with PowerPC architecture titles.

I disagree.

Back in the day, I had a cartridge I could plug into my Amiga and Atari ST (not the same cartridge mind you) that allowed me to use Mac software on either platform.

My Amiga 2000 had the PC Bridgeboard(s) that allowed me to run an x86 Intel PC on the same hardware as my Amiga.

Coleco sold an adapter for Atari and Intellivision.

Sega Genesis had an 8-bit SMS adapter.

What else am I forgetting?

Sony put PS1/PS2 chips in the PS3 to run those games natively.

It would be completely trivial to add in a PPC CPU and bridge it into the existing GPU and have the main CPU do emulation for whatever is different. 

I don't think Nintendo wants to give up all of that backward compatibility. They sell a lot of older software on the eShop that would have to be rewritten for emulation like MS is having to do with 360-&gt;XB1 right now. And that's a huge pain. Sony can't do it at all. The MS architecture is similar, Sony's is too different.Could you imagine them buying that from Valve?

Oh man people would be pissed.Asking developers to make a game for a completely different architecture...with Ghosts, I can't remember who did what, but IW did one version and Wii U was done by Treyarch. Or the other way around.

What's important is that the three main platforms for Ghosts were PC with x86, PS3 which they were getting good at and then 360 which was sort of like x86. Then with PS4 and XB1 being similar to PC, it was fairly simple tweak a main version to work on each. PS3 was the odd man out, along with Wii U.

Now that it's just PC/XB1/PS4, they're basically making the best PC game they can and development costs are low.

That's why NX should be x86 compatible, so it'll be easy. No one hates Wii U or Nintendo, they just can't make a game for it that won't sell. The XB1 isn't really emulating the 360.

Do you know WINE?

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wine_(software)

Wine Is Not (an) Emulator.

What it does is run Windows software encapsulated on layers.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Architecture_of_Windows_NT#Hardware_abstraction_layer

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hardware_virtualization

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hypervisor

Back in the day, the Dreamcast Collection came out for 360, and it was a particularly easy port because the DC ran a modified version of Windows CE. As did the 360.

http://kotaku.com/5751536/microsofts-first-console-adventure-was-a-lesson-in-failure

Windows CE and Windows NT/XB1 are closely related.

The XBOX 360 is a PPC-based system (like Nintendo) whose OS was based on the original XBOX, which was based upon Windows NT and the Intel PIII. 

Considering they *changed* architecture, but the OS remained the same, it's a testament to MS being able to write for an OS rather than hardware; hardware is meaningless and so it emulation.

tl;dr - it's not an emulator, although it might be emulating some functions, such as XBL.Read my reply above:

https://www.reddit.com/r/wiiu/comments/3vb763/nintendo_president_our_job_at_this_point_is_to/cxmo8g9Because it would be cheaper to put a Wii U SOC in the new hardware than it would to *emulate* it.&gt; The Wii U literally has a Wii built into it so that it can play Wii games, and the Wii had a Gamecube built into it to play Gamecube games. 

The Wii U literally is a Wii and Gamecube. It's not built *into* it, it's built *on top* of it.God thank you. 

I'm so sick of people throwing the word "emulation" around incorrectly.Well I feel like a dick, disagreeing with everyone here, but here I go again...

Sega's mistake was Saturn. The system was the PS3 befor the PS3. Poorly documented, impossible to develop for and just an overall confusing platform for anyone who wanted to make games for it.

What Sega did wrong was not include a DVD drive in the Dreamcast. And you're not saying that.

Everyone bought a PS2 because it was the cheapest DVD player you could buy. Plus it played games.

Developers were already gun shy when it came to the DC because they wasted a lot on Saturn and got burned. As a side note, this is also why it's total fucking bullshit that games can't be made for Wii U. It's the same platform since the GameCube. They just released FIFA for Wii, but not Wii U. "Developing markets" or whatever. They could have easily tweaked that game for Wii U.

I digress. Back on point.

Sega got it right with DC. They fixed all of the complaints. They made their OS with Microsoft's help and bought into the Windows CE logic. All of the reasoning was that you would be programming for an OS and libraries instead of hardware meant that it would be an easy and well-documented experience.

I mean, MS took what they knew and built the XBOX on that. It's what they always intended and they gained a lot of knowledge from Sega at the time.

Furthermore, the DC used the SH-4 chip, which...going back to other comments in this thread was an evolution of the 32X and the SH-2 chip. Thus, they were porting Windows CE to their own Sega OS on a chip they were very familiar with. 

They did it *right*. The DC should have been the console to end all consoles. Instead, they forgot the DVD drive.Groo

Just 10 minute animated episodes of Groo.

Maybe get The Oatmeal to write and animate it.All 3 of you are right. It's fine.I think you have it backwards.

It's situations like this where you're robbing third world countries and keeping them in perpetual mediocrity.

Very few of these migrants will return to their homeland with their skills (existing or acquired) and the 1st world will have to send doctors there to vaccinate children or exploit the fuck out of their energy/mining sector since they have no skilled people of their own.

These migrants will gain skills and make a better *Germany*, which will only increase the gap between where they are and where they're from.

Immigration hasn't destroyed the USA. It's allowed people to give menial fruit-picking jobs to others who are more desperate while they pursue loftier goals. If you buy an Si you're gonna be paying close to what the seller paid. I mean, it's hyperbole, but not.

Then you're gonna be pissed when you see the 2016 come out in March and how much better it is for a few grand more.

If you really want a last-gen Si, try to find a deal on new. Especially if you're in Canada. They have rebates and 0.9% financing.

Otherwise I'd say the ST. You can get a good deal on one of those.That's the worst example I've seen of someone trying to cowardly break up.

Get yourself tested. We used to cut them up and show them as loops at ravesNot if they're gonna swap plates ^^Other pretentious things: foreplay after a romantic evening

Man, why can't we just fast forward porn to the money shot?No no no, read the last chapter first and get to the money shot.

My time and attention span are short. I'm part of the instant gratification generation!Seeing a trailer for a horror flick right before Age of Adeline doesn't really set the right mood.I heard he's finally gonna have sex with SheldonIf you live in Hollywood you see these people all the time.
Remember when The End would have been the place for that?He never asked for our pity

He never asked us for anything but enablingZod sounds more reasonable than his parents.

Zod just wanted to save Krypton."What are the terms and conditions?"Whenever someone says "gesticulations", Hitler comes to mind.

He looked silly to me.Sometimes it's just a carbon burn. It builds up and burns it off.They said as muchTrump-tacularSelf-diagnosed autism pissing contest.

The more time goes on, the more I think self-diagnosed autism is a way for psychopathic narcissists to pre-emptively label themselves something to give them an excuse/sympathy.Maybe they're hostile towards her because she became obnoxious when she transitioned and she's blaming the reaction to her on the trans thing.

No that post wasn't even close to Jessica levels.You're being generous. Don't forget the people who hate allies.Che had the hippocratic oathCalling it now: the owner is a diver and removed all traces of identification.Walk out?

Get a refund or a readmission ticket. Not because it was bad.

Sometimes work would call, kids get sick etc.

When I saw Crash (Cronenberg), people walked out of every single showing. I saw it multiple times. Holy fuck people hated that movie. Proved to me that we will never conquer addiction because people refuse to face it.Not justice.

She got her cheapshot and was leaving.

By hitting her he made her come back. Revenge isn't always justice. Taking the video to the cops and fucking her life up is justice. Now you have two separate cases of assault because he wasn't defending himself.

Giving up your golden ticket to get someone implicated with our fucked up justice system is stupid. Instead he exposed himself to it as well.Read every article before that.

You can't touch the helmet with an open hand. It's a strike or a head slap and still 15 yards.

You're 5 articles deep in the section. Read the ones before it.

I don't know how we suddenly forgot that you can't strike a QB in the head. It qualifies for the inside collar 15 yard penalty, the head slap penalty and the palm strike.

You can pick your 15 yarder. Special Victims Terroristy u h8 mr skeltalI have to laugh that he's hated for that.He even got Arsenio Hall to be in his video. Arsenio needs the work.I used to work in Aliso Viejo and we had a lot of corporate contracts around Irvine. If you love commercial office space, you'll love Irvine. Beautiful industrial parks.The problem isn't religion, it's dogma.

As people leave religion, they just adopt other radicalised viewpoints such as you see on college campuses and Tumblr.

It's tribalism that loathes civil rights and civil liberties. At some point we need to accept that dogmatic viewpoints fundamentally violate freedom. You can't use your freedom to take mine away. 

You can shit on religion all you like, but it's a symptom of a larger problem with dogma.I cared for my dad until he died and the interesting/obligating thing was that there were moments of lucidity where he knew I had been there.

He explained it to me that he was still there on some level. I likened it to those people who are in a coma, but are awake. 

You never know if they're there on some level or not. I just tried to put it on TV shows he liked, stuff like that. If you ask me, dementia is sort of like a barrier or filter between what's working and what's not. That was at least my experience. 

I think it's also what makes your dad extra shitty because there might be a part of her that can't express herself that does get what he's doing. For you, I don't think it really matters if she remembers you or not, because on some level she does.&gt; Apparently it is really their policy.

Just like the police can shoot an innocent person and claim it's their policy to shoot if they feel endangered.

Policies aren't always the law.

If you pay someone for something and don't get it, that's fraud. It's theft. Their policy is illegal. 

You should *do* something about it rather than complain to us. You were wronged. Stand up for yourself. Don't let them get away with illegal policies because of their fee fees.Which games

EDIT: I cannot make it workDude, Lacy has been killing his owners all year. You act like it's a one-time thing.

I did FIFTY leagues this year, dude. I am running the long experiment. I promise you that "my leagues with Lacy aren't getting the opposing donut", but that they are all on the cusp of the playoffs because of his inconsistency. Hmm.

Ok.

"You'll be greatly missed. Your loss and the impact made from it will have palpable consequences, such as the community benefitting from your unique talents and dedication."

Rule 3 enough?You know the battle flag of Imperial Japan?Because no one likes paper jams.

Mario and Luigi PC Load Letter is even more unpopularThen the top comment of the next unpopular opinion thread should be "NFL NETWORK SUCKS"And snow and dark winters.

Meanwhile, California has year-round sunshine.SHOTS FIRED pew pew

Are you saying my PS3 digital versions of these games won't give me PS4 cross-buy?!?

Fucking bullshit if that's the case. I'm already pissed at the lack of external storage. How nice of them to save me from myself by not allowing me to use content I already bought.

This just makes the argument for games on disc even stronger.&gt;This is another shitty move by Sony.

Microsoft allows me to plug in an external drive.

Except for Bloodborne and whatever PS4 exclusives, I bought every game on XB1 this Christmas and it pisses me off because that stupid inferior XBOX was never meant to be my main, but a Halo player/TV.

I already own multiple copies of GTA physically and digitally. I'm not fucking buying it again unless it's $1 or something trivial.

Sony are pissing me off these days."Skrillex..."It was cool ranchthankGreat composer like BeethovenWait until you're 40 and realise that statistically your life is halfway over.

40 sucked.Before clicking:

"Doesn't matter if he's a Democrat"

Tell me when Republicans do it. Democrats in the NRA aren't the problem.They say you're attracted to yourself, so she found a guy with the facial hair equivalency of her eyebrow aspirations.What about the other people who make the trip, spend the money and treat themselves?

The hypocrisy in your "reasoning" is stunning.

It's one thing to be told you're wrong and another to have it explained why it's against the rules and not care, following up with shallow justifications.

I ain't even gonna downvote you. It's fascinating to see you as the top comment.No dude. That guy from Long Island paid a few hundred bucks. He's king. Also, it's the Ralph. Stand the fuck up, he says.Lebanon = tax-free shopping for Vermonters + Taco Bellbites the dustThis was way betterWhen money is no object you are rich. When it matters you are poor.Pulp - Common PeopleThat reminds me, I need to change the dome lights in my car. They've been sitting in my centre console for a few months because I keep forgetting a plastic knife to pop off the crystals.Yeah, I'm not gonna whore out my Legacy. 

In fact, I never posted pics of the FXT or the Saabaru, either.

My Legacy is boring. But it works. LL BEAN IN THE HIZZAYDepends. If it's a Versa Note, yes. That's such a superb car. 

The other Versas are so far off a Subaru that it's not even...it's like comparing rotten apples to oranges. Every so often I get tempted to get a Versa as a beater for a few grand (worst resale value ever) and then I remember how bad it is.You are a Subaru god in my book. 7 seats, flat 6 and True AWD?

The king of the beasts."Rerrow, ris ris Rwarry"
I kept trying to close the upper right side of itDude, picking that sub is too easy. That's not even fair.That was fucking stupid.

Religious people want to do their shit without being harassed.

Furthermore, tests and crises of faith are all part of the constant test of being religious.

You'd think an anti-theist would know that.

Insulting people with childish platitudes doesn't prove them wrong, it just proves you're an asshole who uses selective reasoning. This is par for the course for anti-theists and their typical lame arguments, which are just as hypocritical and full of holes as pro-theistic arguments. It's a battle of the intellectually dishonest and is like Gamergate levels of two annoying poles meeting at the top of the Horseshoe Theory.

Seriously - being a dick to the faithful and using their own tactics against them might make you feel superior, but it's not going to change their minds. It's just going to radicalise them even more and then we're gonna have some asshole like Ted Cruz as our president because no moderate can even touch the GOP now.&gt; What the fuck is with extremists in this country 

What do you mean? In the lawless parts of the Daesh territory they have all the weapons they want and behead people with machetes.

They *like* them.Ivory?

For me, #1 would have to be Antonio Brown. 

Aside from Bell, you've basically listed the 2nd round, possibly late first. Those players still have issues that need to be considered for their ADP. 

1. Antonio

2. Leveon

3. Charles

4. Lacy

5. Hopkins

6. Beckham

7. Freeman

8. Julio

9. Brandon

10. Gronk

The problem is that TE has suddenly become a much richer position and that you can make philosophical choices rather than desperation ones. For an example, I would value Barnidge higher than Gronk because he's a more reliable scorer for H2H purposes - he has good usage and lacks the injury risk of Gronk. I'd sacrifice ceiling for floor there. Eifert has Gronk-level ceiling as well.

Assuming RBs like Charles and Lacy are finally healthy they are far and above a Chris Ivory. Hopkins and Beckham should be higher than Julio because we have an idea of what his ceiling is. Hopkins and Beckham have the prospect of improving on what they are. They are both fractionally behind Julio and on an upward trend. They should be above him.

Marshall should also be a top pick because of his incredible consistency along with his points.

Freeman is next year's "Broncos RB" where you're going to have to pay serious value to get him, despite a short resume. You're drafting for potential more than anything, something I don't love to do in the 1st. I could see Freeman not being pre-ranked in the top 10.

&gt; I'll start writing to the administration.

This is a mistake.

You need a stronger response and you need to strike fast and hard right from the get-go. 

You are dealing with a bureaucracy who will do anything to cover their ass, has more people in their employ to frustrate you and are highly experienced at making those like you go away.

You need to assert yourself for your daughter. You are not prepared to argue or negotiate anything with them if your first idea is "write a letter" - come on, that's not even close to an appropriate response for what happened. This is negligence.

If you are going to deliver any sort of letter it should come from a lawyer. Whether or not you want to sue/can find a lawyer who wants to sue is another story, but a letter from you is meaningless. A letter from an attorney says you mean business. A letter from an attorney outlines the illegality and immorality of what happened, along with consequences and has teeth behind it. If the lawyer doesn't like the response, they can advise you to take it further.

I figure about $250 would get it done and it's worth spending. 30-45 minutes to draft the letter and 15-30 to deal with the response. After that, a good attorney would actually try to get some money and take 33-40% of the settlement/award.

IANAL, but I used to work with/for them and trade professional services with them. I've seen a lot of their cases up-close (as a consultant who worked to make their jobs easier) and this is like...textbook here. They have templates to make written demands where they will just plug in everything that's wrong, the remediation proposed and send it out. Takes them 5 minutes, they bill you for 30-60. 

I don't know anything about the law/your state to say if what has happened is actually illegal, but a lawyer would know and that's something you want to mention in your demand. If it is illegal, I would go after this teacher's job.You need a list of demands where:

* Teacher makes a public apology if he/she isn't fired or removed

* School implements a plan to safeguard your daughter

* School has a counselling session to explain to the class why the teacher fucked up and education on disabilities and discrimination

* School pays for psychological counselling for your daughter - NOT the school/district psychologist, but a psychologist of your choice

* Kids who harass your daughter will face predetermined consequences

Lawyer now.You're doing the Lord's work, sonIt's that this is the logical conclusion to the stupid premise of the commercial.

No one thinks "yeah he's gonna go fly", they think "what a stupid idea to jump" - this shows the consequences of what we all thought.You could have just titled it "night and day"

Heroic.Man, you're gonna make me dig mine out and see. I didn't get mine from amazon.com, I got them from the employee store a month later.

I wonder if mine were the first run or not.I think one of the best parts of this subreddit is how snarky toy collectors are.

Serious business.

Have some upvotes.Crap that reminds me, I meant to post here/and GameDeals...too late now, but EB Games Canada has/had a Saturday-only sale. CAD$39 for the starter packs, all platforms. 

That's USD$29 - no trip south needed.I actually don't really care much for DW8XL all that much because it's not very smooth as far as controls go. I need to finish it, but it's kind of a chore for me and games shouldn't be a chore.

SW4 is very good, probably the best game they've ever made. If you play it before DW8, you won't like DW8 because you see how far off it is as far as playability goes. If you get DW8, play it first.

I'm actually playing through WO3 again (already did it on 360 and Wii U) and it's a lot of fun, but again doesn't hold a candle to SW4.

So many things in SW4 make you wonder why they never did it that way along or why it took them so long to figure out. God...dashing...why did we have to wait for that?

Anyway, if you think you're gonna eventually play DW8, get it first.Well this winter has been a joke so far. Thanks, Climate Change.

I used to work in Birmingham, so I think you'll be in a for a culture shock. You cannot dress down enough, believe me. Fashion in BTV is utilitarian, meaning people won't look down at you for not having cool/interesting style, but for being clearly ill-prepared for winter.

If someone like...buys a Marmot jacket, it's not because they think it's cool, it's because it's an *investment* and suits an outdoorsy lifestyle. The idea that you pay for quality is one thing I like. A good example of it are the grocery stores. There's a lot of local content that costs more, but people buy it because it's worth it. People buy Subarus because they're worth it. 

I wouldn't say to go to Walmart (unless you want camo, you'll blend right in - pun intended) for winter wear. Buy stuff this summer out of season for next year and get quality stuff. Sorel boots, Patagonia pants, etc. Spend more on things that work and also last. You can often find it very cheap online in March or April. 

Save money for winter tires. Here in Quebec it's the law, in Vermont they should be. A lot of people do it. Don't screw around. Get some Nokians from Discount Tire Direct. Cheapest way. As people said, a Subaru or a Toyota Tacoma as well. Great vehicles and a great value. 

How did Helen Keller drive?

One hand on the wheel, one hand on the road.That reminds me of a funny.

This young man is strolling along the beach one day and as he walks out towards the pier, he sees a beautiful woman in a wheelchair sobbing. He thinks to himself "What a shame she can't walk, she is possibly the most attractive woman I've ever seen" and felt bad for his shallow thought.

He walks over to her and says "Miss, I saw you crying and I felt bad and wanted to ask what was the matter?"

She looks up at him with vulnerable eyes and quivers "I'm just lonely. I've never even be held by a man before."

The guy thinks for a moment "well, she obviously needs some affirmation and I feel bad" and then sweeps her out of her chair into his arms, holds her lovingly and then sets her back down. 

She stops crying, looking glad and he says goodbye.

The next day he's doing his walk on the pier and she's there again, crying even harder this time. "What now?", he thinks to himself.

He walks over to investigate and asks "What's the matter *this* time?"

She manages to sputter out "I've never been kissed!"

"Alright", he thinks to himself, "I'll just do this and maybe this will shut her up." He grabs her out of her chair, picks her up into his arms and passionately kisses her, sets her back down and departs.

Well, on the third day in a row of his walk, she's there again and is hysterical. She's practically inconsolable. Annoyed and a little disturbed, he asks her "Ok, what is it this time?"

She manages to snort out and exclaim "I've never been fucked!"

He thinks to himself "I know what to do" and he picks her up out of her chair and throws her off the edge of the pier screaming "NOW YOU'RE FUCKED!"Exactly. You can't have preferences.

For an example, I would prefer not to date any SJW-types.Ok, I'll bite.

How is Michele Bachmann not represented? Or Hillary Clinton?Finally one I strongly disagree with.

You can set it off being a few PSI below normal and if I'm like that, I wanna know because I don't want poor fuel economy.

Beyond that, if you have a Subaru or another decent AWD car you need all of your tires as identical as possible so that you don't mess up the drivetrain by having it trying to spin wheels/transfer torque or traction because there's a problem with one of the wheels.

I'll bet you a dollar that every 2012 (or whatever year) Subaru from here on out will have less differentials changed over times compared to the the prior years  that didn't have TPMS.This is secondhand, but as my dad explained it, domestic cars didn't used to blow air on your feet. I may have my stories confused (because he was a Corvair owner), but I think he said Ralph Nader was responsible for the air thing?

Whatever.

I have been in older domestics and they didn't blow air on your damn feet all the time, even when it wasn't selected/the fan was off. I remember back in the early 80's he bought a Nissan because "Japanese cars don't blow air on your feet all the time" and he was right.

It just seems like recently that domestics no longer blow air for some unknown reason, but I agree with him. I like to drive with sandals and if you have the front vents on AC, your feet will freeze.

I want to say this was a safety thing with Nader, but I could have them confused. Regardless, there was a time where it didn't blow air on your feet and then for some reason it did.No idea if their special is still on, but in-store all GHL accessories were 50% off. This was a few days ago, I just now got around to trying it.

It'll probably go on sale again if it's not right now. GHL is dying. Probably on clearance before you know it.

If you need backup mics, I like this just fine. It's a bit smaller, has a power switch and a better sheath for the cable.I know their feels. I am/was a Devils/Nordiques fan. Devils went from Denver to NJ...ok. Then the Nordiques moved to Denver and won their first year there and beat the Devils for their 2nd championship.

Don't ever go soft on the Ravens like the Avs fans did. They were spoiled by success. Makes sense, though because they gave up on the Rockies who became the Devils.

Baltimore sports fans are probably on a higher level than Denver sports fans...We could really fuck with some crows with all of the strawmen you're building.

Not all psychopaths are rapists and not all rapists are psychopaths.

I'm sure you love the shallow platitudes of "real men don't rape", but unfortunately the reason society hasn't conquered sexual assault is because there are a myriad of causes for the same effect, so there's no one simple approach to combat this crime.

I always wonder if it's intellectual laziness, lack of education, lack of giving a shit or what, but if you want to stop rape, it's probably in the Tumblrina's best interest to not apply overly simplified platitudes to such a serious issue. 

Just saying "stop raping" isn't going to fix the years of psychological damage done to a child who was raped by his father or uncle and has severe anger issues. Considering psychopathy is something that person would need to have been born with, misdiagnosing him as a psychopath isn't going to solve his damaged psyche any more than telling him he's not a real man. We need early intervention and serious therapy to fix these broken people.

And that's just one scale of assault. &gt; so I don't understand why my analysis that sociopaths/psychopaths are subhuman is so wrong

Just like how sociopaths and psychopaths don't understand how their lack of empathy is wrong. Just like how they don't understand how their extreme, compulsive decisions are wrong.

Seems that by your rhetoric, you have a lot in common with the people you consider subhuman. Does that make you subhuman? Sure sounds like it.

Maybe that's why we shouldn't say it, since your line of thinking can be turned back around on you.&gt; Like, thanks for telling me something I already know.

Stop for a minute and let it sink in how little these people think of you as a man.

They actually think you are that stupid.

That's narcissism for you.Dude, it's pretty easy.

The poor states are the ones who lost the war. The ones who didn't prepare for the end of slavery and handled it poorly. The ones who cut their noses off to spite their face in regards to former slaves and created institutional poverty to punish blacks - a poverty black hole that sucked in whites as well. 

What that has to do with Europe, I don't know. But the South was built on unsustainable economics and has had defective philosophies when it comes to business since it started. If it wasn't needing slave labour to survive, it was eschewing the middle class and adopting idiotic trickle-down theories while gutting education and the social safety net.

Pretty much every decision you can figure that was made was made wrong.

Texas had oil and a different history than the rest of the South. Oklahoma was also very wealthy and healthy due to oil. Oklahoma went down the tubes because of the dust bowl, Texas didn't have that problem.

You can get a few things wrong or a few things right and succeed, but states like Mississippi or South Carolina manage to get everything wrong in a perfect storm of failure. That failure can be traced back to philosophy and actions going back hundreds of years.Well you'll be at home with the bugs and humidity, but the wind will be a nice surprise for you.Illinois' problem isn't party affiliation, it's entrenched corruption. It's institutional graft. 

If I were made King of the USA, I would declare Illinois a failed state, take federal control of the government, fire everyone, prosecute those who have done wrong and bar all of them from holding political office again. I'd then let people reapply for their old jobs on a case-by-case basis and rebuild it from there. I would put in the strongest corruption laws in the country and make the penalty for violating them hard labour.

You need to completely destroy the culture of politics and government there and radically treat the entire system so it can't come back. 

You don't seem to differentiate between corruption and incompetence. Illinois being Democrats has nothing to do with their competence and everything to do with their corruption.

You can be NH and conservative or MA and liberal. Doesn't matter - people there are competent and not corrupt.

You can be WA or OR and the politicians there are incompetent, but they're not corrupt. They're just stupid.

Illinois politicians aren't stupid. They're smart, like foxes. The system there invites the corrupt to power. Same with Michigan and Wisconsin. They're both becoming the new Illinois, but with different rule.Imagine if you removed your own selfish opinions from the debate for a moment and actually looked at the facts how much more enlightened you could be and we wouldn't be laughing at you.

See, the problem here is that you don't understand the internet.

Oh, I'm sure you get water and electricity. I'm confident you understand water being a precious resource or electricity being tied to the cost of energy overall, which has become a scarce commodity.

But I think we all get that.

It's where you're a complete technological illiterate that's humiliating. You actually think the internet is like water and electricity and has some sort of scarcity problem where the availability goes down as demand goes up.

Unfortunately for your conceit, internet technology couldn't be farther from your analogy. The more we advance technologically, the easier it is to deliver more and more internet faster and cheaper. In fact, as demand goes up, so does adoption, which drives down prices.

But hey, don't let that get in the way of you thinking you're right. We accept that water and energy are finite resources because we know they are. And like you said, if it's a luxury, then why should it be bound by the same market constraints/scarcity as essential services?

Here's a shovel: D---&gt;

Keep digging.You've basically described organised crime, except legal.Well it seems I have some work to do in treating my letter carrier better.Yup. That's why everyone orders those 10" kits from Japan.Where's your Jets pants?And then comboing into a dragon punchI'm sure he'll use his scissors to cut open the gates of hell due to parental negligence and usher in the end times.

Thanks, Coop.Burn.We raised two kids into adulthood...my ex-wife is...probably more anti-theistic than atheistic while I'm agnostic. Her family, who they were around constantly were very religious. They asked to take our kids to church. My ex and I let them do it for different reasons.

I think that if you teach critical thinking and let them choose, the chance they pick religion is very slim. I tried to be respectful to their crackpot beliefs. My ex went back and forth on that. 

They really had 3 influences: the religious, the anti-religious and the sceptical pessimist.

I think if I was not part of the battle, there was a chance one or both picked religion out of rebellion or being forced to take sides. Having healthy scepticism as a way of thought will ensure a respect for religion without necessarily following it. Or maybe an informed choice of religion! Let the kid decide! It's not there to serve your desires, but theirs. Let them be religious if they like. You can't save people from themselves. Neither can Jesus.This is simply a troubling trend in modern terrorism, period. The people at Yale and Dartmouth are intimidating people as well and they are pro-choice.

The trouble is radicalism. Does someone's right to free speech trump personal liberty? No. And especially when it's group speech. Groups should not bully individuals or other groups. 

It's the same logic as corporations not having speech rights; groups that are pro-life or anything else shouldn't be able to disrupt or harass doctors any more than groups who are pro social-justice should be allowed to disrupt students trying to enjoy their right to study or be educated.

We've seriously failed domestically and abroad to protect civil liberties and now you see all kinds of crackpot claims demanding equal treatment, like drawing a picture of Muhammad being an insult to an entire religion. 

Abortion is ultimately none of anyone's business except the people having them and performing them. Perhaps.

If you look at Yahoo pickem, you'll see that the public is basically about 50-50 in guessing games, so I'm not sure how to properly leverage crowdsourced information.Seems like Amazon ought to beat the price.Wow, finally some good deals from the MS store. So far their sales have been awful.

I'm still not sure Battlefront is worth $30.

If it were $20, I'd have pulled the trigger. IMHO, that game is worth the GOTY price of $20, so if they'd drop it to that, I'd get it now.

I never worked for babyHere's the deal: you can't be the best if you weren't there early on.

That's the problem.

We've squeezed out just about everything we can from rap. Think of it like buying a house before the prices went up or starting a dotcom in the 90's.

There's always an opportunity coming, but not like it was for the pioneers who changed the game when it mattered.

Don't get me wrong. I think Kendrick is really unique, but he would have to try 10x harder and not really carve out an original space that hasn't been taken.

When I took music in college, 1st day of theory the prof said "everything has been done for 800 years, so music today is finding novel ways of doing something that's already been done."

Rap is like that on the micro, not the macro. Innovating in a limited scope...I mean I'm more impressed by what Big Boi did with Phantogram, where he's at least trying to break out of the small pond. Rap is becoming like country where it's eating itself and it's got so much going in circles that it's not going forward.

Being the most original rapper of our time (right now) is being a big fish in a little pond, but you can't compete with the people who had all of the creative space in the world to push the genre.

He came along 20 years too late. He'll never be top 10. There's no controversy there. It just is what it is. His forefathers ate everything up and left the table scraps for everyone else.

He'd do better if he focused his immense talents and ideas on something innovative as opposed to reinventing the wheel.

Sorry.Ian Rapoport has it right againWhy was there no penalty for jumping over the pile on Miami?!?Hit to the head is a 15 yard penalty.

So who cares if it was a facemask or not on Rodgers?

It's still 15 yards.The truth is that they're competitive anyway because dead-ish teams will still perform and/or get wins.

I used to be bothered by it, but now I'm not. I've played enough private and public leagues to know that my win percentage is the same regardless. My PF are always the same and all I can do is the best I can do. If my PA are much less because it's a public league, that won't matter in the playoffs vs the active teams. 

Dead teams mean the active teams get more waivers and build better teams. Active leagues have a lot of very weak teams, which are similar to dead teams anyway. If your waiver wire is picked clean and you're starting...(goes to check)...Raijon Neal, is there a big difference between a crappy player and an inactive player?

Not really.

The only difference is PA for tiebreaking and only Yahoo uses points as a tiebreaker anyway. H2H is the tiebreaker for NFL and ESPN, but they're both deader than Yahoo.

Ultimately I think you're making a big deal over nothing. At this point in my fantasy career, I think I have enough of a sample size to assure you that it doesn't make a difference.Polk just looked really strong today. They rode the hot hand.

They're different backs. Polk is a lot thicker and sturdier and more suited to power running. I think the Texans thought that they stood a better chance against a big, beefy line with him...and then ran him around the edges, LOL.

Blue's an upright runner like a lot of tall backs and he isn't really the best choice vs that Bills line.

In almost every league I resisted the temptation to start him despite the Bills being a good on-paper play. I didn't know that Polk would do that well, I just thought Blue might see limited usage and he did. Tall RBs aren't great plays vs 4-man fronts.

The best you can do is hope you catch someone like me with situational analysis and ask them. Otherwise, I wouldn't start him unless you understand the situation. I managed to stay competitive despite having Lacy on a bunch of teams.Dude, depression isn't a reward dilemma, it's a motivation dilemma.Can't we just fucking go back to green in the unis?

Please?The more inflation rises, the greater the gap between those with resources and those without.

Deflation wiping the wealth of inequality off the books? 

Might sting.

Deflation wiping the wealth of an egalitarian society off the books?


Devastating.

Deflation in Saudi Arabia would have serious political consequences, but you're not saying that. Economically the Saudis would be much better off if the concentration of their wealth were reset overnight (assuming they had an equitable share of the resources going forward).

Same goes with Russian oligarchs. It's not like Russians have equity or real property to devalue anyway. What's the major loss? As long as things don't become corrupt again, they're better off as well.

It's not just "all good" or "all bad" - it depends. In the USA where our wealth is tied up in real estate? That would hurt. It would be a necessary correction and hopefully kill speculation in property, but it would be devastating when it happens.Fans of shitty football, have we got an event for you!I don't get that Bose commercial with Macklemore and Russell Wilson.

"Who's a cute wittle wussie Russie?"

What the fuck Macklemore. He's not a kitten.I'm glad the INT was confirmed by an all-knowing higher authority thanks to the prayer circle. Yeah that's a great play doing the Jesus pose there, Cris.Wow he made a Heinz 51 at home...I may be in loveGrind him up and turn him into ketchupImpossible. He's not a TE.Thanks Buffalo Wild WingsThat play is why I wanted us to take Mosley"WHO WANTS TO CLIMB ON ME FOR THIS XBOX CONTROLLER?"When #97 outruns #23 you have an age problemMan, could you imagine working at Subway and having to hear the Cantina Band song for your entire shift?

You'd shoot first.One of the strange things about Steelers fandom is going "Oh, 1st and 25? We can convert that."Great defense. That's what you gotta do, just wipe us out hard.If only Williams read that better and cut it outside, it was a sure TD to the cornerIt's not fair that we have 3 WRs like this. I mean, you can't play that any better than the DB did. It was talent.If this team could have stayed healthy, they would have obliterated the record book this year.He's really starting to look like Julio Jones.Ow. Bowling.Splitting the zoneI can't remember this woman's name, but every time I see her, I am frightened by her makeup.

EDIT: Ava something, I think.I'm not trying to make light of Frank Gore, but he's beating us because we're overrunning him because he's so slow.Hell of a play by Hasselbeck there regardless.Disagree, Cris. We wanted to flush him out to the right and we did. He wasn't gonna throw across his body diagonally to the left!Your perception of time has to do with what they said earlier. Chud calls the plays in the booth with his terminology, someone on the sideline translates to Pep's terminology and relays it to Matt who then looks it up on his armband and calls it from there.

It's a huge disadvantage.Might be his first completion in a while if it's not intentional groundingNo one should attempt these throws, let alone reasonably make them.

You might make one a few times a year. We make 1 every game.What can Brown do for you?Can we sit all of the starters now? Is it too early? Really, this is fine. 25 points is enough.In 2011 and 2013, Drew Brees and Peyton Manning respectively set the record for yards per game at 342.3

Ben is at 335 so far with 344 tonight, which will keep inching it up ever so slightly. 

He's a 400-yard game away from being up there with them.I love whoever does the music for SNFMy lord...Maybe I'm just a bit of a bleeding heart here, but when I see a commercial from Walmart where they go "would you rather get a gift or give one to a child in need" and the kids go "give a gift to someone who gets nothing", seeing rich white people get luxury cars with bows on them seems pretty sick and wrong.

/rantIn the meantime, Colts fans will grunt for 22 minutes in frustration, just like GokuActually what's fucked up is that you may end up hosting a playoff game and we may not even get to go.You know both of these teams were known for having a pretty reliable run defense and neither team has looked it tonight.Dude, just go to the fridge and get a glass of milkPrecisely. Maybe an 80% Jason Witten.I think that every yearYou hate the 2nd-greatest Bengal ever?PIT/CAR would be a hell of a SB with two of the arguably best QBs in the NFL going at it. They're both just unstoppable. DeAngelo facing his old team with Bell out?

Good plot.Uhh...Just that final burst...manI hope they show Hilton and Brown after the gameI wished they'd have flexed our game to primetime so we could have faced Primetime AndyUhh...Those People aren't SJWs.

And they were having some lulz.

This should get posted over at /r/cringe. Ouch.

You realise the mods were just having a humorous conversation in modmail...they flair users with pejoratives for fun and ban people if it amuses them.

IGTHFT isn't serious business. There's no need to tell anyone you quit it.tl;dr

Chargers fans don't show up to support the team, it's a sea of orange, team owes fans an apology

Sorry Broncos fans for not providing you a more entertaining game

-Chargers

Nick, you are such a hackI think they get exposed every week.

They're an incomplete team. Very much so.

Yet they keep winning anyway.

So far, being exposed hasn't cost them and I don't see why it would or should just because it's the playoffs.No. Their statistics are worth money.

They would have to pay me to correct their work when it comes to analysis.

Think of it like Youtube videos. If I want to see gameplay, I just turn off the audio so I don't have to listen to some idiot go all stupid in the mic. I'm just there to see the game.If he had played the entire season, he would have been on track to challenge the yardage record for a single season.

Manning and Brees had 5477/5476 yards for the best single-season where they averaged 342.3 yards per game.

Ben is currently 3rd all-time with 338.4 with the 2015 season. That's a big improvement over his 309.5 yards per game last year where he tied Drew Brees for #1.

He'd have been on pace for 24 TDs through Week 12 (averaging just under 2 per game), which would have put him into the top 10. It's interesting to note that guys like Blake Bortles have more TDs; they didn't even have a Jags rushing TD all year since yesterday. 

It's a solid argument.How many people upvoted this because it's True vs how many people upvoted this because it's hilarious?&gt; They did what they could in order to make some money

$200m

They basically made the film twice.

Hard to have a marketing budget.

They're at $130/$200m, so hopefully it'll break even at least.Ugh...Poway is like a prison. I avoid Poway whenever possible. It's "roadlocked", meaning it's hard to get in and out of and the traffic is dumb.

If I worked in Poway I would probably live in Poway. If I wasn't living in Poway, I would come from the south or the west. Lots of people live east (in Ramona) to save money, so the traffic going in is bad. The commute is going south in the mornings on 15 or going westbound on 56. If you can reverse it, things are at least a little better. 

I see your logic in Lakeside/Santee there, but that's not the commute I'd want to deal with. If something happens, you're late for work. There aren't other options. San Diego traffic is claustrophobic.

Your best bet is to find somewhere nearby with "ranch" in it's name or Mira Mesa. At least if you lived in Mira Mesa it's easy to get out of there and there's cool stuff to do in and around it.http://www.secularism.org.uk/news/2015/12/islamist-students-try-to-disrupt-ex-muslim-maryam-namazies-talk-on-blasphemy-at-goldsmiths-university

&gt;Incredibly, the Goldsmiths Feminist Society sided with the Islamist protesters. They released a statement on 2 December expressing their "solidarity with Goldsmiths Islamic Society".

Of course there's that whole "teach men not to rape" narrative and other regressive, defective thinking going on right now, but...yeah. That's just about what a lot of people think of men.

Regressive Islamists: We think men are prone to rape and can't control themselves!

Regressive radical feminists: We can teach you how not to rape! First, let's cover up women to remove that temptation!

*That's* feminism?I always wonder if it's because of a shallow gene pool.

I'd be curious to see the stats on genetic diversity in closed communities.Well, we've found it guise. The exception that makes the rule.

Now we can all forget about the billions of people who agree with shrouding women behind cloth because of religion.Yeah, I mean look at India. No one from India ever lost weight. And of course with their high-carb diet of starches and legumes, they are among the fattest people on earth.

/s

INB4 "they are starving" quotes.My hand would have shot up.

"Wait, I know! You're going to talk to us about psychological issues that make us susceptible to misleading information, such as trust?"

And then at the end I would have said:

"So wait, you mean you told us all of that seriously and not as an example of misleading people?"

Then I would have gone to the head of the biology department and made a complaint with the dean about the psych department.Playcalling.

First of all they're using him better and secondly he's being used by necessity for dump offs.

When Forsett was in there, they seemed to call the exact wrong play for him constantly. Trestman was trying to make him something he's not. Could you imagine if you had him and Ted Ginn out there at the same time?What's even worse is that in our NarFFL league we have 4 divisions and there's always a real risk that a losing team makes the playoffs because they're in a division with a sub-.500 recordMost points should be the tiebreaker though.

I can't control my schedule, only my lineups. If I put in the best lineups and get the most points, I shouldn't suffer because I had the most PA against me.

I wished I could use statistics to explain it, but I am usually among the most scored upon teams and have to worry about ESPN/NFL tiebreakers because some crappy team and I have a similar record.

I have a team in ESPN that's been between 98-100% all year and may miss the playoffs due to only having 7 wins. That's crappy scheduling if a far worse team will get a tiebreaker over me. 

H2H should count only for the matchup itself. You win, you get a win. Make it simple. Tiebreak with points like Yahoo.That's not the point OP is making.

We all know the rules.

I know how ESPN and NFL tiebreak. They should change it to points.

I know that Yahoo hockey inexplicably rewards penalty minutes in hockey rather than punish them like fouls in basketball.

I still play.

The point is that when confronted with something that needs improvement, fix it.

Yahoo used to not have fractional scoring and you needed 20 yards to get 1 point. We all told them for 2 years how stupid that was and that 10 yards per point and fractional scoring were normal and they fixed it.

We told ESPN to do fractional scoring and they never did. Now ESPN is plagued with unnecessary ties.That's what DFS is. Back before there was baseball-style H2H, the only public fantasy game was from CDM and it was 25 team salary cap roto.&gt; also a league should have the championship week 16

Not if you do it like ESPN and roll 2 weeks into one matchup. Playoffs start in ESPN next week. 4 of 10 teams make it.* He'll have 2 receptions, 18 yards and 1 TD and get 8 points

* He'll have 7 receptions for 78 yards, 0 TDs and get 8 points

That's how this guy rolls. He either gets you touchdowns or yards. It'll be early Christmas if he manages to do both.That time has already passed.

He's been off my teams for 1-2 weeks. How many bad games in a row do you want to hold on to him when there are other prospects out there?There's a chance for improvement and one of them would be removing divisions and tiebreaking by points, or at least going to two divisions.

Your PF is your skill and that should be the tiebreaker, not arbitrary scheduling.

Last year we had a 5-8 team make the playoffs:

http://www.fleaflicker.com/nfl/leagues/124681?season=2014

http://www.fleaflicker.com/nfl/leagues/124681/playoffs?season=2014

Although there were other teams at 7-6 that made it and I had more points than both of them, the 7th and 8th seeds were #1 and #3 in points, but both missed the playoffs.

The reason the other teams made the playoffs was because of scheduling. Scheduling isn't any measure of skill, whereas drafting your team, managing FAs and setting your lineups are.

We should be reducing elements of chance to enhance the choices we do make and reward them. Had I made the semis in 2014, I would have beaten 3 of the 4 teams and I would have won the championship.I've already dropped Ryan with the hopes that someone will start him in the playoffs and use him to lose. 

Freeman and Julio are still very useful players and rather consistent compared to your other options.

Carolina won't hold them to nothing. Remember, this is cumulative. You're trying to hit singles out of most positions and hope for a homer to drive them in. You aren't going to win swinging for the fences at every slot.I'm a big fan of Marty Robbins, but I'm going to tell you something that will change how you look at him and look at music.

If Marty Robbins sings about it, it's cowboy culture.

If a black man raps about it, it's murderous thug life.

All of the people out there who decry black music as promoting violence and making the black community violent criminals ought to ask why no one who grew up listening to Marty Robbins didn't get into vengeful quarrels with people and shoot them.

Marty Robbins is a storyteller, much like any rapper and he told the stories he knew best. He was born in the old west and grew up on stories about his heritage.

Is that any different than a black man who grew up in a violent, impoverished ghetto talking about the life he's lived and witnessed in a hyperbolic fashion? 

Did Marty Robbins glorify these things and embellish them? Sure. But no one took it seriously. Yet if a black man raps about gun violence, it's a call to arms. Really? That's how highly you think of yourself and how lowly you think of them. That the average black person is stupid. That they'll pick up a gun because a song told them to and use it to murder someone, but white people wouldn't. Marty Robbins told you to, though! Why didn't you?

Because you know it's just a story.I would tell him. 

Let's say you're with someone and you're about to go down on them and it's filthy and dirty. That's a dealbreaker. You've gotta tell them "yo, this isn't sanitary and it's a dealbreaker for me."

Same thing here. 

"Yo, your flat-earth ideas make me ill and it's a dealbreaker. I cannot look at you or talk to you without thinking less of you. I can't take you seriously and the fact you believe this makes me sceptical of everything you say and it's just too much effort to deal with someone I can't trust."

Don't beat around the bush. If you're going to sever a relationship, be big enough to tell him exactly what he did.Yahoo uses PF as the tiebreaker and it's H2H.

Your question makes no sense because it asks for an extreme that I didn't suggest.

It already works with Yahoo.

Look at the link I posted. That is convoluted and difficult to understand.

Then look at your standings in Yahoo. If you're tied with the 4th place team and you're 5th, whoever has the most points is in. It's Simple, easy and relfects your skill because it's the points YOU control.&gt;I\u2019m pretty sure that your complaints were addressed last year when this was posted. And I believe that the mods were going to take a look at it in the off-season. 

Yeah and what was the resolution? That's why I'm asking again.

&gt;Other items of note, with 12 teams and 4 divisions, there is no arbitrary scheduling.

I never suggested arbitrary scheduling, nor eliminating what you're saying. I don't care about how the scheduling is done. What I care about is arbitrary divisions and arbitrary tiebreakers.

Look - you can schedule people your way and eliminate the divisions. Even better would be making SOS scheduling where the new teams get to play each other and the top teams have to play each other twice. But that's not my point. My point is to focus on skill as much as possible. You said it yourself: you don't like arbitrary things. You dislike arbitrary scheduling, but you support arbitrary divisions? That's inconsistent.

&gt;Personally, I love that we give each division an automatic spot. 

Again, I don't love that a 5-8 team made the playoffs last year. As a commish/commishes, the job is to make the league as fair and consistent as possible. When you have teams with a losing record making the playoffs, that's not fair and it's not fun. It's an error. The same goes with teams who are tied, but one with lesser points makes it. You are rewarding the worse manager because they won one game. 

If Fleaflicker didn't care about quality and consistency, why are there measurements of our ability to pick the best players? Optimum points? Consistency +/-?

&gt;I also like how the tiebreakers are set up so that head to head wins take priority. It minimizes the effects of having 1 fluke amazing or terrible week drive the standings for the remainder of the season.

Season. Over the course of the season the points average out, the wins do not when the divisions take that away. If you look at your league or my league, for the most part the points reflect the record. My PF and PA are identical and my record is .500. That makes sense. You're suggesting something arbitrary. I'm suggesting wins and losses, followed by points, the two most important stats. You can ask what's the point, then why have points at all? Why not just have wins and losses and erase points?

&gt;If someone puts up 200 pts one week, they would mostly win any and all tiebreakers for the rest of the season. Is that fair?

And then you say this:

&gt;You lost this playoff spot because you lost to team X in week 8

Again, that makes no sense. It's ok if you point to one H2H loss, but not one 200 point game?

At least the points measure quality, ability and skill and average out over time.

&gt;Is it worth removing the week to week excitement that comes with head to head?

Yes, because Yahoo has been doing this longer than anyone aside from Sandbox and both have used points as a tiebreaker and are very exciting and the H2H matchups absolutely matter.

But even if I concede your point and agree, having 4 divisions negates your point because it awards 2/3 of the spots to arbitrary division winners. While points is the more objective and fair 2nd tiebreaker, I don't even care if that's an issue if we can at least get rid of 4 divisions down to 2.Wait and see: private security will get hired and they'll be off-duty cops. Maybe even in uniform, like they do in Texas.Against his religion: drinking clam juice

Ok: killing people for violating his religious principlesMaybe.

Part of the passing is due to lack of running. He could have gotten the single-season passing yards record. 

Here's the thing.

* Ben would probably be #1 in pass yards

* AB would easily be #1 in receiving yards

* Bell would be #1 in rushing yards at his pace

If you have 3 of the #1 players, I think you can make the argument. The only thing I wonder is Ben's pace of 2 TDs per game. Would it go up? Other QBs have more passing TDs, although with guys like Blaine Gabbert it's because they couldn't run well. Why not fire yourself, Jimmy?

You're the problem. 

Pettine's a good coach. You're the one shoving Manziel up his ass. Why are you firing him? Insolence? Showing you up?Now would be the perfect time to eliminate them altogether so you can add teams in pairs and not worry about where to put them. Then you could just schedule teams based upon wins/losses and geography. 

That way, you don't have to wait 4 years to see the Giants and Jets play. Dumb stuff like that.They remind me of the Republican presidential race.

"What can I say or do to get myself mentioned and differentiate myself from everyone else."

We get it, Cleveland. You have a football team again.Bully?

Is that really how you guys see it?

Kid Johnny is the class clown, skipping school, acting up, getting drunk, etc and when a more responsible kid tells him to get it together, he's a bully?

What happened to you Browns fanbase? You used to be cool.He could go out there drunk, puke on the football, pass out and shit his pants and Jerry Jones would think he's the future of Cowboys football.&gt; and shitty teammates

Really?

The teammates are the shitty ones?

Alright then.Having no discipline hurts the Browns even more.

If people won't take care of what needs to be done, then you lose organisational discipline.

Cleveland's main problem is it's toxic culture. The Pats are successful with a bunch of scrubs because they have discipline and culture.I'd take Barnidge over Eifert.&gt;It appears the organization is offering Manziel at least one more chance

YOU HAVE ONE MORE CHANCE OR ELSE ^^^^we'll ^^^^have ^^^^to ^^^^give ^^^^you ^^^^one ^^^^more ^^^^chanceYeah but every time I get an OS update for Mac, I don't have to decrapify it or wonder what it's done.

It's a genuine improvement every time. Same with iOS. Ugh...that reminds me I have 3 computers at home with W10 I need to fix.

Why did I upgrade...&gt; but playing games on it takes too much effort

LOLWUT

SteamOS, the Debian-based operating system is...like an automatic install. It couldn't be easier. And it just works.

Oh, I know "but there's less games" and "shitty drivers"...yes, we know. We've heard that. You said it requires effort and SteamOS is about as effortless as you can get. /facepalm

You got rid of Ubuntu because you didn't enable the wifi?

It's like saying you bought a laptop and returned it because you had to press the power button after you opened the lid or had to press Fn+F12 to turn the NIC on/off.tl;dr "Matt can tell me anything, but my offense is fine and it's his problem"

Who's fault is it that Julio isn't getting used?He was an offensive coach for you before he was a defensive coach and he played offense in college.I don't think so.

Minecraft is for kids. Adults like me buy consoles for exclusive adult games.

Kids play what you give them. Parents won't buy a $300 system to play kids exclusives. See: Wii UI hope the pixel Mario amiibo works with it.

Or that we get Minecraft amiibo.It's no worse on 360 and 360 is way cheaper.Their people eat lunch at the same places. Nintendo and Microsoft are right up the road from one another.Nintendo can always buy them out for pennies on the dollar.I think if you're Microsoft, you're looking closely at this and thinking about buying them. MS have never been able to make inroads in Japan and lack compelling games/characters for kids. Owning Sega would give them both.Apparently with Archery, the arrows only fly straight ahead, just like his kick return skills.

We wanted a guy who could also go from side to side.How meta:

https://www.reddit.com/r/todayilearned/comments/3vsr9k/til_billy_mitchell_achieved_the_perfect_score_on/cxqlh9iFunspot is in Laconia, Half-Moon is the arcade *at* Weirs Beach.

/pedanticYeah fuck those people.That was a great adjustment.

"You're gonna bring pressure up the middle instead of double Desean? We're gonna take the lid right off the top of your defense."

Didn't work this time. Might not work the next time. But it'll eventually work.

Shots fired.They weren't working?

They were probably background installing forced updatesThis just proves that the NFL should be able to flex games to Monday as well, but we all know the reason the MNF games suck is so that the only primetime game worth watching is that incredibly expensive SNF package with NBC.Morris isn't known as a receiver, but FYI out there, since last week he's been used in passing downs. While he hasn't been getting more catches, Cousins is actually looking at him and Morris is pass blocking as well.And just about as (in)effective&gt; Silverback is raping Hardy

I watch the primetime games with two TVs side by side and go back and rewatch the previous series during a commercial to better understand what I saw.

Honestly, I can't differentiate one series from the next. They're all a giant blur to me at this point.

It's like some sort of glitch in the matrix deja vu.My post-DVR report:

They ran the same play with Morris on 1st down, the 2nd time the Cowboys were ready with 5 defenders. Very imaginitive. 

Kirk Cousins has faced a blitz up the middle so many times that I can't distinguish one from the others.Microsoft: "Can't you call them iPads right now?"I thought we were gonna be cheated by injury there for a minute.

It's fitting that #1000 is a catch like that because it's what he does - reliable short catches.When he's gone, I won't have anything to root for on offense there.A power issue with battery powered devices.

That's what we're going with?Cassell sucks so bad he can't even hit his tantrum throwing piece of shit.

There. Everyone's happy.

I am the master of compromise.DAE amazed they run Concussion commercials during games?It's amazing to me that we have a society where people can't withstand valid criticism or accept facts contrary to their (ill-informed) opinion. She's testing us.

At least that'll be her "I meant to do that" excuse.She was so busy stripping metadata from the pictures that she didn't even try.

Just an FYI, there is no moon out there right now:

http://www.moonconnection.com/moon_phases_calendar.phtmlIt's Fixieus now&gt;Emmons  (1984) distinguishes four facets of narcissism: Leadership/Authority (those who enjoy being a leader and being seen as an authority), Self-Absorption/Self Admiration (those who admire their own physical appearance and personality), Superiority/Arrogance (those who overestimate their own abilities), and Exploitativeness/Entitlement (those who enjoy manipulating and exploiting others and expect favors from others). 

* Leadership/Authority: World-class, expert, top 1% in the universe, etc

* Self-Absorption/Self Admiration: Selfie Sunday, look at my accomplishments and trophies

* Superiority/Arrogance: IRONMAN among many other failed projects

* Exploitativeness/Entitlement: Please pay me to give you a shitty presentation or consult at your business to be fat-friendly etc

Most people only need to tick one box. She ticks all 4. Repeatedly and heavily ^^^pun ^^^intended&gt; True narcissists don't care if it's negative or positive attention, as long as the focus is on them.

I disagree strongly.

True narcissists thrive on power, not attention. Attention is only a means to an end in regards to power and they can take it or leave it.

You see it often with SJWs - they talk about "empowerment", which to them is having their messaging go unchallenged. By "mansplaining" or "whitesplaining" or even using facts and reason you are the devil to them. 

Why?

Because it disempowers them. Facts, reason, logic and objective truth take their power away.

You have to understand something - this whole movement is about co-opting everything. I won't make a list (and it's a long one), I'll just focus on empowerment.

To the average feminist, equality means equality of opportunity, men are included, blah blah all that jazz. Fine. To the SJW radical feminist, equality means equality of outcomes, taking from one group and giving to them, certain groups are demonised rather than included, etc.

Empowerment works the same way. To the average person who wants equality, empowerment is more of the civil rights definition where people have the ability to partake in civic life. People won't discriminate against them because of their skin colour. If you've been raped, you'll be believed. Stuff like that.

What we're talking about here with SJWs is narcissistic empowerment, which is a completely different subject. To them, empowerment is megalomania, which is simply having power for power's sake. Unopposed power. To try and invalidate them takes away their power. Attention paid to their fallacies robs them of power, which hurts the narcissist.

These aren't children who thrive on simply being noticed. These are bullies who thrive on power and revenge fantasies. To ignore them is the same as ignoring any sort of megalomaniac dictator who wrongs people. They don't go away. Their power grows unchecked.

Narcissism is a new science and it's evolving in ways we've never seen with the power of social media and the ability to reach beyond a small circle of people. It's critical that we understand it correctly and not just say "well, the baby wants it's bottle, don't pay attention to it's crying" - that could not be more wrong.

The way to deal with narcissists is to constantly stand up to them so that they cannot seize power.She wouldn't have been able to lie about her selfies if she hadn't forgotten to strip the metadata from her pictures.I only have a sort of...observation

Often there's interesting stuff in /r/health or /r/science and as a matter of citing my sources, I like to make it a point to say where content was found.

Linking to the comments of the subreddit? That seems less desirable than linking to the article itself, *sans* comments. 

It seems like a slippery slope. My concern is that I think we should participate *more* in those subreddits, but it sounds like that would/could be considered brigading and that's something the admins ought to be able to differentiate without us assumed guilty until proven innocent.

And who's to say/know that people like me with lots of subscriptions didn't find it there first or wouldn't have found it eventually? It's possible for people to subscribe to multiple subs without brigading.

Not much y'all can do about it, just that it's a very vague rule when you go under the surface and it's a shame anyone could be punished.

I'm really the exact opposite. I think we should be participating all over reddit, especially because the vast majority of users here are well-behaved. For the minority who aren't, I think that's the admins' responsibility, not the subreddit. If people break the rules of reddit, then it's reddit's job to handle them, not yours.As you command.I browsed FPH, but it doesn't mean I was a supporter.

I look at /r/KotakuInAction, but it doesn't mean I support it. In fact, I often post opposing viewpoints over there.

Being in FPH doesn't make you a bad person any more than being in SRD or a circlejerk sub would.I agree. reddit in general is too heavily moderated. If the mods of a subreddit only have limited resources, I'd rather they focus on things the users can't do, such as fight spam.

IMO, you might want to remind everyone that reddit works for them as well and if this is a bother, the users should collectively use their own power incrementally to do the job rather than laze-out and ask you to do it.

$0.02If you blamed pot for your munchies and that's why you got fat, I think you might get called out.

This is a surprisingly tolerant sub, all reddit culture things considered.Yeah I reposted a meme last week and my judgement call was that as a frequent mobile user, I would rather have the link than to have to open comments and find the link in-text.

/u/maybesaydie did a good job clarifying that. I figured if my post got nuked it would be fine and if it didn't it would be fine, but that if I made an honest effort to "set the table" with a topic worthy of debate and discussion that it would be ok; even a joke meme could be that, but it would be the judgement of the poster to get that right enough so that the mods wouldn't delete it (which would be their right).I cringe every time I hear it.

Making a left turn...

I'm not a fan of social justice at all. I'm a strong civil rights activist. I don't like social justice because it's a breeding ground for identity politics. A lot of people here like social justice and don't like that I call it out, and that's fine. I'd rather focus on fatlogic, but unfortunately with SJWs, "intersectionality" is a thing and fatlogic and social justice intersect due to identity politics.

One way you can see identity politics from a mile away is the -ism'ing of things. I find myself cringing whenever I use a word ending with -ism now because of shit like healthism. That we can add an -ism to anything and then people can gang up with it into identifiable groups and said gang can then bully people. That -isms have become a way to invalidate legitimate, factual critique of one's position.

All identity politics do is divide and the people who use them are so desperate that they would attach -ism to any word if it furthered their goals. I vacillate between laughter and sadness.

The reason things like fatlogic are able to fester and expand is because of -isms and identity politics. Every single -ism that faces discrimination can be handled better through civil rights (assuming it's not bullshit like healthism). Any argument you can make about any sort of legitimate grievance is covered by civil rights. That's why MLK was so damn smart - he knew that was the ultimate trump card. He tried to use civil rights to bring us together, anything with an -ism puts people into gangs and then they have to argue about inclusiveness. "Does my feminism include men? Yours does, mine does not." 

With civil rights, everyone is included because identity politics and -isms take a back seat to each person being treated as someone with their own rights.These people aren't looking for a 1st place trophy, but a t-shirt that says they participated (why don't they have 4XL, shitlords!)When I was in HS, we had a name for that: "Marvin Armswing"

As in "Be careful, Marvin Armswing is coming on your 9" to get out of the way so you don't get slapped by an arm.Ssh, keep your facts away from our screed. We're making a point here!

Facts are ableist! You're ableist, therefore your facts are wrong. See, you've said nothing. Your post is blank to me. All I see is "gua gua gua, gua gua gua gua"

You are a teacher in Peanuts. I only hear trumpets.https://www.reddit.com/r/news/comments/3vu5lt/teen_who_worked_in_corner_shop_for_10_weeks_to/cxqxmns

My comment was "Internship"

I can't believe I've gotten to the point where I think that internships are comparable to indentured servitude, but it really is the same thing. It's like contractual slavery for a period of time.

It would be an interesting court case to challenge unpaid internships as being against the 13th Amendment.

If there's no way to get the job/experience without an unpaid internship, is it voluntary servitude? Couldn't you make the argument that slaves could have simply refused to work?If I said to you at 825pm "The highlight of the game would be Lucky Whitehead", you'd have said "dude, take that shit to /r/popping"I was about to say the opposite, Mike - it's a testament to the quality of the Redskins defense that they can dominate the talented Cowboys O-line like that.In Canada there's this NFLshop.com commercial called "Football is family" for the womens' NFL shop...the Seahawks woman is seriously one of the prettiest women I've ever seen. I'll be so sad when that commercial retires.I love how they're praising the pass pro and the RB fails to recognise the path of the blitzer through his gapI find that happens a lot. Whenever there's an app that Google says "no", I check on amazon and it always works (if they have it)No catch, elbow down first OOBMike took the words right out of my mouthThat play just put one of my teams into the playoffs. Woo!No Way!I don't get the Jackson haters. He's not the most complete WR, but he sure is entertaining.DAN RUMPOLE OF THE BAILEY

(seriously do you have a better nickname)A modded copy of Wizardry. With ninjas!Yea, I was wondering what the draw was to Choplifter. Once Rescue Raiders came out, I never played Choplifter again.Pretty cool, although I think back to the GMC Typhoon/Syclone trucks where they turbocharged the 4.3, which as we all know is a hacked-off V8.

It seems to me that you could also get comparable performance by going with a smaller turbo that has higher boost if you were into a 4.3 instead of the 6.0 engine. 

While I appreciate what they've done, I think about building a modern budget Syclone on the cheap and this video just makes me want to do it even more.

The old Astro/Safari vans have the same AWD system. Rather than scavenge a motor out of an Express/Savana, scavenge the AWD system out of the old smaller vans. We already know it will bolt up to the 4.3. With a 6.0, you're running out of room in there.

It just sort of surprises me that more people aren't doing that or haven't done it. You can get a 4.3 for pennies and the AWD system to match. 

Another thing is that you don't need the Ford RE because GM made a full range of their own available with the AWD system, from 308 to 410. You can take them out of any GM vehicle you like.

My friend's dad has a Syclone he bought new and we were really surprised how "off the shelf" that truck was. Really, the only thing I would change would be to get a cheap Getrag 5sp and put it on. From my understanding, the AWD system isn't dependent on the 4L60 because it's a fixed torque split anyway.

He also wouldn't have these burnout problems spooling up to 2000 rpm.http://www.sportsclubstats.com/NFL/NFC.html

1. Carolina

2. Arizona

3. Green Bay

4. Seattle

5. Minnesota

All of them have an 80%+ chance of making the playoffs, so they are virtual locks. 

Tampa, with 24.6% has virtually no chance to make it. NEVER TELL ME THE ODDS!

Tampa/Atlanta would need to finish 10-6 and hope for GB, Seattle or Minnesota to finish with 9 wins. Seattle, having just 7 wins would be the most likely candidate to go .500 and finish with 9 wins. Minnesota and GB are likely to finish with 10 wins.The advantage the Bucs have is that if they go 3-1/4-0 respectively, their conference record would stand at 8-4/9-3. 

Seattle who are 7-5 actually hold a 6-4 conference record, so despite having a poor overall record, the tiebreakers aren't completely in your favour. If you lose to Arizona and beat the Rams, you'd be 7-5 and 8-4 is the best you can do. Which would require beating the Cardinals.

It looks like the Rams as a common opponent and conference record may come down to it. 

What's interesting is that if the Vikings or Packers falter, both you and the Bucs would make it while the Packers or Vikings would be eliminated by tiebreakers if everyone is 10-6.Assuming the Packers and Vikings win out, in which case Week 17 for them is for the 2 seed.We're Team Asshole here242 is child's play compared to 105. That road is brutal. So is the one out of Sutton going to Mansonville. It's tough either way. It's not not a Subaru Success Story unless you save a Jeep.Nokians. They're ridiculous. Get some. It's like driving with cheat mode enabled.
Only if it's a 12xx cc engine (boxer you know)

Unlike a Subaru, you don't need to tear it down to the subframe to get at it, either.It would be funny if Shitavious Cook actually went to a culinary academy and learned to be a great chef and then had trouble getting people to come to his restaurant.If there's anything I learned from House, don't ever let him touch vicodin.The RB subreddit didn't agree and the Harmonix employees there saw me get massively downvoted every time I said to go subscription.

They sold out to the short-sighted people who way over-invested in DLC. Hardcore users aren't the key. Selling access for $4.99/mo will get way more people playing. Bundling it with Spotify or something for a few bucks more would be genius, especially with a mobile app.I wish Rock Band had Guitar Hero's system.

GH is a bad game with a great premise. RB is a perfected game with a terrible method of accessing content.

GH is unplayable compared to RB. RB is unplayable unless you want to spend thousands on DLC. GH are getting paid to advertise music. They're smart. If your support social justice over civil rights and civil liberties, you are regressive. It's not enough to just differentiate between progressive and regressive ideas, but also to point out the differences between civil rights and social justice/civil liberties and censorship.It happened when the left stopped being progressive.

It happened when we all forgot what civil rights were and why they were the goal of the progressive left.Atheism isn't moderate, it's binary.

That's why you guys and I disagree. I'm agnostic. That's moderate. There's no winners here, only losers.

I do think Chip could have called plays that were to the strength of Murray at a minimum, but I blame Murray for signing with the Eagles knowing what their offensive system was.

Murray only has a complaint to Lurie if Chip promised him a different style of play and didn't deliver.

The article doesn't say that.So you're saying Cleveland is healthy?People love the NFL because there's at least the potential of parity and good playoffs.

The culture of college football is completely different.

Growing up on the west coast, having the Pac-10 be ignored in arbitrary polls and then the BCS being a fraud soured me and I've never really come back. 

I haven't watched much college football for a long time. I hate the SEC now with a passion and it seems like that's always what's on.Can confirm, my #1 all-IDP team has David.Eddie LacySince we can't link to other subreddits

http://imgur.com/yr8DUKW

Shame because it's a hell of an interesting thread.I agree with you. I think he's a smart coach who's been dealt an impossible hand.

Comparing his situation to Baltimore's is a joke. The Ravens are a solid franchise with no external drama - only injuries. The Chargers have more injuries than anyone realises if they haven't seen their games and how many guys go down during the game and come back to play injured (or not at all).

He's done an incredible job with what he's got.&gt; McCoy is pretty much out the door, wasting another year in Rivers' prime

http://www.pro-football-reference.com/players/R/RivePh00.htm

Except that he rescued Rivers' career. His first year was 2013 when Rivers tied his all-time highest QB rating of 105.5

I fucking hate this McCoy narrative so much. Everyone has just decided the guy sucks and he doesn't suck. He's to be praised for doing so much with so little.The Saints should let Payton go somewhere else and take Drew Brees with them for a metric fuckton of draft picks and/or players.

They'd never do it, but sending Brees and Payton to the Lions and sending back Stafford + draft picks would make a whole lot of sense for both teams. 

I like the Lions defense, I like their receivers and I like their backs - for Brees and Payton. 

Those RBs there are perfect for what Payton does. That's my main one. What he'd do with those TEs who need tutelage? Amazeballs. And we don't even need to mention Tate and...oh yeah, that Megatron guy.

Unfortunately both Megatron and Brees are tied for 1st for the worst contract in the NFL and there's no way either of them would fit without both agreeing to take way less money.

Honourable Mention: Jeff Fisher is a toolThe original definition of "emasculate" was castration.

Now it's a figurative way to say it, with the notion that men have power because of their genitals.

Idiot.Yup. I'm still in first. Just waiting for him to heat up so I can go from competitive to dominant in threes.This sounds like the makings of an epic "my car burned to the ground" story where the penny created an arc/heat that in turn incinerated the toothpick, causing a fire and...Yeah just take the trim piece off and clean it out.Three: restaurant pies are kept in their own fridge because pies are magnets for fridge smellsKyle should be the perfect QB for Ryan in the sense that Ryan is a short progression QB; he's not the most comfortable QB in the pocket and likes to make his decision and get rid of the ball quickly. I've said this often and /r/nfl and also said that he would be perfect with Gary Kubiak.

In fact, the "target one guy" thing is a hallmark of those offenses. It's not because of imbalance or lack of creativity, it's that the philosophy requires quick decisions and throws, which is Matt's strength.

I bet you if FO or PFF were to calculate time in fractions of second from snap to throw, Matt would be well over 2.3 seconds in the last 7 games and also since Kyle got here.

The breakdown is correct from Kyle's point of view and it's no different than when Kubiak benched Schaub.

Ryan either has no time to throw or he takes too long to throw. He's checking down, too. I remember that game where Coleman caused all of those turnovers. Not Matt's fault, he just has to check down quickly. Which is a fair criticism of the offense, but in reality Julio/Andre Johnson/the #1 WR needs to get open quickly for quick read/react offenses that don't do much in the way of adjustment, but execution.

Since it's an execution-based offense you have to blame the people not executing, ie the players.

Hate to defend Kyle, but at a minimum he's technically right.&gt; You're unemployed because you waste your time doing stuff like this instead of looking for a job.

hahahahahaha

Hey, is it better to send resumes at 1am or 4am? Which looks less drunk and sleeplessly desperate?

Please give us your own "loser's guide to getting a job" so we know.Whoa, hey. Let's not get drastic.If there's one thing I'm sure of having seen you play them, PHI is a complete trap game for you guys and all bets are off with them.I love his voice.

Seriously that could be on /r/asmrYou earned the early year ranking too.I don't know if we're matchup-proof yet, but it's funny to say that the Cardinals and...yes, Jaguars could probably beat Denver anywhere simply because they don't seem to be affected by great defenses.

I think I put it in a blurb earlier, but one team we played went from #1 to #5 after playing us. Although I think we've looked beatable at times whereas Jacksonville always look desperate and end up moving the ball. 

In the game vs Cincy we should have ramped it up, but folded to their defense. I think you can do that to us.

OTOH, this might be like last week's Jaguars game where it's two teams approaching 40. I do believe Brock's got that capability in his arm. Our defense is certainly capable of allowing that much, I'll tell you that.

EDIT: kinda off-topic, but Jacksonville and Pittsburgh might be the two best teams to miss the playoffs this yearAny word on your defense getting healthy? Short time frame...Me too.

I live in constant fear of dropping dead.My friend teaches in South Central and East LA and it's exactly the same, except it's high school and he has less than zero sympathy for the kids at this point.

Initially my reaction is "that's horrible, they're kids", but when he tells me about them I think "wow, they're violent criminals who are mostly irredeemable."

That's the real story. Not the left/right dichotomy of "we should do more" vs "they have to be responsible for themselves at some point". It's that there's a sociopathic society creating dangerous people who are maladapted to function in society on a productive level and there's no easy way to fix it.

I tend to agree with his theory that the schools fuck these people up so that the police and prisons get plenty of money. He says that if they spent more on education instead of what they spend on justice that we wouldn't need all of these police and jails. They don't even ask for that much money while the police and prison systems get enough to pay for school necessities many times over.

I even ask him if here's there for like 1 kid, the one he can save. He says there's none. He just goes where they send him because he's good at handling the worst kids...probably because it's too late for them by the time he gets there and he doesn't have any illusions about them.Which is another good thing about basting - you lower the temp when you add the water which will slow down the yolks.

As someone who likes to dip toast in egg yolk, that's the way to go.I know I was unlucky this year. I often am. My theory is that I draft too well/do FAs too well and create super-teams who beat me and weak teams who are desperate and have flukey weeks. 

I might do an /r/dataisbeautiful post this year as I mainly keep my stats to myself, but I do a few dozen leagues per year so that I have a good idea of what the data looks like and I would say that in the majority of leagues I'm top 3-4 in points and points scored against me.

I have more deserving teams who are on the bubble than I do undeserving teams who are in. So far I think I'm gonna make 42/5x playoffs, but it's close. I'm getting hammered. A lot. 

Another thing is ties. I'd be curious to know what the rate of ties are in ESPN, but I always seem to get more than I think I should.After they took the scissors, they gave him one of these:

http://www.lowes.com/pd_307103-995-34260_0__?productId=3032230Seriously why are they mirroring everything from reddit? To archive? Try and steal passwords?Seems these days that one has to fail for the other to make it...the alternative is both fail.

Read FPS sometime. Most of the stories have one person escaping and their circle doubling down on the KFC Double Downs. Well done. We're all rooting for you. IMO, Blount hasn't looked good and the line isn't helping him.

The Pats do what the Pats do because they have the luxury of picking the way the beat you.

They're so bad and injured right now that I'm not sure they have any other choice except to ride the hot hand.

I'm like...60-40 White is going to be productive enough to slot in there.I knew it was bad when he went down because it didn't seem appropriate for the play. 

Sucks. Lions fans patience with Stafford is Jesus-likeBest defense in the NFL?

Two stud CBs?

Amari don't care.OAK 7 DEN 3 in the 2nd

Things no one would have believed in August?This constipation/opioid commercial is fucking surreal.

Why did he take the underneath route that wasn't at the first down marker?!?Cute tryTom Brady hasn't been on his back this much since his first date with GiseleThis is finally what we've waited to see from BrownJohnson does all the work, other Johnson gonna get the credit with a goal-line TD?

EDIT: yupEverywhere there are fantasy owners going "Damn, wrong Johnson"Generally speaking when I watch football, I can tell the play for the offense before the snap.

With the Lions, I really have no idea what they're going to do.

And I don't mean that in a good way. Because I don't think they know, either.This is just sad nowWhat can Brown do for you?

Apparently snatch TDs out of the air.Tom "The Vulture" BradySince when is it Cat An Zare Oh anyway?

I thought it was Cat An Czar OhI like the play concept there but the ball was a hot air balloon thereThe Lions are like the Penguin meme today

* Get a great return at an opportune time

* Have it called back by a flagLet's see some Manning Magic here

EDIT: well it looks like his spell explodedMan, Weeden had Chandler Jones wide open but couldn't make the connectionI'm ridin' the Riddick train

Choo choo

/yeah I know what I saidCome on Lions, they're gonna play soft D with 54 seconds left. Do something.

EDIT: ^^^sigh...Just speaking generally, CJ0.5k has been a breath of fresh air this year. It seems like his mental preparation has finally caught up to his physical gifts. Every time he runs I like what he's doing. No more "cutting it outside no matter what" and dancing around. He's seeing the defense for the first time in his career and winning with his mind and not just his legs.That tackling is revoltingIt's interesting to note that the people who support this course of action would call you a "bleeding heart liberal" for even challenging their wrongdoing.Can you lend me a few bucks?

"How much you need?"

About ~~tree fiddy~~ $96,481&gt; I agree, it seems the medical staff should be disbarred

The county should have known to hire MDs rather than JDs.

"What, you mean Juris Doctor isn't the same thing?"

Well, at least they didn't hire PhDs.They need to expand that Heisman Infographic from earlier in the game to compare what Woodson has done to ManningNice second effort whether he gets it or notBob, Bob, Bob, Bob, Bob and Bob&gt;I've been busy recently and haven't really been active in r/ragenchastain. 

Neither has she...metaI think she would have written better and been error-free. &gt; I'd just as soon get the digest version from reading bob mcbobs summaries of what she's spouting.

Praise red boxes of text. Saves me from having to feel ill from embarrassment for her by reading more than a few words of her self-induced humiliation.I like that they are open and up-front about referring to it as a con.There's someone who is often cited (and I've commented about him before) - I want to say he's attached to a university in Ontario and does these.

He is completely full of shit. These doctors ought to be put under review for their irresponsible behaviour.

You can be born the wrong physical gender and doctors make you wait forever to get that corrected surgically, but if you're fat you can just pay like it's a nose job or something cosmetic?

I don't think so.&gt; I feel like a bad person

So did I, and then I realised I wasn't bamboozling emotionally fragile overweight people to lie about every aspect of my life in a quest to defraud them with an IRONMAN and remembered what truly bad people are.No matter what she will claim victory over herself and her detractors.

Also maybe we'll hear about all of the encouragement she got from people who worshipped her at the race because she's "one of them" - no more conflict from Ragen. Nosireebob_mcbob - she is living fat acceptance in her mind. 

She's basically Ellen Burstyn's character from Requiem For A Dream at this point. Well this is getting out of hand nowThey were softening up the Lions with the Johnsons so Ellignton could get hisYou ever have a dream that's also a nightmare?

I can imagine Lions fans dreaming "man, imagine if we had an offense that was normal and just used Theo Riddick to run normal plays and gain a few yards" and then you go to sleep at night and your dream is what they actually do. It's one of those confusing dreams that makes no sense. You want to wake up, but you just have to endure it until it's over.

That's how I feel before the game and now waiting for quadruple zeroes on the clock.I've never wanted a beige truck, but that beige Tacoma looks pretty goodDude, Cardinals. Stop throwing. I don't know what your obsession is with reaching 50 points in a game but let it go.Wow, nice play!Lions fans, I've officially seen enough of Joe Lombardi.We've reached Madden Time where they've got Taylor in so that all RBs on your team can get a TDTony Romo can't get back soon enoughWow that's great, but neither of those examples have jack shit to do with what happened in Seattle.DAE think there's a giant Microsoft Surface tablet under that hood and it's being hidden from us because they're afraid Apple will make a 42" iPad?I don't think we thought they'd go 0-5, but we thought they would struggle with a brutal schedule.

What we didn't think was that Detroit would look that bad going 0-5

Because the rest of the schedule after this is winnable, but only to a team that's playing well. Unnecessary Roughness?

Unnecessary Blitz is more like it.

Let's wrap this up. Come on.In a year of disappointing kickers, there's Gostkowski and there's everybody elseIs your team ahead by 2 with 2 minutes left?

Oh no, gonna play Prevent and lose the game.

Ahead by 5+ touchdowns?

Blitz on every play.

Shouldn't those be reversed?It has been tough. The Raiders really took it to the Broncos RBsI dunno why he keeps picking on Chung, dude is on point this set of downsDenver, you are the best team in the NFL

(at winning ugly)Brandon Weeden ought to take some advice from 12-year olds at this pointDude, I make my eggs with oil in a wok and I'm white. I have a setup of a pot of oil (usually hot) next to my wok, I ladle in the oil with my wok spatula, spread it around and pour it out and then put my eggs in the wok with no flame. I swirl them around until they set and then...

* scramble them

-or-

* fold them and make a paper-thin omelette. 

Butter is just for taste, but not with scrambled or omelettes. You want oil. If I'm feeling different I use 50-50 olive oil and butter, but not usually. Butter is best for regular fried eggs because it's salty and adds flavour. Scrambled eggs or omelettes usually have something else to add flavour.

All I can say is that if you use oil with scrambled eggs, you will never need a nonstick pan and the same goes for an omelette. I don't own any nonstick cookware and my omelettes never break or tear because I use oil as you do.Ouch. Sorry Johnny.That's why they're better this year than last year. When they win close games they look confident.Push with Bush?

Push push in the Bush. In honour of Al Michaels, the "Push Push In The Bush" song:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1PmX1xcCjfMWestern PA livin'Come on SF...oh wait, the fans expected thatDwayne Hair-usRagen, let me make those questions "bashing" for you:

* Besides referring to a fat, disgusting piece of shit human being who is worthless and should kill themselves; an Alaskan dog

* Like Chubby Chasers, Plumper Humpers and other disgusting men, this word also refers to a ship's direction

I'm already bored. 

YOU'RE BORING US RAGEN. TRY HARDER. I AM NOT ENTERTAINED. THE LESBIAN ANGLE IS WEAK AND BORING.

Those are what insults look like. Then again, that's all you and your followers hear regardless of what is said.The only thing I agree with is that you have very little control.I just read her Jeopardy thing and I think she's self-deluded enough to stretch anything into anything.That replay angle really says a lot. Beckham knew he needed to adjust his comeback route to help his QB in trouble, kept the location of the CB in his radar (literally) and saved a busted play.Hyde or Celek, take your pick.The real hero of that scoring drive was the ticky tack PI that put the Niners on the 15Snee looks really strange with a defined neck and facial featuresSay what you will about "SNF duds" but this game got better as it went along and the subplot of Hayne and Whitlock have been pretty cool.He'd totally let his clock expire with 2 seconds to goIt was that or Dick ToiletWHATEVER YOU DO, DON'T GIVE HIM A CORTISONE INJECTIONThe dreaded double-barrel hammy aggravation I don't know why they abandoned the run, periodHerbert the Pervert has some advice for Odell Beckham on the sideline:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Vz8qh_l0BWA&amp;feature=youtu.be&amp;t=5Ok, we need another OT game.

What's the record?Well the reality is that you should tear those pages out of the playbook since there's no time working on them with backupsSince we feel bad for that PI call, we'll give you 3 seconds. Are we even now?Pot, meet giant mixing bowlMakeup call?&gt; some theoretical superiority of Coleman

This has never been an objective assessment, just wishful thinking by his delusional owners.

Going back to last year it was clear what Freeman could do. If you watched their games it's clear who the more experienced back is.

Coleman owners are like people arguing for Terrance Williams to be the #1 guy when Dez Bryant returns. It's retarded. It's detached from reality.I never planned to sell Freeman. I have said since August that it's his job.I did close to 50 leagues and while I don't have an exact count, I'd say I had JC in at least a dozen of them. 

The only handcuff I took was Knile Davis, but I started dropping him last week and this week (what timing, eh?) and my karma destroyed Jamaal's knee and I apologise. 

However, if I had him I think I would waive him for West.

Knile Davis has always had really deceptive stats because he'll rush 5 times for 3 yards per carry and once for 15 and people go "wow, he averaged 5.0 YPC" but it's not True. He doesn't work like that. I don't really think he's a very effective back. 

Of course I will change my target of West if the news changes leading up to Tuesday waivers, but I'm fairly confident West will be the guy with most of the work there and at least marginally ownable. 

I don't have a huge amount of evidence to say "Oh, West" - only what I saw today which was that he was alright on short notice. He obviously needs more time working with the first team offense and knowing the playbook, which is why Davis could have an opening, but he's really better than Knile from a talent standpoint.I have...I want to say 2 teams in the top 1% of all ESPN and they both have JC.

I will bet you that he appears among the top 3 players on teams who are 5-0 or in the top whatever percent of all teams.If you can only pick one, go with West.

If you have to rank them both, rank West higher.

In a similar amount of work, West looks to be better and more stable. Davis could get short yardage and goal line work due to his size, but the overall more versatile back is West.Perhaps. I'd wager the majority of teams who are winning leagues have Rodgers, Gronkowski and or some WRs - however the WRs who are the best might be ones like James Jones who were undrafted.

I know this: in nearly 50 leagues, whether I went 0RB or not, my teams are successful because of late round and waiver wire picks, not my initial strategy in the first 2-3 picks. 

I have teams which are heavy on RB and are doing fine. 

Would you like to see the roster of my best team, which is the top 1% of all teams on ESPN?

QB: Ryan, Roethlisberger, Newton

RB: Charles, Freeman, Bell, Foster, Ellington

WR: Maclin, James Jones, Hurns

TE: Clay, Olsen, Julius Thomas

DST: Giants (streaming)

K: Gostkowski

I mean, I'm pretty much 0WR there and have had Bell suspended and dealt with Big Ben being injured. And before anyone asks - I know how to auction. I have a dozen teams similar to this.

You tell me. I have no WRs at all. RB seems pretty valuable to me, provided you get the right ones.Do you have the capability of backward time travel?

No?

Crap.

He's just there to waste a spot on your bench until told otherwise.He looked like crap, TBH. I owned him in a few leagues going into this week and I will have zero problems waiving him outright for whoever replaces  Jamaal Charles or...pretty much anything.

A lot of people shit on Sankey, but all I see from the Titans are their RBs getting flushed out to the edges looking for holes that don't appear. It doesn't say anything about Andrews' talent vs McCluster's vs Sankey's or whatever, but of the O-line. I don't trust them to get the RB position right and when it does go right, I'd say your odds are 40-Andrews/40-Sankey/20-McCluster percent you guess the right guy.

&gt;but did catch about 50 yds

You can't predict garbage yards. From a statistical analysis standpoint you are giving that too much weight. In context...if I were a bookie giving you odds on a prop bet for "garbage time yards for an RB in the passing game", I'd have to do like 5-1 which is 20%

When you figure he's maybe 40% to get work and of that 40% he's got 1-5 odds to get garbage passing yards...I...how do you win there? You just plug and pray. There's no educated advice to give and you're way overplaying your Andrews hand here. Don't come here looking for a circlejerk over your picking the dude when you ought to be begging for a dose of reality to bring you back down to earth.

/downvote away Andrews owners (if you can reach the keyboard from patting yourselves on the back)&gt; he will alternate between 8 point weeks and 18+ point weeks

So far he's 5, 20, 18, 8 and 6. By the rotation it looks like next week is 19! Prepare the "Manning's Back!!!" circlejerk thread! Alert the moderators to schedule it for a week from now!It's explainable - he's throwing ducks. His velocity is all over the place. 

His receivers have to worry about getting blown up because the balls aren't arriving on time.Dalton and Tyrod are still unowned in a lot of leagues. If it came down to it, I would waive him for either of those guys. Not only that, but Glen Campbell made it sound so lonely.This guy sounds peeved. Maybe they use a bot like those /r/offmychest wackosIt's not the $10, it's the principle.

I can afford the $10. IDGAF about $10. I don't want an advantage that other people who are price-sensitive/conscious don't have.

When I think of some kid who's saved up his money to make what is a relatively major purchase of $60, that extra $10 might be another week's allowance and he's behind everyone who gets out of the gate and grinds. I guess he could catch up if he saved his money? But you lose that whole first week.

It's always about "you", dude.

EDIT: To add, before you or anyone else say anything, I owned two video game stores. I've sold more games than I can count. Price matters to a lot of people.Nowandthen?I would say that at some point the novelty would wear off and you'd see a doctor, but apparently we've yet to reach that yet.&gt;Anyone know how to make this in a crock pot and taste exactly like the ones at an indian resturant?

'tis impossible

Even the sauce is not a slow-cooked sauce. It's all "instant" food. The only "slow cooking" is the chicken marinade in your fridge. 

Without the benefit of a tandoori oven, the best I can tell you is to do this:

Get a ceramic pizza stone and put some foil on it and put it in your oven under high broil until the oven is 500F

Take your chicken that's in small bits and put it on a metal skewer. Put it under the broiler and turn it to cook it. Once it starts to char, it's done on that side. 

Make the sauce instantly: you need garlic and ginger (in a paste if lazy) and then equal parts cream and tomato. That's it. If you want it spicy, add in red chili oil. 

The chicken simply gets tossed in the sauce. It pretty much defeats the purpose because you're not trying to get tender chicken that falls apart, you want flashed heat that sears it and seals it all in.

It's really no trouble. As I said in my main post, it takes a few minutes at most to completely cook it under a broiler in the oven. I don't think that's bronzer, I think that's genuine leather. What does she think, fat is just attached to your insides like plaque waiting to be roto rootered out?

That's your high cholesterol diet, dear.If you have an Aldi near you, they have a special purchase standalone model for $29 right now. Even makes rice.&gt; I pooped water in the end.

So sly.Or...or...stay with me here:

* You could shake some powdered parmesan cheese on the grease and make it extra yummy

Or...wait, there's more...

* You just not eat pizza because it's a carb/fat-heavy calorie bomb of 200-300 calories **per fucking slice of it**

Yeah, you might save 2 pounds and gain 28 instead of 30. If you care about your weight, pizza is just about the worst goddamned thing you can choose to stuff down your gullet. I think about that picture of the two women with the table-sized pizza who are guzzling straight from the 2L bottles of cola - must be genetics!&gt; Of course I am sure one under the influence of FA would miss that message entirely and substitute their own.

If you put green peppers on it, their skins are indigestible which burns calories. Pizza burns calories! The more you eat, the more you'll burn!I think what they're getting at is that good restaurants don't cut corners with part-skim mozzarella and use fattier cheese and the meats on it are very greasy.I don't eat Dominoes and maybe it's them or Pizza Hut, but one of them actually greases their pans in butter oil to crisp the crust. How do you dab that?They stopped giving sex tips after their readership stopped having sex.Or they're illiterate. Sam was really disappointed when he learned his name wasn't "Felcher"The showers were the only place the Patriots and Scott Pioli hadn't bugged.It's not companies, it's self-sponsorship. You gotta make your own way. Your degree helps as does your French and English fluency, but you need those years of work experience in your field to pump up your point score for immigration.

It'll take a few years. It's faster to come do postgraduate work and work in your field. Flipping your student visa to a job or permanent residency is easier and likely faster than waiting for your own sponsorship.He should be prone to saying it your way anyway as the word native to him is pronounced "toe-maht" - all he'd need to do is add the "oh" and his native word is the Queen's English!I live in a place more to the left than Bernie Sanders and adjacent to where he's from (Quebec borders Vermont) and all of these things work fine here.

We have a high minimum wage (relative to our cost of living) and virtually no one makes it anyway. Only kids working at McDo make it - stuff like that. Our college is ridiculously cheap, but you also get paid bursaries to go. We regulate costs, which would need to happen in the US along with medical and drug prices. 

It works.Yeah, one thing I disagree with Bernie on is repatriating foreign income. It's already been taxed once abroad where it was made. If BMW makes money in the USA, they pay US taxes here as they should. They don't then pay additional German tax on what they made here.

Republicans talk about simplifying the tax code, but it should be for corporations to remove all of the loopholes.

&gt;and that corporations can and do relocate operations to such countries.

If I went back into business for myself, I wouldn't incorporate in the USA and I would do my best to avoid doing business there because of tax laws. If they fixed them? Fine. As it stands now? No.I always think of two things when I see these.

One, there should be a federal law that allows people to dissolve the HOA if there's a majority wanting to get out. That way the HOA would then have to work for the good of all. If it was too oppressive, the HOA would disappear altogether.

The second is that places that have laws about upkeep don't have/need them. Those laws should supersede HOAs as well. If your community has a law to keep your lawn orderly, shovel your sidewalk of snow or not keep broken down vehicles on your grass, what do you need a HOA to do?

I can understand strata/condo associations needing more say because of common walls, hallways, etc. But you should still not hang your laundry on your balcony./r/raisedbynarcissists

Someone find these kids and send them there.

"I'm punishing my kids to support my own opinions and to have power over them."Fat money spends just as well as thin money.I wonder about the legality of this and if it's why she's stalling. Maybe she's saying she's starting her long run so we can't say "you don't look very flustered after such a long run"

As it always goes with Ragen, things are ambiguous and they don't mean what we think she's said.&gt; and a not particularly expressive face?

This is a woman who can talk for 2 minutes without blinking&gt; She claimed at the beginning that taking a selfie is a "reward" for finishing a workout

So she's been eating them.So wait a minute - this person is harassing you via PM and wants to report *you* for harassment?

Further proof that fatlogic is nothing more than fat narcissism. 

If anything people who send threatening PMs should have their messages screencapped and posted everywhere to show others what they're doing.If you do things to try and evoke a reaction out of people, at least be accountable for doing it. When I do things to challenge people I'm at least aware of what I'm doing. 

Anyway, I do agree that she's doing well to define beauty standards. By me seeing her, my standards have moved their goalposts and she doesn't meet them. Now I don't think bodycon dresses are sexy, but only sexy in certain contexts. I have to say that Tevin Coleman speculators have been the most obnoxious football phenomenon since 2013 Broncos fans and any news that makes Freeman sound better is poetic karma that I welcome.

Check yourselves.A good start would be stopping downvoting people who are trying to tell you the truth despite it not suiting your opinion.

No amount of downvoting or wishful thinking is going to make the Falcons use him, ok?

Calm your collective nuts and throw some upvotes around to make up for the people who had downvote tantrums.This is all irrelevant as it's a simple math problem: 25% of 25 carries isn't enough for him be useful or reliable.&gt; I'm under the impression that Coleman is superior in talent to Freeman

I don't know why people keep saying that. 

Coleman is superior in *height* to Freeman. Which, if you weigh at least 220-240 is alright.

Both are just under 210 and Freeman is supposedly about 5'10" and Coleman is 6'1". 

6'1"/205 is the size of a WR, not an RB. 6'1" and 240 is a bruising back. He needs to bulk up because he's not going to win leverage being too tall to get low and underneath anyone.

Potential talent? Freeman is playing almost flawless football. Coleman is inexperienced. Maybe he gets to 100% of his potential. Freeman is there.LOL at the downvotes. You're right. OP took that quote out of context. It was only True for a short period of time. Before they said that, they said Freeman was the starter. Then they said it was an open competition.

Using only the quotes that suit your argument is dishonest and unhelpful here.I think you're both right in your own way.

I'm not a Falcons fan, only someone who watches every game and has no emotional investment or opinion in anyone. I am completely neutral and agnostic and will use whoever is the best bet. I have no attachment to anything other than reality.

Freeman (like Ryan) have both taken a big step forward.

In August I wanted to go into your subreddit and say "yo, the Falcons are for real this year" after watching your preseason games...but you guys already had it covered. All I could do was reflect it in the /r/nfl power rankings (which I did) and go from there.

What we've seen is both Ryan and Freeman take a HUGE step forward to the next level which is why these close 4th quarter games don't make me nervous. Ryan is there. And so is Freeman.

Which is why /u/IceMaine is right as well - last year's assessment, especially the inside running? He wasn't there. But he's shedding first contact or just outrunning it. He's hitting the right hole every time. He's better than Alfred Morris because Alfred takes longer to pick his hole. Freeman knows where it's going to be before it happens. He's unconscious right now. He's just completely different this year.

The only thing he can't fix is being small. He's at his maximum muscle for his body. All he can do is add fat, which would slow him down.Heathus savesLove us or hate us, at least we're entertainingI like that call. We can beat the Chargers DBs deep because aerodynamics will slow them down due to their massive hair.I get the feeling he or DeA willPretty good. I hear he'll be evolving to Raittaochu once they figure out how to make their logo into Thunder Stones.They saw the zone and split it right to Gates.

Veteran vision.We show the same thing, they do the same thing.

Again, these guys have a mental link.Not that Jarvis could cover Gates, but that's an obvious thing to audible to.Bell couldn't win. Two people to block coming from different directions. Only one Bell.Thank You Teo for being slow and letting us have positive yards instead of negativeSan Diego. You can beat us. Don't make mistakes. Don't commit stupid penalties.That play was a great example of a disguise - we make it look like everyone is covered except for Gordon, but we kept a bracket over him expecting him to get the dumpoff and he did.Huh? We came out in the wildcatYeah that penalty on the punt return was very helpfulIT WAS RAINING LIGHTNING BOLTS IN THERE MIKEWE GOT ZAPPED, MIKEBecause we need this win badlyNow keep doing that exact same play until we win.I was gonna say Bell ought to get flagged there...That's right, Mike. Gruden is wrong. Brown should not have made a move at all.I've wondered for a long time what it would take to get refs to call that one and apparently it's fighting for the catch.

You're supposed to give a "halo" around the guy of 2 yards and no one even ever gets called on that. This is one of the worst-enforced penalties, although they got it 100% right that time.With Allen out, San Diego can throw to their Allen over the middle. Or Stevie.Even though Rivers welcomes the blitz, I'm nervous that we're not abandoning it despite it working.Timmons on Inman?!?

Great vision Rivers.PA attitude&gt; Theyre like misquitos.

Is that a quito that is improper?Native San Diegan here: you are given a choice as a child - masochism or freedomPhysically we can beat San Diego up front, but if we keep doing this they can run blitz us from the edge and we're boned.Oh hey more penalties

EDIT: the team that wants to win should let the other team get all of the flagsOMG REFS AND PLAYERS WOULD ALL FUCK OFF WITH THE PENALTIES AND PLAY FOOTBALLLOL he likes Cock(rell)Holy shit guys, this redditor has real-life friends.

What are you, a wizard?You lost a SB to a team that lost a playoff game to TebowSo a half-fullback?

I propose we call it an optimistback.I hate how those terrorists always have awesome Toyota 4x4s like the HiluxYeah Jon because Vick isn't known for his progression skills, but his "staring down his target" skills.It also needs beaches and beautiful people to be on them.That wasn't a huge play, but it was one of the best cutback runs by anyone in the NFL this year.Bell using all the trigger buttons on his controller for that runIngram shoots in the hole

(ha ha)ITT: lack of SkyCam consensusYeah but Verrett has been on Brown like glue all night.Wow so I guess that SC job is gonna be open after all.

GL Steve.If he keeps making them, I propose we call him by his actual name due to earning itSo...does this mean we should all bother learning this PK's name?Holy shit we pushed that guy right into Rivers!San Diego should have challenged that. It wasn't too vague to overturn.Teo's slowness is actually helping him because Brown and now Bell can't juke him because he isn't quick enough to get out of their way when he falls for the move!Man no one could get a hand on him and slow him downSan Diego's average starting position has to be like the 10 yard line by nowTuitt can do two guys at once

/nastyTomlin managing the clock properly?

Chargers first down confirmed.That was the first time Rivers was able to connect with Allen on a crossing route during the blitz.Your son's a RB?

You didn't even say he's the best ever?

No fatherly pride?

No Gruden bluster?

Man, he must *really suck*Harrison was looking pick 6Eventually?That Lambo is pulling to the leftI think that in situations like that, there's zero cause for celebration.Wow...we got a turnover?Man, I'm really looking forward to us taking advantage of this field position and driving down to FG range and then throwing deep on 3rd down after losing enough yardage to make the kick impossible and punting again.Down inside the 5. Where Rivers feels most at home.I love how Dupree made the flappy hands as if it would make him fly to RiversRight as Dupree made that sack, my Mets just got a 3-run homer from CespedesWe'd be down by 4, except it would be 31-27Bell if you see Teo bracketing you, RUN PAST HIM. He can't turn around and follow or jump to deflect a pass over his head!Deja vu!That should be flag illegal man upfieldWe should show up in Steelers gear for the other two games and yell "HEEEATH" the whole timeOnly us melting down can melt down steel beamsYou shouldn't care what butthurt people think.Casa Guadalajara?

Fidel's in Solana Beach FTWVick was serious about believing he was a Charger there with that throwYo Keenan, you need to see a better barber. What's up with those scabs?666?

Hail Satan!If yellow flags are your sexual fetish, you are probably about to explode from sexual tensionThat woman has impressive molesPED withdrawal.I had to rewind my PVR just to watch Rivers rise up from the bottom of my screen. I don't know why I found that so amusing, but I did.How do you let Gates get that much separation on a blitz? He has to throw EARLYIf you are asking for statistics: Fantasy football is not a science. Like economics it's science-y, but it's also an art.

If you are asking whose opinions are most right and why: there's an art to it, which is intuition and that's certainly not scientific

There are no experts. There are only professional guesses.This game...I couldn't even fully enjoy that TD because of fear of the flag being on us since they have been so capricious.We're one pump chumpsFlowers needs to get a weave. He can't cover without hair extensions.If you hear the crowd and it's really loud, the Steelers did well. If you hear the crowd and it's quiet, the Chargers did well.Former San Diegan Adrian Gonzalez just homered. LAD 4 NYM 10Unzips...go on...No Jon, I love rugbyAfter a few of those middle throws to Gates you'd think someone would raise a hand and try to deflect it/r/Showerthoughts - Malcom Floyd should be allowed to wear all-pink like DeAngelo wanted and he could be Pink FloydMaybe if they both gain 90 pounds we can arrange thatSC about SC and SCThe girlfriend might be imaginary, but the pain is realIf you're a Raiders fan, watching DHB with us has to...not compute. At least it stopped the clock?That was "timely"We're lucky Wheaton didn't get called for holding there.I'd throw that play SD has used to Gates right here and try to run it in from 20 outPlease reset the game clock to 6 secondsThese officials suck. They missed obvious holding on Wheaton during the Vick run and they failed to remember to reset the clock to 6 seconds.Helmet to helmet dudeOh my heartI love that cameraman in the red. So San Diego:

* Shortie over long sleeved T-shirt

* Floral type of surf print

* Tan

* Sun bleached hairYou couldn't overturn that.IS THIS THE REAL LIFEI HEREBY BAN BANNING UPVOTE PARTY BANSThe people who get audited are the ones who take every possible damned deduction. 

Look - if you don't feel comfortable right now, just buy it. Keep everything from the purchase and re-file your taxes to get money back once you know it's alright. I watched Tomlin's presser and that was like the 3rd question he was asked and he said he didn't know/care and seemed annoyed. 

In the late 80's/early 90's I used to play fantasy football with a guy from Seattle whose dad was the clock operator for the Seahawks and his dad got fired for doing something similar. When they talk about "hometown" vs "visiting" clock...according to him these guys know what they're doing and the officials need to watch them otherwise they'll just do whatever. 

Now look, it could just be an honest mistake, but according to my friend Mike, his dad did this shit all the time. The teams knew it, everyone in the league knew it, but as long as it wasn't egregious it was part of the game. If you let it lapse that long it's on the officials to fix or catch. They didn't. They didn't even reset the clock on the 2nd to last play with the penalty after it ran down to 5 seconds. 

It's an interesting game of politics for the NFL because if they demand the Chargers fire the guy, they are also admitting the officials weren't keeping time as they are supposed to do. If they just say "it was an error", this clock operator will have gotten away with it. And don't tell me it's a mistake. It's their god damned only job. How convenient. 

Also Mike was amazing. He'd down a pitcher of beer and then ride his sportbike home. Never crashed, never got a DUI. I'm not sure how I'm supposed to feel here.

SBNation are owned by Vox Media, who suck ass.

Deadspin are Gawker, who are cancer.

And the NFL are being assholes and Goodell is a dildo.He had just done the ESPN interview right before that and she grabbed him while he was already on the way outDem penalties doeHe's got "Tevin Coleman Syndrome"IMO, Jason Witten is the best TE the NFL has ever seen (by a mile) and Heath Miller is about 80% of Jason Witten.

Make of that what you will.TE is such a varied position that it's going to reflect what you value in a TE, which is apparently pass-catching.

Those top 3 of yours are guys I would never want blocking for me. The ones you have most likely ahead of him, only one is a blocker of any renown - Witten. 

The young guys you named are not even remotely close in blocking ability. 

If it's overall TE, as in being able to pass block, run block and pass catch, it's Witten and then Miller.

If it's pass catching only? Heath is barely in the Top 10.

Heath is far more valuable to his team than everyone you named except for Witten and Gronk.I keep a Lumia with Here Maps around just in case.The only problem is you can't move the maps to your SD card.Oh shit, she's gonna add shit like esquire to her name.

When people go "you're not a lawyer", she'll just say "yes, but I apprenticed for a knight in England. You probably never heard of him."I don't get it. Is this "celebrate diversity" person going to celebrate the fitspo crowd?

If everyone is worthy of respect, why pick on people who want to inspire others to be the best they can be?&gt;In reality they\u2019re not even groups, just lame thieves.

Well I'm glad we can tell the difference between the "lame" and "awesome" ones.

He's in complete denial about what he does.I wasn't. Tonight was extremely situational. 

If you want encouragement, encouragement looks like...getting a ground game going. Him dominating and them not taking him out.

He got stuffed when it counted and garbage yards when it didn't.

Fantasy is about hedging bets. His points tonight were made in the most unpredictable fashion possible. It tells you nothing good about him, only warnings.

He and Woodhead both stay on my bench unless it's an emergency.

reddit, we have GOT to stop it with the "tell me I'm pretty" threads.I took CJA in 0 of nearly 50 leagues.

In the few leagues where he's been outright waived, I haven't even put a waiver claim in on him "just in case", but I have taken Hillman as a FA.

&gt;Can this guy turn it around

I feel like The Architect from The Matrix here.

"The question isn't whether he can turn it around, the question has already been answered before you asked it. The question is if you understand why he can't turn it around."

Why? Why did I avoid this guy universally like the plague?

Because I have watched him play. Some guys have "it" and others don't. CJA has potential on paper, but it doesn't translate in real-time game speed. 

Here's a player whose team is desperate to make him the focal point of the offense and have given him every opportunity to make that happen...and has failed. 

Your question basically boils down to "when will he pull his head out his ass" when it should be "how did he get it so far up there to begin with" because he is clueless.

Hey - I love to be wrong on guys who end up pulling their heads out of their asses, mainly because it's so rare. Until he does it, he's not startable. He's still unsure in pass pro, he doesn't get Manning and how to help him as a hot read, his lane selection behind the line of scrimmage is bad and his physical running looks tentative. 

When Chuck Knoblauch couldn't throw to first, it was obvious. But when this guy can't run, everyone wants to know when he's gonna turn it around. He's averaging 11.4 PPG

How hard can it be?That list is the list of someone who dropped their first 2-3 games if he did that.It's not really only a deep threat, it's that he can keep getting yards after the catch.

He's a violent runner. You have to watch him run routes. He's big, strong and he breaks ankles with his moves.

So much of the wasted conversation here is comprised of factors that are minimally important if not unimportant.

*WATCH* him play. Understand *why* he's open. That's why he's a good bet to keep starting. Teams can't take him away or shut him down. He isn't dependent upon scheme, situation, garbage yards and all that shit. 

There are very few WRs in the NFL who "write their own ticket" as it were - guys like Antonio Brown who are open on a fairly regular basis and are just waiting for their QB to get them the ball. Hurns is open *all the damn time*.

It's one of the less risky plays to start him right now.God I fucking hate PFF. I can't believe you suckered me into going to that site if only to see if they got it wrong.

And did they?

Sure did.

Any mention of him having stat inflation from that one 60 yard play he had?

Of course not! 

Why?

Because Cris Collinsworth.Of course it's a dumb stat. It's PFF. It's what they do. They sell people on worthless stats. PFF is the gluten-free choice of fantasy knowledge.Yup, I was gonna say that he looks way sharper out there running routes and getting open than Cooks.

Cooks doesn't have Drew Brees problem, Cooks has a Cooks problem.

While I don't know if he actually lines up as the WR1 instead of Cooks like you think, I do know that Brees is good enough to go through several reads to find the open man and this kid makes it happen.Only hits at point-blank rangeYes, I'm doubly disturbed at this one.&gt;Tom Waits' "Tom Traubert's Blues," "Give My Compliments to the Chef" by the Sensational Alex Harvey Band

If you ever wanted insight into Robert's sense of humour, you've got it right there.2007 New England Patriots vs 1972 Dolphins for the right to SHUT THE FUCK UPEven the rays of lightI was gonna post something similar - that car is totally from Texas due to the hail damage. She didn't have covered parking at her apartment, which is pretty rare. Even cheap and shitty places have it.No you see the silver Civic is gone so it's like totally different weeks.&gt;Watching this train wreck is more addicting than ~~drugs~~ *Mountain Dew*.

Same difference
Let me also give a "Thank god" here as well. 

Same exact problem upgrading an Acer. It was dog ass slow. Kept my from upgrading a HP I had to roll back. Now I can do it clean!The niqab isn't a problem, it's the people who oppose Harper's stance on it that are the problem.  

People are so damned determined to say "nuh-uh!" that they fall for it. They're so obsessed with sounding tolerant that they fall right into his hands.

Furthermore, he's exposing liberal hypocrisy to his base. 

The answer is simple: there is no room for symbols of female oppression in a progressive, secular society. "Let them live and let me live" is a conservative libertarian view these days. You are supporting him either way. Even agreeing with him supports him unless you add the words "progressive, secular society" to it. 

If you take the issue back, he loses power and it bounces back to his Base to ask why he's aligning with those kinds of values. Unlimited tolerance isn't a progressive value.Hey thanks for coming to reddit - we always appreciate it. 

I was just wondering if you could talk about Princeton and your path to professional football from an academic school and your thoughts on going that route.If only there were some sort of...contest they could engage in to settle it where they'd "play" to see who gets to go "off" to the next round. We could call it an "offplay"Someone alert /r/conspiracy and /r/TopMindsOfReddit - we've got some distinct groups for both of them!There's a Jacksonville State?Well considering their reputation as the most "homer fanbase", I don't think we could ask for a more objective ranker.I think you're both right.

Ask yourself why people are so upset that Seattle *aren't* ranked lower.

It's not their innate sense of justice. It's comeuppance.I think it's interesting because there's a team that have been rather impotent on offense, failed to find their run game and look pretty solid on defense.

I could be speaking of the Broncos or the Seahawks.

The fact people are up in arms over one and not the other tells you a lot about attitudes. Perhaps people should be upset for Denver being the worst undefeated team. 

People are taking record and weighing it too heavily. If you want to say Seattle look like shit as a way of justifying them being lower due to record, shouldn't the Broncos looking like shit make them lower due to record?

The difference is, people *really like* the Broncos and Manning.

I had a hard time ranking both Seattle and Denver and I think that if those two teams played 10 times, Seattle would win 7 of them. Even I think I weighed record too heavily, but I couldn't ignore it.Exactly. We won and went down and I'm not even upset. I think it's a market correction; we were all guilty of wishful thinking or historical bias. 

I'm still not certain I have Pittsburgh right (I think I may have them too high), it's just that if you take teams and group them into tiers, about 75% of the NFL are awful on a whole 'nuther level. It seems like maybe Pittsburgh or Seattle should be ranked lower, but I can't group them with that next bubble of mediocrity.These power ranking discussions are fascinating from a psychology/sociology perspective because of all of the logical fallacies you see. 

I think that's the most enjoyable part of this. Part of me wants people to be more self-aware and realise their biases, but the bigger part of me is there wanting them to keep on keepin' on because it's a great experiment. It's the circlejerk on steroids. 

Kind of interesting when the circlejerk gets it right.It depends on if there's even 10 good teams or not. 

I just said this in a previous post, but take the teams by ranking and draw a circle around contiguous groups and make those bubbles your different tiers.

I think the tiers would look something like this:

Tier 1: Packers, Pats and Cardinals - good teams with few questions

Tier 2: Bengals, Falcons, Panthers - teams with a record, but legitimate questions

Tier 3: Broncos, Seahawks, Steelers - teams who have talent, but look bad

Then draw a circle over those 3 tiers. That's the "good" team tier. There are only 9. 

Tier 4: Jets, Bills, Giants, Vikings - up and down teams who have a short resume

This tier could be included in the other 3 if you like, but they are dangerously close to slipping way down. The rest of the teams are another tier.

I said in a different post that about 75% of the NFL are on their own "bad" tier and that Tier 4 is on the bubble between either of them. 

This year is really, really unusual because things are so far off, and if you want to be realistic, the Falcons and Panthers maybe don't even belong in a group with the likes of the Packers and Patriots at all.Better than Carly."The shitlord swimsuit companies don't stock anything in a 5X so I couldn't go to the store and get anything that wasn't an isty bitsy teeny weenie little polka dot bikini so I quit out of protest or those shitlords forced me out or whatever."It makes your hands strong enough to control the weight of an entire pound cake so you can eat it in one bite.No, don't be. Asian bras are starting to get it right. If you go on AliExpress and see the side gathering bras, they fit women with small frames and cup sizes, but have 4 hooks on the band. They're good because they move boob/fat from under your armpit and towards your cleavage. $135 for a vibrator?

Yet more fat discrimination. A regular vibrator is $20. More thin privilege if you ask me.That's high-level narcissism right there.Well shit, now we're not the sympathetic underdog anymore.She does?

I hope someone is archiving this for comedy's sake. Yeah that accident on the red one?

It was only 5mph.If you preorder you get extra calcium from day 1, but if you don't you will have brittle bonesYeah, I would really like to know what's up with all of the games I already exported, but I don't want to make a new thread. 

I exported RB1, RB2 and Lego, plus I own RB3. I guess we're just waiting whilst everyone else who used social engineering to get an export code is golden?IMO, a manual cooker is a warmer compared to one that's digital. 

Some features you want are things like moving to automatic warm - manual controls don't do that. You want to set it and forget it.

Manual cookers are things I would rather use to keep things warm as opposed to cooking.

I have four crock pots and two three pot warmers and I find that I prefer the crock pots as warmers. Although I only ever use my 2 digital crock pots. One of them has multiple-stage cooking. I can set cycle 1 for high for 2 hours and then cycle 2 on low for 4.

I think food comes out better that way. Often times I cook the same thing spread across the two crock pots and 2 hours high/4 low on one = 8 low on the other, but the meat is a better texture on the two-stage model. 

I think it's best to spend the money and buy one you'll keep forever from the start. I read this comment and couldn't figure it out, then I remembered you guys have more laws about guns than...anything and figured there's probably some regulation/loophole that could be used to take his gun from him altogether. 

I assume he could just apply for a CC anyway. Or move to Vermont.Sacco said "I should have done something about this sooner"

Maybe you should have done something now?Oh for fuck's sake.

Honestly, with all of the adversity the Bills have faced, I'm surprised they've still hung on.Sounds less painful than absorbing Bills-related news this season.

Yeah I grabbed Kane in my fantasy league. I think he's gonna bounce back big, plus he's a fun guy to watch. 

I even took a flier on Ennis, but he's got to step it up. I'm expecting big things from the Sabres this year.&gt; Yeah I've got no confidence in EJ.

Because EJ has no confidence in EJ.Most NFL QBs this year can't do what Taylor was doing this year.I debated whether to say this or not, but I think I jinxed him. 

When I was grabbing him Saturday night to stash in my fantasy leagues I thought "Man, who names their kid after parts of a car's steering and alignment mechanicals?"

Which of course led to "man, what happens if he hurts his knee? Is an ACL injury a bent outer Tyrod? Is an MCL injury a bent inner Tyrod?"

Terrible karma.Yeah, it's not like you have to take advantage of the one sunny day per week to do it all.Yeah, that's WC living. 6 hours is nothing. You gotta drive for culture and events. I went from San Diego to PHX to watch the Steelers many years ago. Now I won't even drive 3 hours to Foxboro to see a game.Tell him to kick this guy in the nuts for us because Bengals fans are scoring off us:

https://www.reddit.com/r/bengals/comments/3omfvg/leave_it_to_a_steelers_fan_to_take_up_3_spots_in/cvyovdvThe only time(s) in my life it hasn't been overrun by foreign fans is like...when the Expos would come to town because there were zero French Canadians in San Diego and then when the Marlins came into the league.

Part of the reason I like Cubs/Cardinals/Giants/whatever fans so much is my experience growing up in San Diego being surrounded by them at every Padres game.

It makes the shitty fanbases stand out more. I'm looking at you, Maple Leafs.Being a Clipper sucksLook at Freeman. He's been used thoroughly and he's gonna be dead soon if they don't mix Coleman in. A big back is needed in passing and running downs.

A smaller back gets taken out in running downs.

The exception would be big backs who aren't good in the pass game (like Ingram) or small backs who can still run hard (like Freeman).The Commish's job is to make sure the league is fun, fair and balanced.

You don't have absolute autonomy to do whatever the fuck you like with your roster - that's why there are Can't Cut Lists and the ability to lock rosters.

Never mind this was a mistake. I would ban the asshole who accepted it. This is an issue of managing your participants. Yahoo keeps everyone on waivers.

NFL shows them on W at midnight if there's a claim, otherwise they are free. It can take a few hours to process.

ESPN is like NFL.

There's a strategy where you can go in at midnight exactly and grab FAs if you're fast enough, but I have 6 NFL leagues and 25 ESPN and I can't do it in time. With Yahoo you just have to set them and hope for the best. Yahoo is especially fucky because often I see people get guys I had ranked with a higher priority. ESPN will give me the right guy, but show the adds out of order, ie I would have #1 priority but it shows me as the 5th waiver move.

In Yahoo I found that when it screws you on claims it's best to waive all of your players beforehand and then make claims with your empty spots. I had Lamar Miller on my "DO NOT DRAFT LIST" this year, but took him in a league just to say I had him and to force myself to follow him. Yeah.

By round:

1. Lacy

2. Calvin

3. Lamar Miller

4. Arian

5. Brees

6. Maclin

7. Big Ben

8. Agholor

9. Abdullah

10. Blue

11. Kendall

12. McFadden

13. Stafford

14. Texans

15. Parkey

16. Daniels

If you ask me, the confluence of failure comes down to Miller, Big Ben getting hurt, Lacy getting hurt, Brees getting hurt, Foster being hurt and Parkey sucking/getting hurt. You should all quit this shitty league after the year is over and he can dock whoever inherits the team their draft pick.Call it pity or sympathy, but I lack those things when it comes to examples of ignorance such as this. And whoever sold her this bill of goods deserves to have their stupid machine explode on them from the lies it tells.&gt; The real blame is on people who keep enabling her shit by giving her spots at conferences and talks.

The shit will hit the fan one day when someone at a conference has an iPad and googles her and sees the Dances With FACTS blog and actually confronts her in front of everyone. That'll be a mess - objective academics in bewilderment with social science majors being massively offended and Ragen tapdancing on-stage.The fact no one stood up to L Ron Hubbard early on means you have this tiny group of Scientologists who infiltrated the US government and nearly caused serious harm.

Society would be a lot better if we kept constant pressure on narcissists who are swindling people.&gt; because a lot of obese women think they can be just as ~~"glam"~~ *"fierce"* as they are if they put on a bit of makeup.

That word is ruined for me.&gt; Do you not worry about the oncoming shame? 

You don't understand something: she's a narcissist.

Go to /r/raisedbynarcissists (if you can handle it) and read the stories there. You'll see many common themes, but one of them are narcissistic parents doing things that are utterly humiliating to everyone with no remorse or even awareness of the fact.

When your quest is power and you'll do anything to get it because of a psychological compulsion, checks and balances like integrity and shame are worthless.

Why do you think they make such a big deal about "fat shaming" and all that other bullshit? Because they don't want to be challenged. They don't want reminders that what they're doing is morally wrong.

I say this over and over again: fatlogic is nothing more than fat narcissism. And narcissists don't feel shame. The ones who you can shame are the ones who can be rescued from the clutches of fatlogic because they're not truly narcissists, just people enjoying some power. It's people who are irreparably broken who are malignant narcissists and there's nothing you can do to change them, only thwart them.

That's why I think there should always be conversation about Tess, Ragen, ATL, etc because someone needs to shine a bright light on their festering mould.Ragen will never change.

Any sort of re-invention will only be to further her narcissism. 

Narcissism, like psychopathy is incurable. 

Narcissists feed on enabling hope that they can "do better" and "turn it around" - they will "get better" insofar as it furthers their goals to have power. 

Every single thing Ragen does is about power. Even reading her pathetic LJ you see a common theme from then until now which is power, power, power. 

"Change, or how to tell if someone is incurable"

Change is a lot like being converted to Jesus. Admit you're a sinner, accept Jesus into your heart and live your life in a Christian way from then on out. It's an important concept because it teaches people how to give power and glory to God rather than oneself and more important how to be wrong, ask forgiveness and change for the better. 

Narcissists will not admit they're wrong. They never get to the point of feeling remorse because they don't admit they're wrong. They never do right by those they've wrong by being accountable for their actions because they aren't wrong. They never change their behaviour because they aren't accountable for their actions.

Scientifically, Ragen has proven over and over on a universal basis that she is never wrong, never sorry, never accountable and never going to change.

She is, without almost any reservation an incurable narcissist and will never possess the awareness of self to be what you hope.

And Ragen, I hope you read this and prove me wrong. Not a facsimile of pretending to be humble, but actually admit how full of shit you are, who you've hurt and work the rest of your life on your knees to beg forgiveness for your arrogant megalomania.I didn't eat *only* McDonald's, but I did eat it every day when I lost weight. 

McDonald's isn't to blame for peoples' problems, it's them for eating way too much of it.I feel like we've just witnessed a miracle.

Does anyone else feel closer to god right now?Zero to me.

I have Freeman in dozens of leagues and just finished doing all of my waiver claims and I chose West and other backs instead. 

Ride the Freeman train until it turns to shit. Don't play in the shit.[I'm really reaching here](http://i.imgur.com/AEuBwX3.png)

Apologies to /u/axolotl_peyotl - I know you're not a Satan agent. Also, 6-3-7-19-5-22-11 you know what I mean.The thing I don't like is "parroting" - is it different when you think the other person is an idiot?

If I stick to the talking points about 9/11 or Benghazi, does that make me a good parrot? 

I don't understand, is parroting only bad when you think the other person is an idiot? Because if science is on the side of say...9/11 Twin Towers falling, how can we dismiss science about vaccinations?

Isn't it idiotic to pick and choose the science you like?&gt;or are all the cars lemons

Does not mesh with:

&gt;I'd really like a grand caravan or a town n country

I'm not being flippant here. If you're going to go to an auction and potentially save thousands, why wouldn't you get a Sienna or an Odyssey?Yeah but do you keep the sun in your pocket? Not unless you're some sort of God or at least demigod.BTW have you joined us in /r/CenturyClub yet? It's where we pull the strings of reddit from behind the scenes.I have inside information that he's going to start #1 RB this weekNo, the guy's a criminalAs someone who has taken care of two parents who have passed those ages, this is very True. 1500 upvotes: http://imgur.com/DTT8Ot0

2000 upvotes: http://imgur.com/56pkwqM

1,000,000 upvotes: http://imgur.com/XB67rXAOf all the things I got right this year, the one I got wrong was their shit start out of the gate.

I'm sitting here looking at Nick "Lou Ferigno" Foligno wondering to drop him, be patient or go insane.

How in the hell can he be -9 with 26 SOG? It's like he gets his own rebound and shoots it back into his own end.

I thought for SURE they were gonna be a contender this year. Like...if I was going to Vegas and put money down to win the Cup on good odds, I would have done CBJ.

I watched 1 game this year and some highlights and they have no idea what they're doing. Maybe a coaching change is needed.

I need to breathe calmly and think this will matter. Yeah they do this after I already dropped Savard.

SOBsI'm only a fan of Torts for his extreme arrogance in pressers. As a coach he is completely overrated, but he your guys should get some PIMs LOL

Yeah, he's like any coach who comes in and wears out his welcome. 

In the past his act lasted a lot longer. He may lose this locker room mid-season. He could at least hold one for 2 years, at least at one time.Dude David Savard is owned in far less leagues and he's got more upside than Jack does.That's like asking Tom Brady if he gets tired of fucking a supermodelI was gonna mention pitchers - the throwing motion isn't muscular strength, it's form.

It's like hitting a golf ball - at least that's the best analogy to me. John Daly has a lot of weight, which is power. The weight around the middle is part of the turn of your swing, believe it or not. He has that.

The QB's throwing motion is the same. It's small circles. One is the feet, they turn. It goes up like a tornado to the hips, the stomach to the shoulder and then to the elbow (that's basically how I was taught to hit a golf ball).

Having extra weight is a good thing, although muscle is denser than fat. 

I wouldn't really say it's the pecs that are the problem. A big gut could potentially get in the way. It's that there's usually a tradeoff between muscular bulk and flexibility. 

BONUS: these guys study so much film that they have little time to hit the weight roomQuoting /u/smacksaw from the Game Thread:

&gt;What pisses me off the most is that the Seahawks let Ginn run straight through them three plays before.

&gt;It's like they didn't even adjust and go "yo, we should probably bump these guys and not give a free release and maybe we can give the pass rush a chance to get to Newton by delaying his receivers."

&gt;But then again, what do I know?

https://www.reddit.com/r/nfl/comments/3p9fok/game_thread_carolina_panthers_40_at_seattle/cw4iugg

What I was saying was that they were in the wrong coverage because they were giving the underneath man (Olsen, Ginn) a free release by playing zone (Cover 4 where each player is responsible for a quadrant of the field) rather than man.

Earl Thomas is wrong and it's very telling because he not only couldn't make sense of the play in real-time, he still doesn't know what was correct 3 days later. I don't know if his coaches failed to correct him or what, but the CORRECT ADJUSTMENT was to bring the DBs up to the line and bump the receivers from the snap.

Maybe the "weasel words" can be that they didn't play their Cover 4 assignments properly, which is True...technically. The reality is that they were simply in the wrong coverage, period. They lost because they failed to adjust to what the Panthers were doing. 

As I jokingly said in the thread "what do I know", I was pointing out that a layman on the couch QB saw the issue better than they did. Why he would say what you claim he said is beyond me. 

Cover 4 was never the key to stopping them at the end of that game. He's either lying to protect someone or this explains why their defense is so bad, because it's painfully obvious how they were defeated by scheme. The Panthers were absolutely giddy to see the Seahawks not adjust in the last 8 minutes or so of the 4th.Harbaugh would never downgrade from Jed York to Jim Irsay.

He just escaped a nutcase owner with an untouchable "buddy buddy" GM who is ruining the franchise and is going to go to an even nuttier owner with a far worse GM?

At least Baalke is good at finding talent.According to reports I've heard, he hasn't had feeling in his fingers for quite some time.

No strength, no touch...I understand why they want this run-heavy offense. He can't throw. 

This season is...a last-gasp desperation for him from Elway. The interesting thing about Floyd are his fundamentals.

It's like seeing a guy who's a great boxer - even when the opponent is down, the rest of the combo comes out as the person is falling. He executes what he's taught.

Also if you watch his head, he's always looking at the entire play. 

It's the fundamentals taking care of the man in front of him without him looking. He trusts the process. That enables him to see the field and the rest of the play.

Nice effort to share what he does. He's a special player.He makes everyone around him better, which is all you can really ask from the DT position. Speaking of which, if we'd have been smart enough to get him during the summer, we'd probably be 6-0 right now.We learned it pretty fast, though.

I think we gave Scobee a fair shot and didn't overreact nor hang on too long.Je Suis Hamburger has limitations. He doesn't give us a chance from deep.

Luckily for him he'll have a future doing commercials where he smiles into the camera while feeling his face and smiling after shaving with a 10-blade razor.That's great. I wish more people upvoted it. That was funny.

It makes me think - a roundtable kind of "look back" thing would be sweet.

I'd love to get:

* Haley

* Harrison

* LeBeau

* Warner

* Arians

* Whisenhunt

And maybe even Carson Palmer could be the moderator. He hates us so much.As far as I know the only thing he has is a DUI arrest of which he was exonerated. A good lawyer would have gotten that shit expunged. No, it could still stop him from getting a *visa*.

The UK are a "visa waiver" country to him, so he can travel without one as a tourist.

As someone working under a "special classification" such as entertainer or sports category they would need to arrange visas beforehand. 

https://www.gov.uk/tier-5-temporary-worker-creative-and-sporting-visa

He could still be inadmissible, though.

Let me give you an example of something most people are not aware of: countries share everything.

At the border I see this quite often. Americans trying to go to Canada with an old misdemeanor DUI from years ago that's been discharged - they've completed their community service, probation, etc.

Canada won't allow them in because in Canada it's a felony with a longer time. Canada has access to your entire criminal history, even if it's sealed. The information is shared before it's sealed. They know you were arrested, your disposition in the court, that it was sealed, etc. 

It's fucked up. People should have a right to be forgotten, but even if you get everything expunged, all of the countries we share with still have it because a US court has no jurisdiction with what other nations retain. This ought to be an international treaty right.

It goes the other way with the US. A good example in Canada are pardons and waivers. I often see Canadians refused entry to the USA at the border because they have a prior conviction and paid big money for a pardon and think they can go.

Getting your record suspended isn't enough. You need a waiver. Even though Canada has forgiven their crime, the US hasn't. And the US still sees you as a convict on their computer, which is why you need a waiver to enter.

In reality, once you've been pardoned in Canada, the information should be clawed back from all foreign databases and not used against you.

This is how/why he could be affected if he has any sort of convictions that make him criminally inadmissible to the UK. They would know it. It's quite frightening in a civil liberties sort of way.I don't think it made any difference.

Our voters aren't that stupid. That was the least important issue to people.

Cost of living, jobs, economy, environment were all things that voters stated as their main reasons.

"Observers said"

What observers?

Polling said it was a non-issue.If they want to reinvent themselves, they should denounce the unions as well as corporations and push for us to move towards worker-owned cooperatives, credit unions instead of big banks, etc.

The whole union/corporate paradigm is over, but people are too scared to let it go.There's also "After Porn Ends" which is good. And my comment was similar to yours, so I will add it here.

Whether it's porn, the music industry, whatever - artists don't get their fair share.

I hate how everyone on reddit kisses up to the Brazzers people. They get rich. The performers don't.

It's the opposite. Distribution and promotion should get the smallest piece of the overall pie. And once performers make it big, they go on to form companies to exploit others as they were once exploited.

So many of society's inequities could be solved by voluntary co-ops./r/europe doesn't have a "SJW narrative" - this is False equivocation to say it's anything like SRS or whatever.

/r/europe is a very well-moderated subreddit. /r/european is like the /r/conspiracy version of /r/europe

I disagree with most of your list so far but this is by far the most glaring mistake.

I've been unfairly/wrongly banned from my share of subreddits and even I can say that if you get banned from /r/europe, you probably deserved it for being a dick, not politically disagreeable. This is why people get banned from /r/europe

Making neo-nazi arguments isn't constructive conversation, it's trolling or race-baiting.

Free speech is fine, irresponsible free speech designed to harass people is against the rules of reddit, dude. If the mods didn't do something about it, they'd be breaking the rules.

Look - I'm a lifelong libertarian and reading your comments I think you think you are, but let me tell you the difference between what libertarianism is and what you think it is: libertarianism isn't anarchy. It's not "no rules", it's the old "the right to swing your fist stops at my face". If you're a SJW, you're constantly putting your face in the way of swinging fists - that's a "you problem" if you're a SJW.

If you're a regular person just trying to exist, you have a RESPONSIBILITY to not get in the path of shit, nor start it. That's what libertarianism is - live and let live. Not "live and let you harass me" because there's a muddy line between you expressing yourself and your self-expression getting in the way of others to express themselves.

"But wait", you say, "the mods are deleting self-expression!"

True, and you are suppressing the right of others to have self-expression. They are responding in like kind.

"Yeah", you say, "that's why /r/european is better than /r/europe because anything goes!"

No it's not. Because /r/european lacks respect. Respect for basic rules, whether they be civil rights, civil liberties, unspoken rules, etiquette, whatever - that's how we express ourselves in a truly free forum. If you have a subreddit filled with disrespect it becomes a joke.

Hence "circlejerking" and how these things devolve into humourous chaos. Which I admit I like. But unlike you, I don't confuse them or conflate them with responsible discussion. I don't go to /b/ to have serious discussions. I go there to laugh. /r/AskScience has rules to make it a serious discussion. Without basic rules, it wouldn't exist properly. 

This is why I'm a libertarian. I follow the rules. Basic rules. Good rules. Being a libertarian without rules simply puts you in a constant state of chaotic anarchy, which isn't libertarian at all (despite the libertarian left's desire to say anarchy isn't chaos). 

tldr: Go to /r/europe and follow the rules and have a serious, respectful discussion. Self-moderate so the mods don't have to. Go to /r/european to laugh in an unmoderated environment. But never presume to tell us that /r/european is an alternative to serious discussion when there are so many unserious replies that are fundamentally disrespectful people just yelling talking points at each other like FOX News.Sounds good to me. There's plenty of other places to discuss her. Why engage her directly when she has homefield advantage?It became gangrenous and was excised.If she's a FA cruise director, does that make her donors her tugboats?I'm not going to watch this and give her a counter on her views.

What did it say?I read the New Yorker article linked inside and it was also good.

Ragen doesn't just take shortcuts or ignore the math, she refuses to acknowledge there's any other math or shortcuts to consider.

She is truly the textbook definition of an ignoramus. It's all the more tragic because I am convinced she is incredibly bright.Yup. Wanna win at life?

Stay humble. Keep assumptions to a minimum. Know the line between confidence and arrogance and understand that it's drawn with humility.Go work your issues out with your parents and shrink.

We're all full of circumcision debates.I think this "Lugansk 8" guy was pretty impressive:

http://imgur.com/N4eH6fw

He actually played himself out of the top of the league with his stupid moves.

http://imgur.com/nOH7DUDWow. 

Just wow.

Poor Hammel. From here on: no more sliding into 2nd baseWhile I completely agree with all of that, I am anxious to trade him and get off of the James Jones Thrill Ride Coaster/u/Redleg_fan and you of course /u/ryancm8 - thank you.

Fantasy football is so much more the eye test than anything.

I dominated fantasy baseball this year (5 of 6 leagues I won) and didn't watch much of it at all, despite having MLB Extra Innings. I used math to win.

In fantasy NFL, I use stats to help understand my reasoning. Who I draft or choose to start? I go back and check the stats.

Fantasy baseball is about understanding trends and riding them. Fantasy football is about seeing which stats match up with what you see.Huh?

Steve Smith had a monster September and a monster December. That's it.Sorry, this is wrong.

James Jones possesses a very dangerous (for his owners' health and for opposing teams) and well-defined role.

All of the other WRs are going to be fighting for looks based upon whoever is open. They will benefit from scheme. Watch the Packers play. Last week, the Chargers chose to fight James Jones the hardest. Other teams are doing the same. 

James Jones is working to get guys open by drawing fire. 

Adams won't take James away. It's not even a compatible argument. Jones will continue to make matchup problems as an instant deep threat, scare the shit out of DCs and DBs and when they make a mistake, Rodgers is A++++ enough to make them pay.

Rodgers is completely agnostic about the rest of the WRs and simply throw to whoever is open. It's very difficult to accept this if you're a Cobb owner, but Adams, Montgomery etc are all fighting with Cobb for looks - not Jones.As I said in a previous post, the eye test exists to help you understand the stats in FF.

Jones is converting his opportunities. He's rarely open and Rodgers won't force it. Watch the Packers and you will see that. He's looking at whoever is on the 3rd DB, worst DB, etc. 

But the moment there's a mistake in scheme/coverage/whatever on Jones, he hits him.

The one stat that tells you the most is 21/29, meaning he's catching 72% of his targets, which is pretty unreal.

Other guys might go off on 6/15 in a game or whatever and get the same numbers. Maybe Jones gets 0 looks in a game and is shut out. That's a concern.

You want to talk stats, but you are making a grievous error by using the wrong ones. His age isn't an important number. Neither is his PPG or PP target. You even mention points per target, yet failed to consider his conversion rate!Ok everyone seems to be discussing the wrong stats.

http://espn.go.com/nfl/player/gamelog/_/id/10522/james-jones

His production is very stable. Look at his *conversion rate*. Catches to Targets.

Week 1: 100%

Week 2: 33%

Week 3: 88%

Week 4: 83%

Week 5: 66%

Week 6: 40%

He's caught 72% of his targets. In his 6 games he's been unstable alright. He's blown away his own average 3 times and gone below it twice.

Considering that 60% conversion rate for a WR is pretty good/what you want to shoot for, he's not only far above average with his average, but also quite consistent. He's had "duds" in 2 of 6 games, which is 29% of games. Projected out over the season he is going to have 3 more bad games. And a bad game for him is 8 and 9 points!

His average PPG is 12.5 and the average for a startable WR is 8-9 PPG, so his duds are exactly the average. Everything else is very stable above it.

The only worry is that there are games where he gets no looks at all.I would keep Bradshaw. His role will increase and the Colts are going to get much better. Everyone will get fed.

Sims is an intriguing stash, but Theo Riddick is making a better argument to be a lead back for his team.

Sims is projecting out to being a complimentary back. Things would need to go bad for him to inherit a starting role.

Riddick just needs to keep playing well and he will end up with more than just passing down snaps.I would say "no" - the arrow on Riddick is pointing up, the arrow on Duke is pointing down. They gave Turbin a lot of looks in crunch time to end that game.

Riddick should already have a bigger role in Detroit. He's the best back of the trio.Javorious Allen isn't looking at much of a role increase, but Charmeleon has but to take the job if he can. 

I wouldn't waste time on Boldin. Good players on bad teams rarely deliver consistency.I did that exact move. 

DST this year is more boom/bust plays than steady points. You're better off simply picking defenses every Tuesday that you think can get to the QB and/or force turnovers. I would rather have Bortles and Fitzpatrick than Eli, I wouldn't want Hoyer because he can be benched and McCown has a high risk of getting himself killed because he's not careful with his body.

You can't take QBs who are prone to giving you a zero.

I like Bortles more than Fitzpatrick because Bortles often doesn't have a choice to run or a defense that wants the clock controlled.I would rather drop Abdullah for Theo Riddick. 

If he's not available then Duke. Riddick is going to get more than just passing downs. He got 7 carries last week and 10 receptions the week before.You do, yes. It's too early in the season to risk wins and points tiebreakers. If you were 6-0? Yeah, ok. Are you?

I would let Williams go. You can't afford LaFell. You have no depth at WR. With Yahoo 3WR and 2RB system, you should roster 4 RBs max. You don't need all those RBs and there's zero reason to even run weekly matchups when you have solid starts.

Yes you should get a backup QB instead of having 4 backup RBs.I dropped Vinatieri. He's too inconsistent. Lambo hasn't been. I would bid $16 for Gates letting Michael or Watkins go - depends if you have more depth at WR or RB.Karlos is droppable, period.

I wouldn't take Jones. I still think it's Thompson's job to win or lose. He's the most versatile of all three backs and that works most in his favour.I would drop LaFell because your league gives you a chance to start 3 RBs which is very solid scoring potential as far as a floor goes. 

I don't think Stevie is a great play. Quite risky. But Lafell is not going to be ready to contribute for a while and when he does, he is simply one of many on his team.That's good thinking.

Yes you should do that.

Hopefully we're not in the same league because I want to get McManus back on Tuesday!In a regular league? He's not even ownable. In a deep league? No.

Watkins is too inconsistent. We already know what he is. He's a guy who has 12 and 10 points in just 2 games this year.Absolutely. Starting in the 4th quarter on Sunday with Turbin being handed the keys to the game in crunch time, the whole Browns situation just got really ugly. Eject on their RBs.Starks is on a bye, so forget him. 

Jones hasn't earned a regular role nor will he. He's not ready this year.

I would get Jennings and Starks and drop Coleman and Lafell. Then, next week I would figure out which RB you want to keep because if something is truly wrong with Lacy, you just scored a big upgrade. Hillman and Diggs.

Lafell should last. It may take some time for him to "pop" and be a "must own" kind of guy. Hillman...has a real shot to make a name for himself. Diggs is a myst